Internship_domain,Company_name,Location,Stipend,job_description
Full Stack Development,"
                            Kraten Enterprises                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Are you a skilled Full Stack Development intern with expertise in Next.js, React, and PostgreSQL? We are seeking a motivated individual to join our dynamic team. As an intern with us, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain valuable hands-on experience in a fast-paced environment.



1. Collaborate with our development team to design and implement new features using Next.js and React.
2. Develop and maintain backend services using PostgreSQL and other technologies.
3. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging issues to ensure smooth operation of our applications.
4. Participate in code reviews and provide feedback to improve code quality and maintainability.
5. Stay up-to-date with the latest trends and technologies in web development.
6. Work closely with cross-functional teams to ensure project requirements are met.
7. Contribute to the overall success of our projects by taking on additional tasks and responsibilities as needed.

If you are a proactive and eager learner looking to enhance your skills in Full Stack Development, apply now to join our team!                "
Full Stack Developer – Webbook & Tracking Integration,"
                            Shiplee                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 4,500 /month","
                1. Develop webhook listener endpoints (in PHP/Node.js) to receive shipment updates from courier companies.
2. Parse webhook payloads and update the Shiplee database (orders, tracking tables) with the latest status.
3. Implement cronjob-based tracking scripts for couriers that do not provide webhooks, ensuring regular polling of their APIs (e.g., every 30–60 minutes).
4. Normalize different courier tracking responses into a standard format for consistency.
5. Ensure reliability and fault tolerance: handle retries, duplicate events, and webhook downtime gracefully.
6. Work closely with the frontend team to expose tracking data via REST APIs for the merchant dashboard and Shopify/WooCommerce integrations.
7. Write clear documentation and maintain GitHub commits for all webhook/cronjob modules                "
Product Management,"
                            FynTune Solution Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 18,000 /month","
                1. Understanding the product offerings and managing new deliverables
2. Working on product planning and its complete roadmap, including UI/UX
3. Collaborating with FynTune's stakeholders, including both the management and their clients who utilize FynTune's technology solutions, such as insurance companies, aggregators, and financial enterprises, to plan projects effectively
4. Working along with the QA team on product logic and product validations
5. Working along with the technology team on product development
6. Working with the project team & supporting them on product deliveries
7. Coordinating with stakeholders (internal & external) for the smooth delivery of the overall project
8. Understanding the requirements of clients on the project front and getting the deliveries from FynTune's technology and product team                "
PCB & Embedded Systems,"
                            PSYC Aerospace And Defence Industries Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                PCB Design & Development
1. Design and optimize single, double, and multilayer PCBs using Altium, KiCad, Eagle, or OrCAD.
2. Handle schematic capture, component selection, layout, and routing for aerospace/defence-grade projects.
3. Generate Gerber files, BOMs, and assembly documents for fabrication.

Embedded Systems & Microcontrollers
1. Work with Arduino, STM32, and other microcontrollers for prototyping and testing.
2. Develop and debug basic firmware for sensor interfacing, control loops, and communication protocols (UART, I2C, SPI, CAN).
3. Integrate sensors, actuators, and wireless modules with embedded systems.

Prototyping & Hands-On Work
1. Perform soldering (through-hole & SMD), assembly, and board bring-up.
2. Build and test breadboard and perfboard circuits before PCB finalization.
3. Conduct hardware debugging with multimeters, oscilloscopes, and logic analyzers.

Testing & Validation 
1. Carry out functional and performance testing of PCBs and embedded systems.
2. Ensure reliability under thermal, vibration, and EMI/EMC conditions (aerospace standards).
3. Document test results and suggest design improvements.

Documentation & Compliance
1. Maintain detailed design notes, wiring diagrams, and test logs.
2. Follow IPC and aerospace-grade standards for PCB and electronics design.

Independent Work
1. Be prepared to work independently on assigned tasks with minimal supervision.
2. Stay proactive in researching new tools, components, and methods to improve designs.
3. Since this is a startup environment, interns are expected to be self-driven, proactive, and resourceful in solving problems.
4. Collaborate with the team only when required, but primarily handle individual project responsibilities end-to-end.                "
Mobile App Developer (React Native+TypeScript),"
                            Ungrezi                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 /month","
                Job Description:
We are hiring a Hybrid Mobile App Developer skilled in React Native and TypeScript to build and maintain applications for both iOS and Android. The role covers two apps: one for clinics and one for users, ensuring smooth performance, clean code, and scalability.



1. Design, develop, and maintain cross-platform mobile apps (iOS & Android) using React Native + TypeScript.
2. Build reusable components and ensure consistent UI/UX across devices.
3. Integrate backend APIs, handle state management, and optimize app performance.
4. Implement authentication, push notifications, in-app navigation, and secure storage.
5. Manage app deployment and updates on App Store and Google Play.
6. Collaborate with backend developers and the product team for feature rollouts.
7. Debug, test, and ensure stability across OS versions and screen sizes.
8. Write clean, modular, and maintainable code with proper documentation.                "
Front End Development,"
                            Lunacal                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Join us for an exceptional opportunity to build groundbreaking products! We're looking for a creative and driven front-end developer intern with NextJS skills to join our innovative team. If you're eager to learn and develop amazing web applications, this is the perfect role for you!

What You'll Do:

1. Build Cool Stuff: Create user-friendly web applications with NextJS.
2. Design Magic: Bring design specs to life with engaging user interfaces.
3. Interactive Fun: Implement animations and interactive components.
4. Team Up: Collaborate with backend developers to make everything work seamlessly.
5. Speed and Scale: Optimize applications for performance and scalability.
6. Keep Learning: Stay on top of the latest trends and best practices in front-end development.

What You Need:
1. Experience with NextJS or React.
2. Hands-on projects with NextJS are a big plus.
3. Knowledge of JavaScript, CSS and Tailwind CSS.
4. Understanding of responsive design.
5. Experience of implementing animations and interactive component design.
6. Ability to work well in a team.                "
Research And Development,"
                            Aliste Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 5,000 /month","
                About Aliste Technologies

Aliste Technologies is a cutting-edge technology company focused on developing innovative smart home and IoT solutions. Our mission is to create intelligent, user-centric products that simplify everyday living through automation and connectivity. Join us to be part of a passionate team driving real-world innovation.

Role Overview

We are seeking a Research and Development Intern to support the design, prototyping, and testing of embedded systems and IoT-based products. You will work closely with our technical team in a remote environment, gaining hands-on experience in hardware-software integration, debugging, and rapid prototyping.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in the design, development, and testing of embedded systems and IoT prototypes
2. Support in coding, debugging, and basic hardware integration tasks
3. Research and propose creative solutions to technical challenges
4. Collaborate effectively with mentors and team members in a remote work setup
5. Document project progress, findings, and technical implementation details
6. Contribute innovative ideas during brainstorming sessions and help transform them into working prototypes

Learning & Growth Opportunities

1. Gain hands-on experience in embedded systems, IoT product development, and hardware-software integration
2. Improve practical skills in PCB design, microcontroller programming, and prototyping
3. Work in a real-world R&D environment, becoming industry-ready with transferable technical skills
4. Experience effective remote collaboration and project execution under guidance from experienced mentors

Required Skills & Knowledge

1. Basic understanding of Embedded Systems and IoT concepts
2. Hands-on knowledge of Arduino and microcontroller programming (C language preferred)
3. Familiarity with PCB Design Tools (e.g., Eagle, KiCad, EasyEDA)
4. Problem-solving mindset and willingness to learn new technologies
5. Good written and verbal communication skills
6. Ability to manage time and deliver tasks within set deadlines                "
Site Engineering,"
                            Quartier Studio                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Supervise & coordinate site activities, ensuring projects are completed on time and within budget.
2. Conduct site inspections to monitor progress, quality, and safety.
3. Liaise with the contractor, laborers, and other stakeholders to resolve site-related issues.
4. Maintain accurate records of site activities, progress, and issues.
5. Ensure compliance with safety protocols and regulations
6. Provide support to the project management team as required.                "
Software Development Engineering (Web),"
                            Vamaship                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,001 - 20,000 /month","
                We’re not just looking for someone who can code, we’re looking for someone who lives and breathes engineering. At our fast-growing tech logistics company, you’ll join a team of serious engineers who care deeply about performance, scalability, and writing code that lasts. You'll be building real product features using PHP, Vue.js, React.js, MariaDB, AWS, and Google Cloud, and enhancing your workflow with AI tools like Cursor or VS Code + Copilot. If you're the kind of person who obsesses over code quality, loves clean architecture, and gets a rush from optimizing milliseconds, you'll fit right in.



1. Develop scalable backend logic in PHP and efficient queries in MariaDB
2. Build dynamic frontend components using Vue.js and React.js
3. Use AI-enhanced IDEs (like Cursor) to improve code speed, clarity, and maintainability
4. Collaborate on real product modules used by thousands of businesses
5. Engineer for performance: clean structure, reusable components, and future-proof design
6. Learn cloud infra by deploying to AWS & Google Cloud

What Makes This Internship Different:

1. You’ll work with true engineers, not just ""devs""
2. Get mentored by a hardcore tech team that loves solving real problems
3. Use tools like Raspberry Pi, 3D printers, AR/VR headsets, 360° GoPro, and more
4. Take part in fun geek rituals like:
5. Rubik’s Cube speed-solving battles
6. Typing speed leaderboards
7. And yes… we use mechanical keyboards
8. We value curiosity, code craftsmanship, and a bit of nerdy obsession.

Who You Are:

1. Pursuing B.Tech / BSc IT / MCA or have strong self-taught coding skills
2. Have experience with (or keen interest in) PHP, Vue, React, SQL/MariaDB
3. You're not just learning to build, you're learning to engineer
4. Comfortable using AI tools to boost productivity — but never compromise quality
5. Bonus: You tinker, break stuff, build side projects, or love debugging deep into the night

What You’ll Get:

1. Hybrid work model – come to our Mumbai office and also work from home
2. Access to cool tech gear and collaborative spaces
3. Opportunity to turn your internship into a full-time engineering role
4. Build real things that go into production — no ""dummy intern tasks""
5. Learn from a tech team that codes smart and lives smarter                "
Product Management,"
                            Coding Junior                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                Are you a Product Management enthusiast looking to gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced and dynamic environment? Look no further! Join us as a Product Management intern at Coding Junior, where you will have the opportunity to work alongside seasoned professionals and contribute to the success of our products. 

Key responsibilities:
1. Assist in conducting market research and analysis to identify industry trends and customer needs.
2. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to develop product roadmaps and strategies.
3. Support the product development process from ideation to launch, ensuring products meet quality standards.
4. Assist in defining and prioritizing product features based on feedback and market demands.
5. Contribute to the development of marketing materials and product documentation.
6. Help with the implementation and monitoring of product performance metrics.
7. Support the Product Manager in various tasks and projects as needed.

If you are a proactive and detail-oriented individual with a passion for product innovation and a strong understanding of Product Management principles, we want to hear from you! Apply now and kickstart your career in Product Management with Coding Junior.                "
QA,"
                            Apport Software Solutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Test our website and app to make sure things are working as expected
2. Report any bugs or issues you find
3. Write simple test cases with the help of the team
4. Help in testing features on different browsers or devices
5. Learn about tools like Postman, TestRail, Jira, Selenium, etc.
6. Support the team with basic testing tasks
7. Join team meetings and learn how QA fits into the software development process                "
Web Developer,"
                            RoadVision AI Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Are you a creative web development enthusiast passionate about design, user experience, and front-end technologies? RoadVision AI is looking for a Web Developer Intern with strong UI/UX design skills and hands-on experience in Figma and Webflow to join our innovative team.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with the design and development teams to create visually appealing and user-friendly web interfaces.
2. Design and prototype web layouts, dashboards, and interfaces using Figma.
3. Develop and maintain responsive, modern websites using Webflow and WordPress.
4. Implement interactive and dynamic components using React, JavaScript, and CSS.
5. Work closely with backend developers to integrate APIs and ensure seamless functionality.
6. Optimize web applications for maximum speed, scalability, and performance.
7. Conduct usability testing and gather feedback to enhance overall UI/UX.
8. Stay updated with the latest trends in web design, front-end development, and emerging tools.

Requirements:
1. Proficiency in Figma, Webflow, WordPress, HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
2. Basic understanding of React.js and Node.js is a plus.
3. Strong sense of design aesthetics, color theory, and typography.
4. Ability to translate wireframes and design prototypes into functional websites.
5. Good problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
6. Eagerness to learn and grow in a fast-paced, collaborative environment.                "
Backend Development,"
                            RegisterKaro                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Assist in developing, testing, and maintaining backend systems and APIs.
2. Work with databases (MySQL, MongoDB, or PostgreSQL) to ensure data integrity and performance.
3. Collaborate with the frontend and product teams to integrate APIs and improve system efficiency.
4. Participate in debugging, troubleshooting, and optimizing code for scalability.
5. Help document backend processes, structures, and API endpoints.
6. Support the team in maintaining data security and server-side logic.
7. Learn and implement new technologies to enhance system performance.                "
Node.js Development,"
                            Warewe Consultancy Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Working with a web scraper
2. Working with puppeteer package on Node.js
3. Managing code deployment on cloud
4. Creating & integrating third(3rd) party REST API
5. Working on SaaS-based projects                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            LI-MAT SOFT SOLUTIONS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                We are seeking a talented Full Stack Development intern to join our team at LI-MAT SOFT SOLUTIONS PRIVATE LIMITED. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain hands-on experience in a dynamic and collaborative environment. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Develop and maintain web applications using PHP, HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
2. Implement front-end frameworks such as React and AngularJS to create responsive and user-friendly interfaces.
3. Work on database management using MongoDB and MySQL to store and retrieve data efficiently.
4. Collaborate with the team to design and develop robust back-end systems using Node.js.
5. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure smooth functionality of the applications.
6. Stay updated on the latest technologies and trends in web development to enhance skills.
7. Participate in code reviews and contribute to the overall success of the projects.

If you are passionate about full stack development and eager to learn and grow in a fast-paced environment, then this internship opportunity is perfect for you. Join us and be a part of our innovative team at LI-MAT SOFT SOLUTIONS PRIVATE LIMITED.                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            TOOTHROCKET                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 lump sum","
                We are thrilled to offer an exciting internship opportunity for a talented Mechanical Engineering student at Toothrocket! As an intern with us, you will have the chance to work with cutting-edge technology and gain hands-on experience in the dental industry. 



1. Utilize SolidWorks and Autodesk Fusion 360 to design innovative dental products
2. Collaborate with our team to develop prototypes and conduct testing using ANSYS software
3. Assist in the optimization of product designs for manufacturing and assembly
4. Conduct research on new materials and technologies to enhance product performance
5. Provide support in the development of technical documentation and presentations
6. Participate in design reviews and provide feedback for continuous improvement
7. Gain valuable insights and mentorship from experienced engineers in the field
8. 3D printing for biomedical parts

If you are a motivated and detail-oriented student with a passion for mechanical engineering, we would love to have you on our team at Toothrocket. Join us and be a part of shaping the future of dental innovation!                "
Industrial Design,"
                            Incredible Design                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 18,000 /month","
                Are you a talented Industrial Design student looking to gain hands-on experience at a multi-disciplinary design environment? At Incredible Design, as an Industrial Design intern, you will have the opportunity to work alongside our experienced team and contribute to exciting projects that push the boundaries of creativity. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in creating detailed 2D and 3D models using AutoCAD, SolidWorks, Rhino, Autodesk Inventor, Blender, and ZBrush.
2. Develop photorealistic renderings using KeyShot to bring designs to life
3. Collaborate with the team to brainstorm and sketch new concepts
7. Stay up-to-date on industry trends and technologies to enhance your skills and knowledge

If you have a passion for design and a strong proficiency in the mentioned software, we want to hear from you! Join us in shaping the future of industrial design and make your mark in this exciting field. You start as an Intern and will get absorbed too for the job.                "
3d Modelling and Animation,"
                            STEMpedia                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the education team to conceptualize and create new models.
2. Develop realistic and optimized 3D models for PictoBlox 3D and XR Studio and other products of the PictoBlox platform.
3. Revise models based on feedback from team members.
4. Integrate models into PictoBlox 3D and XR Studio workflows while ensuring compatibility and a cohesive design language.
5. Undertake any other reasonable duties as may be required for the delivery of your responsibilities.                "
Product Design,"
                            STEMpedia                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Work on in-house new product development activities for educational products in STEM for children, like - exploration, conceptualization, prototyping, user testing, costing, and productionising of rising new products in Robotics, AI, ML, AR/VR.
2. Take ownership of iterating and improving products based on user feedback, production expectations (e.g scalability), market appeal etc.                "
Web Development,"
                            Fusion Tech Solutions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 16,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with our IT team on software development, testing, and troubleshooting tasks.
2. Cross-Browser Compatibility - Test web applications across various browsers and devices to ensure consistent performance.
3. UI/UX Enhancement - Implement animations and transitions using CSS and JavaScript for improved engagement.
4. Version Control - Use Git for version control to manage code changes and collaborate with team members.
5. Maintain documentation and support project tracking tools.                "
Python Developer Trainee,"
                            Monkhub                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Assist in writing clean, efficient, and well-documented Python code.
2. Support the development and maintenance of web applications, APIs, and backend systems.
3. Collaborate with developers, designers, and QA teams to deliver features.
4. Conduct basic testing and debugging of code.
5. Participate in team meetings, code reviews, and knowledge-sharing sessions.
6. Learn and apply software engineering principles and best practices.
7. Document your work and contribute to internal tools and utilities.                "
Python Development,"
                            Fusion Tech Solutions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 16,500 /month","
                1. Collaborate with our IT team on software development, testing, and troubleshooting tasks - Write reusable, testable, and efficient code in Python.
2. Testing and Debugging - Collaborate with the QA team to conduct user acceptance testing.
3. Contribute to research, analysis, testing, and implementation of new features.
4. Maintain documentation and support project tracking tools for the project you are assigned to.                "
Biochar Trainee,"
                            2dot0 Farms (2dot0 Agritech Private Limited)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 12,000 lump sum","
                1. Initial study and research on the chosen topic. 
2. Draft a 2-month action plan to execute the internship project.
3. Careful documentation.                "
Devops Engineer,"
                            DharmaIQ                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 50,000 - 1,00,000 /month","
                We are seeking a dynamic DevOps Engineer intern to join our team at DharmaIQ. If you have a passion for technology and a strong understanding of Kubernetes, Amazon RDS, Amazon Route 53, Terraform, and AWS, then this is the perfect opportunity for you to gain hands-on experience and make a real impact on our projects.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with the development team to design, build, and deploy scalable and reliable infrastructure in AWS.
2. Implement and manage Kubernetes clusters to ensure optimal performance and availability of our applications.
3. Work on automation tasks using Terraform to streamline our deployment processes and improve efficiency.
4. Monitor and troubleshoot issues related to Amazon RDS databases and Amazon Route 53 DNS services.
5. Assist in implementing cloud security best practices to protect our infrastructure and data.
6. Participate in planning and executing disaster recovery and backup strategies for our systems.
7. Stay updated on the latest trends and technologies in DevOps and make recommendations for continuous improvement. 

If you are ready to take on this exciting challenge and grow your skills in a fast-paced environment, apply now to join our team at DharmaIQ!                "
Android App Development,"
                            DharmaIQ                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 50,000 - 1,00,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Work on integrating Kotlin Multiplatform shared modules with the Android app.
2. Implement and maintain Android-specific UI and platform features using Jetpack Compose and Android SDK.
3. Write Kotlin code for ViewModels, repositories, and data layers that interact with the shared KMP logic.
4. Understand the shared KMP architecture, including common code (shared logic, networking, data models, etc.) and platform-specific implementations.
5. Collaborate with the core team to debug build issues, sync Gradle configurations, and maintain dependency consistency between Android and shared modules.
6. Contribute to improving build times, modularization, and project structure.                "
Research,"
                            Matsolvion Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Assisting in simulating and modeling advanced composite and hybrid materials using ANSYS and Python.
2. Supporting experimental data analysis, report drafting, and documentation in LaTeX.
3. Performing literature surveys and preparing research notes related to materials behavior and characterization.
4. Collaborating with senior researchers on ongoing defense and aerospace material projects.
5. Preparing technical presentations and contributing to internal R&D discussions.                "
Electric Vehicle,"
                            APEX ENGINEERING                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 22,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about Electric Vehicle Technology and eager to gain hands-on experience in the field? Look no further! We are seeking a dynamic Electric Vehicle - EV Intern to join our innovative team. As an intern with us, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects related to Electrical Machines, Battery Management Systems, Power Electronics, Control systems, Circuit Design, and CAD. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in the development and testing of Electric Vehicle components
2. Collaborate with the engineering team to design and optimize EV systems
3. Conduct research on emerging technologies in the EV industry
4. Support in troubleshooting and resolving technical issues related to EVs
5. Create detailed reports and documentation for EV projects
6. Participate in meetings and presentations to share project updates
7. Gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced and collaborative work environment. 

If you are a motivated individual with a strong background in Electric Vehicle Technology, we want to hear from you! Apply now to kickstart your career in the exciting world of electric vehicles.                "
Backend Engineering,"
                            Zoop Live                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 40,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

Months 1-2: Onboarding & Foundation:
1. Get familiar with our microservice's architecture (Node.js, Python)
2. Understand our database design patterns and data flows
3. Start contributing to smaller features and bug fixes
4. Participate in code reviews and learn our development practices
5. Work closely with senior engineers on foundational technical concepts

Months 3-4: Ownership & Impact
1. Take ownership of complete features across one or more microservices
2. Design and implement database schemas for new features
3. Optimize existing APIs for performance and scalability
4. Collaborate with frontend and product teams on feature delivery
5. Begin exploring Gen AI integrations and AI-powered features

Months 5-6: Advanced Contributions
1. Lead technical implementation of medium-to-large features
2. Contribute to architectural decisions and system design discussions
3. Build and integrate Gen AI capabilities into our platform
4. Mentor newer team members or interns
5. Evaluate PPO based on performance and mutual fit

Nice-to-Have

1. Experience with microservices architecture
2. Familiarity with RESTful API design
3. Understanding of system design principles
4. Exposure to AI/ML or Gen AI technologies
5. Strong inclination to work on Gen AI applications
6. Previous internship or project experience in backend development
7. Contributions to open-source projects                "
Devops Engineer,"
                            Techdome Solutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 18,000 /month","
                1. Understanding customer requirements and project KPIs
2. Implementing various development, testing, automation tools, and IT infrastructure
3. Planning the team structure, activities, and involvement in project management activities
4. Managing stakeholders and external interfaces
5. Setting up tools and required infrastructure
6. Defining and setting development, test, release, update, and support processes for DevOps operation
7. Troubleshooting techniques and fixing the code bugs                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Grivaa Consultancy Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                Are you a WordPress whiz with a passion for SEO? Grivaa Capital is seeking a talented WordPress Development intern to join our dynamic team! As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain hands-on experience in website development and optimization. 



1. Collaborating with our team to design and develop custom WordPress websites  
2. Implementing SEO best practices to improve website visibility and ranking  
3. Troubleshooting and resolving any technical issues that may arise  
4. Assisting in content creation and optimization for maximum impact  
5. Staying updated on the latest trends and technologies in WordPress and SEO  
6. Supporting in website maintenance and updates  
7. Contributing creative ideas to enhance user experience and drive engagement

If you are a self-motivated individual with a keen eye for detail and a strong desire to learn and grow, this internship is perfect for you! Join us at Grivaa Capital and take your WordPress skills to the next level. Apply now and kickstart your career in web development and SEO!                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            Comcare Enterprises                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,001 - 5,000 /month","
                1. Demonstrate working knowledge of React Native, which is a must.
2. Apply knowledge of Firebase, Firestore, and related technologies.
3. Exhibit strong research and problem-solving skills.
4. Participate in brainstorming sessions with senior team members.                "
CAD Design,"
                            OPTRENEX INTERNATIONAL PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                As a CAD Design intern at Optrenex International Private Limited, you will have the opportunity to work with industry-leading software such as AutoCAD, SolidWorks, Catia, Autodesk 3ds Max, Rhino, and Autodesk Fusion 360. 

1. Collaborate with our design team to create 2D and 3D models for new products and prototypes.
2. Assist in the development and implementation of design concepts and solutions.
3. Conduct research and analysis to support the design process.
4. Participate in design reviews and provide feedback for continuous improvement.
5. Work closely with engineers to ensure designs meet technical requirements and specifications.
6. Help maintain CAD files and documentation for projects.
7. Stay up-to-date on industry trends and best practices to enhance your skills and contribute to our team's success. 

If you are a motivated and creative individual looking to gain hands-on experience in CAD design, this internship is the perfect opportunity for you. Join us at Optrenex International Private Limited and take your design skills to the next level!                "
Innovation Project,"
                            STEMpedia                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Design and develop interactive 3D and XR projects with PictoBlox tools
2. Implement logic and interactivity using basic coding (block-based and/or Python)
3. Test, refine, and optimize projects based on iterative feedback
4. Document workflows, design decisions, and technical implementations
5. Present project progress and final demos to the team                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            Material Intelligence Lab                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Working hands-on of scientific instruments, instrument assembly, prototype device development, product assembly & quality control. 
2. Executing laboratory testing according to standard procedures
3. Learning about lab equipment and assisting in the periodic maintenance and quality checks                "
CAD Design,"
                            Tech Analogy                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                - Design, develop, and modify 3D mechanical components, assemblies, and systems using CAD software (SolidWorks, CATIA, or Autodesk Inventor).
- Generate manufacturing drawings, GD&T annotations, and detailed documentation as per engineering standards.
- Develop and optimize CAM toolpaths for CNC milling, turning, and cutting operations.
- Create and simulate G-code and machining strategies to ensure precision, tool life, and material efficiency.
- Collaborate with design, production, and quality teams to ensure manufacturability and cost-effectiveness of components.
- Conduct finite element analysis (FEA) or simulation for stress, deformation, and thermal properties to validate designs.
- Review and modify existing designs for continuous improvement, weight reduction, and assembly simplification.
- Develop standard operating procedures (SOPs) and maintain design databases for revision control and documentation.
- Work closely with CNC operators to troubleshoot machining issues and optimize production parameters.
- Ensure compliance with ISO, ASME, or BIS standards and contribute to DFM (Design for Manufacturing) and DFA (Design for Assembly) reviews.                "
Android App Development,"
                            Sameer Khatri                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 4,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain responsive web and mobile applications (React / Flutter / Next.js / Node.js preferred).
2. Collaborate with UI/UX designers to translate prototypes into functional code.
3. Integrate AI APIs and backend systems for real-time student interactions.
4. Optimize applications for maximum speed, scalability, and performance.
5. Test, debug, and deploy updates on staging and production environments.
6. Work with cross-functional teams (design, product, and AI research) to enhance user experience.                "
Systems Implementation,"
                            Acron Polymer Products                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 18,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Create and manage project plans for 5S and ISO 9001 implementation.
2. Coordinate with internal teams to organize workspaces and set up logical systems.
3. Document Standard Operating Procedures (SOPs) and ensure compliance.
4. Assist in internal audits, system checks, and corrective actions.
5. Support the creation of visual management tools and tracking systems.
6. Monitor the effectiveness of implemented systems and ensure their sustainability.
7. Contribute to continuous improvement initiatives across departments.                "
Production Control & Quality Control,"
                            Uboard India Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                We are seeking a detail-oriented and proactive Production Control & Quality Control Intern to join our team. This role offers hands-on experience in managing production processes, monitoring quality standards, and supporting operational efficiency. As an intern, you will work closely with the production and QC teams to ensure smooth workflow management, defect prevention, and process optimization. This internship is an excellent opportunity for engineering students or fresh graduates to gain practical exposure to real-world manufacturing and quality systems in a dynamic environment.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in tracking production schedules, workflow, and inventory movements.
2. Monitor and report quality checkpoints during production and final inspection.
3. Perform random sampling and assist in testing and inspection procedures.
4. Support in preparing and maintaining quality reports and documentation.
5. Coordinate with production and quality teams to address operational issues.
6. Contribute to process improvement initiatives for higher efficiency and reduced  errors.
7. Ensure compliance with safety, quality, and operational protocols on the shop floor.                "
Automation Expert,"
                            Entrepreneur Growth Lab (OPC) Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 18,000 /month","
                This extensive internship role as an Automation Expert at Entrepreneur Growth Lab (OPC) Private Limited offers a significant opportunity to engage with cutting-edge projects specifically designed to fuel both internal growth and client-side innovation. The successful candidate will assume a primary role in the development and deployment of no-code automation solutions, requiring the practical application of various technical proficiencies, including JavaScript, proficiency with integrating diverse APIs and RESTful services, database skills centered on Firebase for real-time management, and familiarity with the Google Workspace environment. This position is fundamentally a test of one's problem-solving abilities, challenging the intern to meticulously tackle complex business hurdles by designing and executing comprehensive automation strategies that directly contribute to achieving business success.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Develop end-to-end automation solutions — Lead the design, development, and deployment of robust no-code automation workflows aimed at significantly enhancing operational efficiency for both the company and its clients.
2. Apply custom scripting — Utilize JavaScript to create tailored scripts that enable complex or specialized automation tasks beyond the capabilities of standard no-code platforms.
3. Design and execute API integrations — Build seamless connections between various business systems using APIs and REST protocols to ensure accurate, real-time data synchronization.
4. Manage databases and data operations — Use Firebase for real-time database management, secure data storage, and optimized system performance to support automation needs.
5. Optimize workflows and strategies — Implement advanced automation strategies to refine existing processes, maximize productivity, and drive measurable efficiency improvements.
6. Conduct performance analysis and reporting — Develop comprehensive reports evaluating automation performance metrics and their impact on business effectiveness.
7. Collaborate and innovate — Work closely with cross-functional teams to foster a culture of innovation, continuous improvement, and technology-driven growth.                "
Embedded Systems,"
                            TOOTHROCKET                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Develop and implement embedded systems solutions using ESP32 programming.
2. Assist in soldering components onto printed circuit boards (PCBs) following best practices.
3. Collaborate with the team to design and prototype PCBs for various projects.
4. Troubleshoot and debug embedded systems to ensure functionality and performance.
5. Participate in testing and quality assurance processes to validate system integrity.

Note: This job description is intended to convey information essential to understanding the scope of the intern position. Specific duties and responsibilities may vary based on project requirements and organizational needs.

Benefits:

1. Hands-on experience in embedded systems development.
2. Mentorship from experienced professionals in the field.
3. Opportunity to work on cutting-edge technology projects.
4. Potential for future full-time employment based on performance.                "
Embedded Systems,"
                            Hardcarb Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Working on circuits and PCB design
2. Working on embedded system programming and testing
2. Assisting in developing project manuals, electrical drawings etc                "
Ansys & SolidWorks Design,"
                            Newrup Tech Solutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Designing and developing mechanical systems and products using Ansys and SolidWorks.
2. Simulating designs in Ansys and SolidWorks.
3. Hands-on experience with various machining processes.
4. Researching and reverse-engineering different mechanical products.
Conducting product testing and field trials in rural locations to gather user feedback and performance data.
5. Carrying out customer surveys—especially targeting rural women—to understand their needs, preferences, and usability requirements, and modifying products based on customer feedback.
6. Supporting manufacturing operations by coordinating product requirements, quality checks, and process improvements.                "
PHP Development,"
                            Inorbvict Healthcare India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Assist in developing and testing WMS & Shipment 360 modules for our ERP/CRM platform.
2. Support in building APIs and microservices for shipment tracking, warehouse automation, and logistics integrations.
3. Collaborate with the QA and project management teams to ensure smooth functionality of modules.
4. Participate in bug fixing, debugging, and workflow documentation.
5. Learn to implement automation in shipment tracking, order fulfillment, and warehouse operations.
6. Gain exposure to global trade compliance, embargo checks, and logistics validation processes.                "
Site Engineering (Civil),"
                            Brilliant Approach Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Site supervision and reporting
2. Support in estimation and quantity take-offs
3. Assist in project documentation and drawings
4. Coordination with vendors and contractors                "
Mechanical and Automobile Engineering for Manuals Review,"
                            Lingo Chaps Translation Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Review of Operation Manuals/Workshop manuals that have been translated from English to Different European Languages.
2. Coordinate with the Translators/Editors/Reporting manager on the observations
3. Understand the requirements                "
Mobile App Testing,"
                            GNZY Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about mobile app testing and eager to gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced tech company? GNZY Technologies is seeking a dynamic Mobile App Testing intern to join our innovative team. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Conduct thorough testing of mobile applications to ensure functionality and usability.
2. Implement and execute software testing strategies and test plans.
3. Utilise test automation tools to streamline testing processes.
4. Track and document bugs using Bugzilla or similar bug tracking systems.
5. Familiarity with REST API testing to ensure seamless integration with backend systems.
6. Collaborate with developers and the QA team to troubleshoot and resolve issues.
7. Demonstrate strong communication skills to convey testing results and recommendations effectively.

If you are a detail-oriented individual with a strong background in software testing and a desire to learn and grow in the tech industry, apply now to be part of our dynamic team at GNZY Technologies. You’ll play a critical role in ensuring the app performs flawlessly. Be ready to catch what others might miss.                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            Brilliant Approach Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Assist in preparing and modifying MEPF system designs using AutoCAD or similar CAD tools
2. Support in project scheduling and coordination between teams (mechanical, electrical, plumbing)
3. Help track procurement of materials and assist with vendor communications
4. Monitor installation progress on-site and ensure quality standards are met
5. Assist in testing, commissioning, and preparing project documentation for handover
6. Participate in post-project reviews and provide feedback for process improvement                "
Backend Development,"
                            Digite Infotech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                Digite, founded in 2002, is a leading provider of AI/ML collaborative enterprise software and solutions. Over a million users use Digite products worldwide. We dive deep into how different environmental factors affect crop growth and yield. We have spent over the last 3 years in R&D, developing technology and processes in collaboration with ICAR institutions and top US universities, and are now on the verge of launching our solutions in the market this year.

Key Responsibilities:
1. Proficient in writing applications in Python, and working with Django Framework and FAST API framework.
2. Basic understanding of NoSQL Databases such as MongoDB.
3. Proficient with RESTful architectural style.
4. Knowledge of implementing the Python library.

What you will do:
1. Work on a disruptive product that is still in its early stages.
2. Design/develop/support new/existing applications, and perform unit and integration testing.
3. Work with the team to integrate user-facing elements with server-side logic.
4. Troubleshoot and debug applications and cloud services.
5. Build reusable code and libraries for future development.                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Inorbvict Healthcare India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,999 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Design and develop responsive WordPress websites with modern UI/UX.
2. Customize themes, plugins, and templates to match branding and client requirements.
3. Implement interactive and animated elements using plugins or visual builders.
4. Convert Figma designs into responsive WordPress websites.
5. Collaborate with design and content teams to ensure seamless website execution.
6. Optimize websites for performance, SEO, and responsiveness.
7. Provide technical support and maintenance for existing websites.                "
Product Management,"
                            Partsformachines                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 11,000 - 11,001 /month","
                1. Conduct research on current and emerging market trends to identify opportunities and risks.
2. Analyse competitor pricing strategies and evaluate their impact on market positioning.
3. Develop and recommend effective pricing models to drive revenue growth and profitability.
4. Assess product performance in relation to market demand and customer needs.
5. Optimise product offerings by identifying gaps, enhancements, or new opportunities.
6. Provide data-driven insights to support strategic decision-making and business planning                "
Backend Development,"
                            Digite Infotech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                Digite, founded in 2002, is a leading provider of AI/ML collaborative enterprise software and solutions. Over a million users use Digite products worldwide. We dive deep into how different environmental factors affect crop growth and yield. We have spent over the last 3 years in R&D, developing technology and processes in collaboration with ICAR institutions and top US universities, and are now on the verge of launching our solutions in the market this year.

Key Responsibilities:
1. Proficient in writing applications in Python, and working with Django Framework and FAST API framework.
2. Basic understanding of NoSQL Databases such as MongoDB.
3. Proficient with RESTful architectural style.
4. Knowledge of implementing the Python library.

What you will do:
1. Work on a disruptive product that is still in its early stages.
2. Design/develop/support new/existing applications, and perform unit and integration testing.
3. Work with the team to integrate user-facing elements with server-side logic.
4. Troubleshoot and debug applications and cloud services.
5. Build reusable code and libraries for future development.                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Inorbvict Healthcare India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,999 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Design and develop responsive WordPress websites with modern UI/UX.
2. Customize themes, plugins, and templates to match branding and client requirements.
3. Implement interactive and animated elements using plugins or visual builders.
4. Convert Figma designs into responsive WordPress websites.
5. Collaborate with design and content teams to ensure seamless website execution.
6. Optimize websites for performance, SEO, and responsiveness.
7. Provide technical support and maintenance for existing websites.                "
Product Management,"
                            Partsformachines                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 11,000 - 11,001 /month","
                1. Conduct research on current and emerging market trends to identify opportunities and risks.
2. Analyse competitor pricing strategies and evaluate their impact on market positioning.
3. Develop and recommend effective pricing models to drive revenue growth and profitability.
4. Assess product performance in relation to market demand and customer needs.
5. Optimise product offerings by identifying gaps, enhancements, or new opportunities.
6. Provide data-driven insights to support strategic decision-making and business planning                "
Quality Control,"
                            Arcatron Mobility Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                1. Conduct thorough inspections of incoming materials and components to ensure they meet quality standards before production.
2. Assist in developing and implementing quality control procedures and guidelines to improve overall product quality.
3. Conduct product testing and analysis to identify any defects or issues that may affect performance.
4. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to address quality concerns and implement corrective actions.
5. Maintain accurate documentation and records of quality control tests and results for future reference.
6. Provide support in resolving customer complaints related to product quality and performance.
7. Continuously strive to enhance quality control processes and procedures to optimize efficiency and effectiveness.                "
AI/ML Python,"
                            Tellis Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Develop and implement AI/ML algorithms to enhance the salon management platform
2. Analyze data and contribute to AI model development and improvement
3. Work on data visualization and present findings effectively
4. Collaborate with the tech team for the integration and deployment of AI/ML solutions
5. Contribute to the creation and fine-tuning of AI agents, Agentic RAGs, and LangChain models                "
Engineering,"
                            Quick Clean Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Collect machine details, including nameplate information and photographs, from Laundry Managers.
2. Update and correct data in the Cryotos database to ensure accuracy.
3. Verify machine records, ensure compliance, and report progress regularly.
4. Assist in warehouse management, including item organization and documentation of incoming/outgoing stock.
5. Support spare parts dispatch by preparing and maintaining accurate dispatch records.
6. Conduct regular cross-checks of dispatch and warehouse records to minimize errors.                "
Furniture Design And Visual Merchandising,"
                            Home Canvas                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Designing, documenting, and delivering.
2. Supporting the team in creating furniture and lighting designs including sketching for concept development.
3. Working on modeling and rendering.
4. Creating presentations & technical drawings.
6. Visual Merchandising
7. Store Experience Design                "
Interior Design,"
                            EROEI Tech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Create 2D drawings, 3D models, and renders for interior projects.
2. Develop mood boards and visual concepts to communicate design ideas.
3. Collaborate with the sales and project teams to understand client requirements.
4. Deliver high-quality designs within short timelines while maintaining accuracy.
5. Assist in preparing presentations and design proposals for clients.
6. Support the team in design revisions, project documentation, and detailing.                "
Quant Developer,"
                            QuantGlobal                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                Selected Intern’s Day-to-Day Responsibilities:

1. Develop and implement quantitative trading strategies in Python, in collaboration with the trading team.
2. Optimize existing code to improve execution speed and reduce latency.
3. Perform initial testing and validation of developed trading programs.
4. Analyze the performance and behavior of various trading strategies under different market scenarios.                "
Advance Battery Chemistry Lab Executive,"
                            ARKLE ENERGY SOLUTIONS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 17,000 - 22,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Handling and working with chemicals safely in the laboratory
2. Applying laboratory techniques for experiments and testing
3. Documenting and maintaining accurate records of experimental results
4. Collaborating with state-of-the-art battery research professionals and scientists                "
React Native Development,"
                            Opebo Industries Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 7,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about mobile app development and looking for an exciting opportunity to kickstart your career? Join us at Opebo Industries Limited as a React Native Development intern! 

Key responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our team of experienced developers to design and implement innovative mobile applications using React Native.
2. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging code to ensure smooth functionality and user experience.
3. Stay updated on the latest trends and technologies in mobile app development to enhance our products.
4. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve overall code quality.
5. Work closely with designers and product managers to bring creative ideas to life through efficient and effective coding.
6. Conduct research and experiments to optimize app performance and user engagement.
7. Learn and grow as a developer by taking on new challenges and expanding your skill set.

If you are a motivated and enthusiastic individual with a strong passion for mobile app development, apply now and take the first step towards becoming a successful React Native developer with Opebo Industries Limited!                "
3D Artist,"
                            Monkhub                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Create high-quality 3D models, textures, and animations for various projects.
2. Assist in developing visual concepts and bringing ideas to life.
3. Collaborate with team members to meet project requirements and deadlines.
4. Optimize 3D assets for performance without compromising quality.
5. Stay updated with the latest trends, tools, and techniques in 3D design.                "
Web Development,"
                            Starbuzz Digimark                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Designing and developing professional-looking websites and landing pages using platforms like Swipe Pages, Elementor, and other website builders, primarily focusing on Elementor.
2. Optimising website and landing page elements for maximum user engagement and conversion rates.
3. Ensuring website and landing page designs are mobile-responsive and accessible for all users.
4. Collaborating with our automation expert to integrate the websites and landing pages with email marketing, CRM, and other third-party tools.
5. Providing ongoing maintenance, updates, and enhancements to existing websites and landing pages to ensure optimal performance.
6. Collaborating with the marketing team to develop effective web and landing page strategies that align with business goals.
7. Troubleshooting and resolving any technical issues that arise to ensure smooth functionality.                "
Android App Development,"
                            Practice Buzz                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 50,000 /month","
                We have been a successful company for the past 17 years, delivering impactful digital solutions. Now, we are expanding into an exciting new division focused on Artificial Intelligence, with a bold vision to transform the sports industry using AI and computer vision. We are currently looking for a talented and motivated Android App Developer Intern to join our team and contribute to the development of our next-generation sports AI applications. As an Android App Developer Intern, you will be responsible for designing, developing, and maintaining high-performance, user-friendly mobile applications using Kotlin and Jetpack Compose. You will play a crucial role in integrating computer vision libraries and algorithms into our apps, ensuring seamless and accurate analysis of sports techniques. You will also collaborate with our backend team to ensure smooth data flow and API integration.

 

1. Design, develop, and maintain Android apps using Kotlin and Jetpack Compose.
2. Integrate computer vision libraries (OpenCV, MediaPipe, etc.) for real-time sports technique analysis.
3. Work closely with the AI team to implement deep learning models and real-time feedback mechanisms.
4. Build smooth, intuitive, and visually appealing UI/UX for athletes and coaches.
5. Collaborate with the backend team for seamless API integration and data flow.
6. Conduct thorough testing, profiling, and debugging to ensure app performance and stability.
7. Troubleshoot and resolve application issues promptly.
8. Contribute to internal tools and lightweight backend functionality for development needs.

What You’ll Gain: 

1. Work on real-world computer vision challenges in sports.
2. Learn to build production-level Android apps that use AI for real-time insights.
3. Collaborate with a passionate, fast-moving team of developers, designers, and AI researchers.
4. Make a meaningful impact on athletes and the future of sports technology.                "
Chemical Engineering,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                Assist in monitoring chemical processes to ensure optimal operation and efficiency.

Collect and analyze data from process equipment and experiments.

Conduct experiments related to chemical reactions, material properties, and process optimization under supervision.

Prepare samples, run tests, and record observations carefully.

Analyze experimental and operational data using statistical tools.

Prepare detailed reports documenting findings, process improvements, or deviations.                "
Automation And Business Operations,"
                            PaySprint Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Build, test, and optimize automation workflows using n8n/Make.com  
2. Contribute to internal app development using Appsmith 
3. Monitor and debug active automations to ensure smooth operations 
4. Document processes and create clear, repeatable SOPs
5. Run weekly reports and update dashboards for stakeholders 
6. Explore and implement AI-powered task automation with tools like LLMs 
7. Build powerful LLM prompts to get efficient outputs                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            Adhivaha Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                As a Mobile App Development intern at Adhivaha Private Limited, you will have the opportunity to work with a dynamic team and gain hands-on experience in creating cutting-edge mobile applications. With your expertise in Flutter, HTML 5, JavaScript, and Java, you will play a key role in developing innovative solutions that enhance user experience and drive business growth. 

Key responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with the development team to design, develop, and test mobile applications using Flutter framework.
2. Implement UI/UX designs and ensure seamless integration of backend services.
3. Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code in HTML 5, JavaScript, and Java.
4. Troubleshoot and debug issues to optimize app performance and functionality.
5. Stay updated on industry trends and best practices in mobile app development.
6. Participate in code reviews and collaborate with cross-functional teams to meet project deadlines.
7. Contribute to the overall success of the team by actively participating in meetings, brainstorming sessions, and continuous learning opportunities. 

If you are passionate about mobile app development and eager to learn and grow in a fast-paced environment, this internship is the perfect opportunity for you to showcase your skills and make a meaningful impact. Join us at Adhivaha Private Limited and embark on an exciting journey towards innovation and excellence.                "
Civil Engineering,"
                            RoadVision AI Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                We are looking for motivated Civil Engineering interns to join our team as Junior Road Engineers. The role involves supporting AI-driven road survey and analysis projects, contributing to the development of advanced road infrastructure solutions.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collect road survey data using dashcams mounted on survey vehicles.
2. Annotate road datasets and review AI-generated inferences to enhance model accuracy.
3. Assist in road condition surveys, inventory mapping, and safety audits.
4. Apply knowledge of Indian and international road standards and O&M practices in survey and analysis.
5. Support continuous improvement of AI models through accurate and structured data inputs.

Qualifications:

1. Completed/ pursuing final year of B. Tech or M. Tech in Civil Engineering.
2. Familiarity with road design, standards, and maintenance practices.
3. Attention to detail, analytical mindset, and willingness to work on-site.
4. AVailable for long-term roles.                "
Technical (UAV Systems),"
                            Nurture Xcel                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Assist in the development, testing, and maintenance of UAV systems and related applications.
2. Support troubleshooting of technical issues, debugging, and system improvements.
3. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to gather requirements and implement solutions.
4. Contribute to documentation and technical reviews of UAV projects.
5. Stay updated with emerging drone technologies and best practices in UAV design and deployment.                "
Subject Matter Expert (Civil Engineer),"
                            Requin Solutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Prepare documents (MS Word) related to your expertise.
2. Research particular topics.
3. Assist in developing and delivering civil engineering academic projects.
4. Conduct cross-domain research to support interdisciplinary project work.
5. Create technical content for educational materials and student resources.
6. Work on AutoCAD for design and drafting tasks.                "
Content & Communication,"
                            Love And Flour By Pooja                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                As a Content & Communication Intern, you’ll assist in maintaining and updating our online learning platforms and website, ensuring that all workshop information, course descriptions, and communications are accurate, up-to-date, and aligned with the brand voice.
This role is a mix of content writing, digital coordination, and backend management — ideal for someone who enjoys blending creativity with organization and tech.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Write, edit, and update workshop and course descriptions for the website and online portals.
2. Proofread and refine content for clarity, tone, and brand consistency.
3. Manage updates across dashboards (WordPress, Shopify, LMS, CRM, etc.) — including course pages, prices, and enrolment details.
4. Coordinate with the marketing and operations teams to ensure accurate communication across social media, website, and email.
5. Assist in setting up and managing email campaigns (Mailchimp or equivalent).
6. Maintain consistency of messaging across all customer touchpoints.
7. Track website-based enrolments and assist in building automated communication workflows.
8. Support with backend blog updates, FAQs, and resources.                "
Research And Development,"
                            Aliste Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 5,000 /month","
                About Aliste Technologies

Aliste Technologies is a cutting-edge technology company focused on developing innovative smart home and IoT solutions. Our mission is to create intelligent, user-centric products that simplify everyday living through automation and connectivity. Join us to be part of a passionate team driving real-world innovation.

Role Overview

We are seeking a Research and Development Intern to support the design, prototyping, and testing of embedded systems and IoT-based products. You will work closely with our technical team in a remote environment, gaining hands-on experience in hardware-software integration, debugging, and rapid prototyping.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in the design, development, and testing of embedded systems and IoT prototypes
2. Support in coding, debugging, and basic hardware integration tasks
3. Research and propose creative solutions to technical challenges
4. Collaborate effectively with mentors and team members in a remote work setup
5. Document project progress, findings, and technical implementation details
6. Contribute innovative ideas during brainstorming sessions and help transform them into working prototypes

Learning & Growth Opportunities

1. Gain hands-on experience in embedded systems, IoT product development, and hardware-software integration
2. Improve practical skills in PCB design, microcontroller programming, and prototyping
3. Work in a real-world R&D environment, becoming industry-ready with transferable technical skills
4. Experience effective remote collaboration and project execution under guidance from experienced mentors

Required Skills & Knowledge

1. Basic understanding of Embedded Systems and IoT concepts
2. Hands-on knowledge of Arduino and microcontroller programming (C language preferred)
3. Familiarity with PCB Design Tools (e.g., Eagle, KiCad, EasyEDA)
4. Problem-solving mindset and willingness to learn new technologies
5. Good written and verbal communication skills
6. Ability to manage time and deliver tasks within set deadlines                "
Junior Engineer - Vendor Development,"
                            Boatload Minds                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 17,000 /month","
                1. Assist in identifying and evaluating potential vendors based on company requirements. 
2. Support the onboarding process of new vendors under senior guidance.
3. Coordinate with vendors for quotations, samples, and basic documentation.
4. Maintain and update vendor databases and records.
5. Assist in monitoring vendor performance and escalating issues to senior team members. 
6. Collaborate with internal teams to ensure the timely procurement and delivery of materials. 
7. Learn and support vendor negotiation, contract handling, and cost analysis activities.
8. Stay updated with basic industry trends, materials, and vendor practices                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Honest Designs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 17,000 /month","
                1. Handling WordPress page designs using page builders (Elementor, WPBakery, Divi, etc.).
2. Working on the content management system for WordPress.
3. Working on CSS, HTML5, and minor optimizations.
4. Working of automation tools like Zapier, n8n.                "
Python Development,"
                            ConectYu                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 5,001 /month","
                1. Selected candidate should build REST APIs using Flask and Python.
2. They should fix the bugs and issues that we get from day-to-day operations.
3. They need to document their work once a week and follow the instructions given by their superior.                "
Android App Development,"
                            Audify Tech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 25,000 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy individual with a passion for Android app development? Audify Tech Private Limited is seeking a talented Android App Development intern to join our dynamic team. If you have experience with Java, Android, Kotlin, Firebase, REST API, and XML, we want to hear from you!

Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our development team to design and build innovative Android applications
2. Implement new features and enhancements using best practices in app development
3. Perform code reviews and testing to ensure quality and performance of the app
4. Integrate Firebase for real-time data syncing and authentication
5. Utilize REST API to fetch data from server and update app content
6. Work on XML layout design for an intuitive user experience
7. Stay updated on the latest trends and technologies in Android development to contribute fresh ideas to the team.
8. Good understanding of Android fundamentals – Activities, Fragments, Intents, Services, and more
9. Familiar with Jetpack components (LiveData, ViewModel, Navigation, Room).

⚡️ Bonus Skills (Nice to Have)

Experience with Firebase (Analytics, Firestore, Crashlytics, etc.).
Familiarity with MVVM architecture, Dependency Injection (Hilt/Dagger).
Knowledge of the Play Store release process.
Experience with animations, custom views, or Compose.

Join us and take your Android development skills to the next level at Audify Tech Private Limited!                "
Software Development,"
                            Skillznova Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 /month","
                1. Assist in developing, testing, and maintaining software applications.
2. Write clean, efficient, and well-documented code.
3. Collaborate with team members on projects and tasks.
4. Participate in code reviews and learning sessions.
5. Learn and apply new programming languages and tools.
6. Help troubleshoot and debug software issues.                "
Front End Development,"
                            She Can Foundation                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Are you a budding Front End Development whiz with a passion for making a difference? Join us at She Can Foundation as an HTML-savvy intern and help us empower women and girls through technology! 



1. Collaborate with our team to design and develop user-friendly interfaces for our website 
2. Implement responsive design principles to ensure optimal performance across all devices 
3. Assist in maintaining and updating existing web content 
4. Conduct regular quality assurance checks to ensure site functionality 
5. Stay up-to-date on industry trends and best practices 
6. Help optimize the website for improved SEO 
7. Provide support on various projects to enhance user experience 

If you're ready to gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced, mission-driven environment, apply now and help us amplify the voices of women and girls everywhere!                "
MLOps and AI Infra,"
                            Maybright Ventures Private Limited (mPokket)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 /month","
                1. Support the deployment and maintenance of machine learning models in production.
2. Help automate and streamline data processing, model versioning, and performance tracking.                "
AI Engineer,"
                            Educhess                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Develop and optimize computer vision models for detecting chess moves, pieces, and board states using tools like OpenCV, YOLO, or MediaPipe.
2. Integrate camera feeds with real-time detection pipelines to capture and analyze ongoing chess games.
3. Experiment with model improvements – fine-tuning detection accuracy under varying lighting and camera angles.
4. Assist in building real-time dashboards or analytics tools for displaying player insights and game stats.
5. Contribute to rapid prototyping – test ideas quickly, debug issues, and help scale successful prototypes.
6. Support tournament testing by deploying and monitoring systems at live events.
Document findings and results, contributing to internal research and performance reports.                "
Android App Development,"
                            Traincape Technology                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 5,001 /month","
                As an Android App Development intern at Traincape Technology, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects and gain hands-on experience with React Native, Tailwind CSS, Node.js, MongoDB, Express.js, and Python. You will collaborate with our experienced development team to create innovative mobile applications that meet the needs of our clients. 

Key Responsibilities:

1. Develop and maintain mobile applications using React Native
2. Implement responsive designs using Tailwind CSS
3. Build and manage APIs with Node.js and Express.js
4. Work with MongoDB to store and retrieve data efficiently
5. Collaborate with designers and other developers to bring projects to life
6. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code in Python
7. Stay up-to-date on industry trends and technologies to continually improve your skills and contribute to the success of our team. 

If you are passionate about mobile development and eager to learn, this internship is the perfect opportunity to kickstart your career in app development. Apply now and join our dynamic team at Traincape Technology!                "
WordPress Development,"
                            JethiTech Solutions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 5,000 /month","
                1. Developing Websites in WordPress
2. Designing user interactions on web pages
3. Integration of various 3rd Party API's and Tools
4. Ensuring cross-platform optimization for mobile phones
5. Ensuring responsiveness of applications using best coding practices
6. Seeing through a project from conception to finished product
7. Meeting both technology requirements and client expectations
10. Staying abreast of developments in web applications and programming languages skills Required: HTML5, CSS, JS, Bootstrap, PHP, Restful Services, MySQL                "
Mechanical/Electrical - R&D Prototyping Engineer,"
                            Zentosh Labs Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 24,000 /month","
                We’re looking for a Mechanical/Electrical/Prototyping Engineer who thrives at the intersection of design, technology, and craftsmanship. You’ll work closely with a small, world-class team to bring ideas to life — from concept to prototype to production. If you love hands-on engineering, rapid iteration, and solving hard problems with creativity and precision, this is your playground.



1. Lead rapid prototyping across mechanical and electrical systems
2. Own component selection, schematic capture, prototype bring-up, and debugging
3. Collaborate on hardware bug tracking, functional verification, and signal characterization
4. Work with suppliers and manufacturers to ensure proper production of PCBAs and sub-assemblies
5. Contribute to end-to-end design and manufacturing of plastic, metal, and hybrid components
6. Fabricate prototypes, iterate fast, and push designs toward high-volume production
7. Develop and execute accelerated test plans for lifetime validation
8. Conduct component-level testing for performance, durability, and reliability
9. Create and release detailed 2D drawings and component documentation

Note:

1. You’ll be the bridge between design and production — ensuring every part we ship feels world-class
2. Potential to travel to China to support early production runs and supplier ramp-up                "
Interior Design,"
                            Kinjal Doshi                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Design Development: Assisting senior designers with concept creation, mood boards, and material selection.
2. Drawings & Presentations: Preparing layouts, 2D/3D plans, and presentation boards using AutoCAD, SketchUp, or similar software.
3. Site Visits & Measurements: Conducting site visits for measurements, progress tracking, and understanding on-site work.                "
AI Agent Development,"
                            Agntworks LLC                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Writing production-grade Python code to support backend services, document parsers, and agent workflows.
2. Building and testing AI pipelines in Python using OpenAI APIs (or similar), LangChain (or similar), and structured parsing of PDFs, emails, and JSON.
3. Debugging and improving/refactoring existing Python modules.
4. Building the front end using HTML/JS/Tailwind CSS frameworks to visualize AI agent outputs.
5. Working directly with the founding engineer in weekly sprints - fast build → test → deploy → iterate cycles.                "
Digital Marketing Trainee,"
                            Challenging Coder                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,001 - 10,000 /month","
                Are you a digital marketing enthusiast looking to jumpstart your career in the tech industry? Look no further! Challenging Coder is seeking a dynamic Digital Marketing Trainee intern to join our team. As a key player in our marketing department, you will have the opportunity to hone your skills in digital marketing, SEO, content writing, Canva, and WordPress.



1. Assist in developing and implementing digital marketing strategies to drive online traffic and engagement.
2. Optimize website content for SEO to improve search engine rankings.
3. Create engaging and SEO-friendly content for blog posts, social media, and email campaigns.
4. Design eye-catching graphics and visuals using Canva to enhance our online presence.
5. Maintain and update the WordPress website to ensure a seamless user experience.
6. Analyze and report on digital marketing metrics to track performance and ROI.
7. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to support marketing initiatives and projects.

If you are a self-motivated individual with a passion for digital marketing and a desire to learn and grow, we want to hear from you! Join us at Challenging Coder and take your first step towards a successful career in the digital marketing industry.                "
Industrial And Production Engineering,"
                            Ekta Casting                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Data collection:
a. Collecting data from production lines, quality assurance inspections, and other relevant sources.
b. Assisting in the use of data collection tools and equipment.

2. Data recording:
a. Accurately recording and entering data into spreadsheets (MS-Excel/Google Sheets) or our database system.
b. Maintaining organized and up-to-date data records.

3. Quality control:
a. Performing routine quality checks and visual inspections on products at various stages of production.
b. Documenting and reporting any defects, inconsistencies, or non-conformance issues.
c. Assisting with the documentation of inspection results.

4. Reporting:
a. Assisting with basic data analysis to identify trends and quality issues.
b. Helping prepare summary reports on production and quality metrics for the management team.

5. Process improvement:
a. Collaborating with team members to identify areas for process improvement based on collected data.
b. Contributing to root cause analysis for recurring quality problems.                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Craact Technologies OPC Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                Are you a talented WordPress Development intern with a passion for creating stunning websites? Craact Technologies OPC Private Limited is seeking a dynamic individual like you to join our team! As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects, enhance your skills, and gain valuable experience in the field. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Develop and customize WordPress themes and plugins using PHP, HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
2. Optimize websites for speed, performance, and user experience.
3. Implement SEO best practices to enhance website visibility and ranking.
4. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure smooth website functionality.
5. Collaborate with the design and marketing teams to create visually appealing and engaging websites.
6. Stay up-to-date with the latest trends and technologies in web development.
7. Assist in the deployment and maintenance of websites to ensure smooth operations. 

If you are eager to learn and grow in a fast-paced environment, apply now to kickstart your career in WordPress development with Craact Technologies OPC Private Limited!                "
Cloud Computing,"
                            Seth Sons                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,500 - 9,500 /month","
                1. Coaching and preparing the demo projects in the test environment
2. Able to give training on the Azure platform
3. Ability to train on Power Apps, Power BI, SQL, GitHub, 
4. ability to give training on data science-related topics                "
Information Technology,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Assisting with troubleshooting hardware and software issues.
2. Providing helpdesk support to staff (e.g., password resets, software installations).
3. Setting up new computers, workstations, and peripheral devices (printers, scanners, etc.).
4. Supporting network and internet connectivity issues.                "
Manual Testing,"
                            Employee Forums                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Execute manual test cases for web and mobile applications.
Identify, document, and track defects using issue-tracking tools (e.g., Jira, Trello).
Perform functional, regression, and UI testing.
Understand business requirements and translate them into test scenarios.
Collaborate with developers to reproduce issues and validate fixes.
Contribute to creating and maintaining test documentation.
Participate in daily stand-ups and QA review meetings.                "
Front End Development,"
                            Growdea Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Developing the web-service form of our flagship platform, Analogue, ensuring seamless user experience and functionality.                "
Mobile App & Web Development,"
                            Pioneer Sam Energia                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 3,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities will include any of these: 

1. Developing mobile applications for the company's services
2. Working on website development from static to dynamic including payment get-ways
3. Promoting social media for the company's services                "
Chemical Engineering & Biotechnology,"
                            Mpower Urja                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 2,500 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities will include any of the following: 

1. Work on Product/Process development in areas of Chemical engineering,  Chemistry, Petroleum, Microbiology, Pharmacy, and Biotechnology.
2. Handle testing & quality control.
3. Work on analytical techniques. 
4. Participate in techno-commercial functions.
5. Coordinate with suppliers and clients.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            IREED Academy India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 25,000 /month","
                1. Assist in the design, development, and maintenance of web applications using modern frameworks and technologies.
2. Work on both front-end (React, Angular, or Vue.js) and back-end (Node.js, Express, Python, or Java) development.
3. Integrate APIs and databases (MySQL, MongoDB, or PostgreSQL) for seamless functionality.
4. Collaborate with UI/UX designers to ensure responsive, user-friendly designs.
5. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code following best practices.
6. Participate in testing, debugging, and performance optimization of applications.
7. Contribute to documentation, code reviews, and version control (Git/GitHub).
8. Stay updated with emerging technologies and suggest improvements for development efficiency.                "
Chemistry & Life Sciences,"
                            Mpower Energy Company Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 2,500 /month","
                1. Working on product and process development.
2. Handling testing and quality control.
3. Working on analytical techniques in chemistry, microbiology, and biotech.
4. Participating in techno-commercial functions.
5. Coordinating with suppliers and clients.                "
Quality Analyst,"
                            Promptick                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about ensuring quality in software development? Are you looking to gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced and dynamic tech company? Look no further than Promptick! As a Quality Analyst Intern, you will have the opportunity to work closely with our development team to test and evaluate our products to ensure they meet the highest standards of quality.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Conducting thorough testing of software applications to identify bugs and issues.
2. Developing and executing test cases and scripts for both manual and automated testing.
3. Collaborating with developers to troubleshoot and resolve issues in a timely manner.
4. Participating in sprint planning and review meetings to provide QA input.
5. Documenting and tracking defects using bug tracking tools.
6. Assisting in creating test plans and strategies for new features and products.
7. Continuously improving testing processes and procedures to enhance overall product quality.

Join our team at Promptick and take the first step towards a successful career in quality assurance! Apply now and be part of a company that values innovation, collaboration, and excellence.                "
React JS Developer,"
                            Regami Solutions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Your primary focus will be on developing user interface components and implementing them following well-known React.js workflows (such as Flux or Redux). You will ensure that these components and the overall application are robust and easy to maintain.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Developing new user-facing features using React.js.
2. Building reusable components and front-end libraries for future use.
3. Translating designs and wireframes into high-quality code.
4. Optimizing components for maximum performance across a vast array of web-capable devices and browsers.                "
Aerospace Engineering,"
                            Asthra Projects Group                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 45,000 /month","
                1. Design RF Circuits. 
2. Test RF Products
3. Simulate RF Products                "
Web Development,"
                            TalentzRush                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Assist in developing and updating websites or web apps using HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
2. Test, debug, and optimize web applications for smooth performance.
3. Collaborate with designers and senior developers to implement features.
4. Integrate APIs and connect the frontend with backend systems.
5. Maintain clean code and update documentation as needed.
6. Learn new tools, frameworks, and best practices while supporting the team.                "
Web Development,"
                            Proffer Media Group (PMG B2B)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Working with PHP and MySQL to design, develop, and debug web applications
2. Integrating back-end services with a PHP/JavaScript-based front-end needs
3. Working with the team to manage, optimise, and customise multiple web applications
4. Creating and maintaining technical documentation                "
Surveyor,"
                            National Civil Service                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,500 - 16,000 /month","
                As a Surveyor intern at our National Civil Service company, you will have the opportunity to gain hands-on experience in the field while utilizing your skills in AutoCAD and VS Code. You will work closely with our experienced surveyors to assist in various projects and contribute to the overall success of the team. 



1. Assist in conducting field surveys and data collection using state-of-the-art equipment.
2. Utilize AutoCAD to create detailed and accurate survey drawings.
3. Collaborate with team members to analyze and interpret survey data.
4. Support the team in preparing reports, maps, and other project deliverables.
5. Use VS Code to write and maintain code for data processing and analysis.
6. Learn and apply industry best practices for surveying and data management.
7. Participate in training sessions and workshops to enhance your skills and knowledge in the field.

If you are a motivated and eager individual looking to kickstart your career in surveying, this internship opportunity is perfect for you. Join our dynamic team and gain valuable experience that will set you up for success in the industry. Apply now and take the first step towards a rewarding career in surveying with our National Civil Service company.                "
3D Product Modeling (Blender),"
                            Mehabooba                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 2,000 /month","
                1. Creating realistic 3D models of mobile phone covers using Blender, following the brand’s design standards.
2. Setting up professional lighting, camera positioning, and rendering scenes suitable for product photoshoots.
3. Collaborating with the design team to create high-quality renders for website and marketing use.
4. Applying materials, textures, and reflections to achieve realistic visuals matching physical products.
5. Maintaining a professional and organized Blender workflow including naming conventions and file management.                "
Website Building,"
                            Kim  Totlani                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 lump sum","
                WordPress Website Migration & Rebuild Assistant

I’m looking for a web-savvy intern who wants to learn more about website building, SEO and design.  I need help to move my existing WordPress website (built with Elementor) to a new hosting provider, transfer the domain, and rebuild the site structure cleanly.



1. Migrating WordPress sites and domains between hosts
2. Building webpages 
3. SEO
4. Managing plugins and DNS updates
5. Troubleshooting small layout or performance issues

I’ll provide the content, design references, and current site access. You’ll handle the tech side to get the new site running smoothly.
This is a short-term project but it could lead to ongoing support work for updates and maintenance.                "
Web Development,"
                            YourTrader Learning Institute                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Design and Develop Website Pages – Build, update, and maintain pages for YourTrader Learning using modern web technologies (HTML, CSS, JavaScript, WordPress, or React).
2. Website Optimization – Ensure fast loading speed, mobile responsiveness, and SEO-friendly structure.
3. UI/UX Improvement – Work on enhancing user interface and overall user experience for better engagement and navigation.
4. Integrate Features – Add and manage new functionalities such as forms, course sections, student dashboards, and inquiry pages.
5. Content & Media Management – Upload course details, images, and blog posts regularly.
6. Bug Fixing & Maintenance – Identify and fix website errors, broken links, and layout issues.
7. Collaborate with Team – Coordinate with the SEO and content team to align web updates with digital marketing goals.                "
PHP Development,"
                            Pranshu Praneta                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Assist in developing and maintaining PHP-based web applications
2. Work with MySQL and REST APIs for backend integration
3. Debug and optimize existing code for performance improvements
4. Collaborate with frontend developers and designers
5. Write clean, reusable, and efficient code
6. Participate in regular team discussions and contribute to new ideas                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Bildungsprofis                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                1. Set up and configure WordPress environments from scratch (hosting, installation, database, and WooCommerce setup).
2. Design and customize pages using Elementor and other modern WordPress builders.
3. Develop and modify custom themes and templates using PHP, HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
4. Manage website performance, SEO optimization, and security updates.
5. Troubleshoot technical issues, fix bugs, and improve site functionality.
6. Collaborate with designers and content teams to ensure high-quality user experiences with ownership.
7. Contribute creative ideas for improving UX, visual appeal, and interactivity.                "
Software Development,"
                            IIT Engineer                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Developing and styling responsive web components using HTML, CSS, and React.
2. Assisting in the integration of front-end UI with basic APIs and data.
3. Collaborating with the team on code reviews and contributing to project sprints.                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            Temperate Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Temperate Technologies is seeking talented mechanical engineering interns to join our team. Your key responsibilities will include:

1. Design, fabricate, and test equipment for material handling of agricultural produce.
2. ⁠Support senior engineers in preparing CAD models, assembly drawings, and BOMs.
3. ⁠Coordinate with the workshop team for prototyping, manufacturing and assembly, and help identify and liaise with vendors.
4. ⁠Ensure accurate documentation of prototype trials and assist in refining designs for production.

We are a small, mission-driven team where you can see your ideas come to life and being implemented in products and solutions that contribute to climate resilience of smallholder farming communities.

You will not only have an opportunity to grow your skills in mechanical engineering but will also learn about communications skills, product design process, and working in teams.

If you are a proactive and enthusiastic individual with a strong foundation in mechanical engineering, we want to hear from you.                "
Engineers For 3D Animation,"
                            Parallel Learning                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 13,000 /month","
                1. Translate storyboards into 3D animations.
2. Create lifelike character movements and expressions.
3. Design and animate 3D environments.
4. Set up and maintain character rigs for animation.
5. Collaborate with team members and incorporate feedback.
6. Meet project deadlines with high-quality animations.                "
Digital Marketing,"
                            Anurag Busi                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,500 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Work on social media marketing on Instagram
2. Work on video editing
3. Work on pre-sales calling and nurturing clients
4. Work on website creation on WordPress
5. Work on Meta ads                "
Software Development,"
                            Oveleno (Jakarta, Indonesia)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 19,000 - 31,000 /month","
                As a Software Development intern at Oveleno, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects and gain valuable experience in a fast-paced tech environment. Your knowledge of Java, .NET, Node.js, C++ Programming, React, MySQL, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Python, Backend development, Frontend development, and Web development will be put to the test as you collaborate with our team of seasoned developers.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Develop and maintain software applications using a variety of programming languages and frameworks.
2. Assist in the design and implementation of both backend and frontend solutions.
3. Collaborate with team members to troubleshoot and debug issues as they arise.
4. Write clean, efficient, and well-documented code that meets project requirements.
5. Research to stay current on the latest technologies and trends in software development.
6. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to peers.
7. Take on additional tasks and projects as needed to support the overall goals of the company.

If you are a motivated and ambitious individual looking to kickstart your career in software development, then Oveleno is the place for you. Apply now and join us on our journey to revolutionize the tech industry.                "
Software Engineering (Devops),"
                            Better                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Set up CI/CD pipelines using GitHub Actions and CircleCI.
2. Automate cloud deployments with Docker and Kubernetes.
3. Monitor application performance with Datadog and Bugsnag.
4. Troubleshoot and optimize deployment workflows.                "
WordPress Development,"
                            HCapital Business Consulting Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Work on a professional and visually appealing WordPress website for our wealth management business. 
2. Make sure that the design has a clean and minimalistic layout, is easy to navigate, and is responsive for both mobile and tablet users.
3. Include these key features to:
a. Chatbot/Live Chat functionality
b. Lead generation forms for callback requests, consultation scheduling, and newsletter subscriptions
c. Integration of email newsletters with Zoho Campaign
d. Lead tracking through CRM integration
e. Basic calculators, specifically a Will Calculator and an Insurance Calculator
f. Blog/Insights section optimized for SEO
g. A homepage that effectively showcases our services and expertise                "
Instrumentation and Control Engineering,"
                            RS Engineers                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Update the online work daily
2. Review and give a weekly in-person update                "
Front End Development,"
                            Jarurat Care                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                1. Develop and maintain the frontend of our healthcare platform using React.
2. Implement responsive, mobile-friendly designs for accessibility across devices.
3. Collaborate with backend developers to integrate APIs for real-time data interaction.
4. Use Git/GitHub for version control, including branch management, pull requests, and code reviews.
5. Optimize frontend performance and ensure cross-browser compatibility.
6. Implement best practices for state management using React Hooks or Redux.
7. Troubleshoot, debug, and resolve frontend issues to improve the user experience.
8. Work with external libraries and perform API integration (fetching & submitting data).                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Digital Guruji                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                1. Developing tools and automations with external API integrations
2. Collaborating with the team to manage, optimize, and customize web applications
3. Building and maintaining both front-end interfaces (HTML, CSS, JavaScript) and back-end services (Node.js) and express handlebars                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            Aslam Enterprises                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                This 6-month Mechanical Engineering Internship is designed to give young engineers a comprehensive learning experience across all core functions of industrial manufacturing - design, production, operations, and on-floor inventory management.

Interns will be rotated across each department at defined intervals, ensuring equal exposure to various aspects of product development, shop floor execution, and process optimization.

This internship serves as a pipeline for Aslam Enterprises’ Graduate Engineer Trainee (GET) program, which grooms high-performing interns into future engineering professionals and team leads.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Assisting the design team in developing, detailing, and improving product designs using CAD software (Fusion 360, SolidWorks, or Creo).
2. Participating in production and assembly activities to understand manufacturing processes, fabrication, and assembly methods.
3. Supporting on-floor inventory management - tracking materials, sub-assemblies, and finished goods in coordination with operations staff.
4. Maintaining daily production documentation, including inspection records, material movement logs, and assembly checklists.
5. Collaborating with cross-functional teams to ensure smooth handover between design, production, and dispatch.
6. Contributing to continuous improvement initiatives on the shop floor by identifying efficiency and quality improvement opportunities.                "
Web Development,"
                            Zdminds                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                We are looking for a motivated Web Development intern to join our team at Zdminds! If you have experience with PHP, MySQL, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, jQuery, WordPress, Bootstrap, Node.js, and React, this is the perfect opportunity for you to gain hands-on experience and expand your skills in a fast-paced environment.

Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with the development team to create and maintain websites and applications.
2. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code using best practices.
3. Assist in troubleshooting and resolving technical issues.
4. Implement and customize plugins and themes for WordPress sites.
5. Optimize websites for speed and performance.
6. Stay updated on the latest web development trends and technologies.
7. Contribute ideas and solutions to improve the overall user experience. 

If you are passionate about web development and eager to learn, apply now to be part of our dynamic team at Zdminds!                "
Python Development,"
                            Treviax.in                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                Are you a Python whiz with a passion for cutting-edge technology? Treviax.in is looking for a talented Python Development intern to join our dynamic team. With your expertise in HTML, CSS, Python, Django, Machine Learning, REST API, and Flask, you'll have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain valuable hands-on experience.

Key Responsibilities:
1. Assist in developing and maintaining web applications using Python and Django framework.
2. Collaborate with the team to implement machine learning algorithms for data analysis and prediction models.
3. Create and integrate REST APIs to enhance the functionality of our applications.
4. Work on front-end development using HTML and CSS to design user-friendly interfaces.
5. Contribute to the development of Flask applications to support various business processes.
6. Participate in code reviews and provide feedback to improve code quality and performance.
7. Stay updated on the latest trends in Python development and contribute innovative ideas to enhance our projects.

If you're eager to expand your skills and make a real impact in a fast-paced environment, apply now to kickstart your career with Treviax.in!                "
Java Development,"
                            Treviax.in                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                Are you a talented Java developer looking to gain real-world experience and elevate your skills to the next level? Treviax.in is seeking a motivated Java Development intern to join our dynamic team. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and collaborate with experienced developers.



1. Develop and maintain Java applications using JSP, J2EE, Hibernate ORM, and Spring MVC.
2. Write efficient and scalable code while adhering to best practices and coding standards.
3. Collaborate with the team to troubleshoot and debug issues in existing applications.
4. Participate in code reviews and provide feedback to improve overall code quality.
5. Assist in designing and implementing database solutions using MySQL.
6. Stay up-to-date on emerging technologies and trends in the Java development community.
7. Contribute ideas and solutions to enhance the overall performance and user experience of our applications.

If you are passionate about Java development and eager to learn in a fast-paced environment, apply now to join our team at Treviax.in!                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Tale Of Tails                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Build and deploy cross-platform mobile applications using Flutter.
2. Collaborate with design and product teams for intuitive user experiences.
3. Integrate APIs, Firebase, push notifications, and in-app features.
4. Optimize performance and troubleshoot bugs.
5. Contribute to scaling India’s first pet parent super app.                "
Web Development,"
                            PRED SOLUTIONS                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 10,000 /month","
                About PRED Solutions

PRED Solutions is a forward-thinking IT and technology solutions firm focused on developing innovative products and digital platforms that bridge the gap between technology and business efficiency.
We specialize in web and mobile development, digital transformation and marketing.
We’re looking for a smart, driven, and tech-savvy intern who’s eager to learn across multiple domains — digital marketing, web development, and customer support — and contribute to real-world projects that make an impact.

Job Responsibilities:
Assist in managing and updating websites using WordPress, HTML/CSS, and related tools.
Support digital marketing activities — content creation, social media management, SEO, and online campaigns.
Use AI tools (like ChatGPT, Claude, and Canva AI) to create content, automate workflows, and improve productivity.
Help manage customer and client interactions, respond to support queries, and ensure a smooth experience.
Coordinate with internal teams on marketing, operations, and product updates.
Perform basic administrative and research tasks to support ongoing projects.

Skills & Qualities We’re Looking For:
Basic knowledge of WordPress, HTML/CSS, and web tools.
Strong interest in digital marketing, AI tools, and customer engagement.
Excellent communication skills (written & verbal).
Good understanding of social media platforms and online branding.
Organized, reliable, and able to multitask efficiently.
Eligibility
Students or recent graduates from any background (Tech, Marketing, or Business preferred).
Must be available for a 3-month internship.
Basic computer proficiency and eagerness to learn new tools.

Perks & Benefits:
Internship Certificate & Letter of Recommendation (based on performance)
Hands-on experience in real-time digital projects
Exposure to client interactions and Administrative operations
Potential for full-time conversion based on performance

Duration: 3 Months
Stipend: 10,000 INR
Job Offer: Based on performance and company requirements

We are offering a 3-month internship with the possibility of a full-time job offer based on performance. This internship will provide hands-on experience and exposure to real projects. Successful candidates may be absorbed into the organization after the internship period.                "
Front End Development,"
                            Supervaisor.AI                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 16,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Assist in developing and maintaining web applications using Next.js and Angular
2. Work on UI/UX implementation and optimize components for performance and responsiveness.
3. Collaborate with backend developers to integrate APIs and fetch data efficiently.
4. Debug and fix UI/UX issues to ensure smooth user experience.
5. Learn and implement best practices in React Hooks, State Management (Redux/Zustand), and Component Lifecycle.
6. Ensure cross-browser compatibility and mobile responsiveness.
7. Participate in code reviews, learning sessions, and team discussions.
8. Stay updated with the latest frontend technologies and trends.                "
Node.js Development,"
                            SUREFY TECHNOLOGIES PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 3,001 /month","
                We are excited to offer an internship opportunity at Surefy Technologies Private Limited for a talented Node.js Development intern. If you are proficient in Express.js, React, REST API, MongoDB, Node.js, JavaScript, HTML, and MySQL, we want to hear from you!

Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our development team to design and implement new features using Node.js and Express.js
2. Develop and maintain RESTful APIs to support our web applications
3. Work with MongoDB to store and retrieve data efficiently
4. Implement user interfaces using React and HTML
5. Ensure the security and scalability of our applications through best practices in coding
6. Assist in troubleshooting and resolving technical issues
7. Stay up-to-date with industry trends and contribute innovative ideas to improve our products

If you are a motivated individual looking to gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced tech environment, apply now to join our dynamic team and make a meaningful impact on our projects!                "
Front End Development,"
                            KIWIS AND BROWNIES IT SOLUTIONS INDIA PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Build and design websites using a block-based internal tool
2. Apply custom styling using CSS
3. Learn and follow best practices in web accessibility
4. Collaborate with the team to turn ideas into live websites
5. Optional: Support in integrating simple Vue.js components (we’ll support you if needed)                 "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Cogn.ai Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 /month","
                Responsibilities:
Design, develop, and maintain web applications using Java and Python
Build and optimize database solutions with MongoDB and MySQL
Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define and implement new features
Ensure application scalability, performance, and security
Write clean, efficient, and well-documented code
Perform code reviews and participate in agile development cycles

Skills & Qualifications:
Proven experience with Java and Python programming languages
Strong knowledge databases like MongoDB and MySQL
Experience with RESTful API development and integration
Familiarity with front-end technologies (HTML, CSS, JavaScript) 
Understanding of microservices architecture and cloud deployment
Excellent problem-solving abilities and communication skills                "
Software Engineering- AI Agent Integration Team,"
                            EmergentLabs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 50,000 /month","
                Large Language Models have limited knowledge beyond their training data — and when introduced to new information, they often produce inconsistent or erroneous outputs. At Emergent Labs, you'll work on solving this core limitation.

As part of the Agent Integration Team, the selected intern(s) will design and generate modular, reusable integration that teaches our AI agents how to autonomously use real-world APIs and systems — from Stripe to OpenAI to Notion.

This is one of the most critical components of the Emergent Agent app creation pipeline, where you'll bridge the gap between static model knowledge and live, rapidly evolving integrations.                "
Backend Development,"
                            Yuja Finserv Technology Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                Yuja Finserv Technology is seeking a highly motivated and talented Flutter Development intern with experience to join our dynamic team. If you have a passion for mobile app development and possess strong skills in Flutter, Firebase, REST API, Algorithms, Android, iOS, and Git, then this opportunity is perfect for you!

Key Responsibilities
1. Assist in developing, testing, and maintaining backend logic for web and mobile applications.
2. Build and optimize RESTful and GraphQL APIs for front-end integration.
3. Work with relational and NoSQL databases for efficient data storage and retrieval.
4. Implement authentication, authorization, and role-based access control systems.
5. Integrate AI/ML-based APIs or models (e.g., OpenAI, AWS AI, Google Vertex AI) into      backend workflows.
6. Collaborate with front-end developers and QA teams to ensure seamless functionality.
7. Contribute to performance tuning, debugging, and optimization of application code.
8. Write clean, reusable, and well-documented code following best practices.
Participate in code reviews, daily stand-ups, and sprint planning meetings.
 
Databases:
1. SQL databases: PostgreSQL, MySQL
2. NoSQL databases: MongoDB, Redis
Tools & Platforms:
1. Version control: Git / GitHub / GitLab
2. API testing: Postman / Insomnia
3. Cloud platforms: AWS / Google Cloud / Azure (basics preferred)
4. Containerization: Docker (understanding preferred)
Other Good-to-Have Skills:
1. Familiarity with message queues (RabbitMQ, Kafka)
2. Basic knowledge of CI/CD pipelines (GitHub Actions, Jenkins)
3. Understanding of serverless functions (AWS Lambda / Cloud Functions)
4. Awareness of security practices and data privacy standards
Educational Background
Currently pursuing or recently completed a Bachelor’s/Master’s in Computer Science, Information Technology, or related field.
Candidates with strong project portfolios or open-source contributions are preferred.


Join us at Yuja Finserv Technology and gain hands-on experience in developing innovative Flutter applications while working in a dynamic and collaborative environment. Apply now to take your career to new heights!                "
2D Game Developer,"
                            Shivnarayan Kamat                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 lump sum","
                Key Responsibilities:

1. Develop a light, fun mobile game based on a two-hand Rock-Paper-Scissors concept
2. Implement simple controls and smooth, light animations inspired by games like Cut the Rope or Duolingo
3. Build three game modes: vs Computer, Local 2-player, and optionally Online
4. Focus on creating bright visuals, playful sound, and easy-to-understand gameplay
5. Develop the game primarily as a mobile app, with optional support for web platforms                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Quantinent Analytics                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                We are working on a new product and have just commenced development efforts. We are looking for smart frontend and backend MERN stack developers to help build some of the critical components of the application working collaboratively with the product team.




1. Planning weekly sprints with the product and development teams
2. Completing sprint tasks timely
3. Working on effectively unit testing the designed components
4. Adapting to a fast-paced startup environment                "
Product Design (AutoCAD/Solidworks),"
                            Toyart DIY Enterprises                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 2,001 /month","
                1. Design drafting: Creating and editing 2D/3D product drawings using AutoCAD software.
2. Concept development: Assisting in developing design concepts and prototypes.
3. Technical detailing: Preparing technical drawings with accurate dimensions and specifications.
4. Revisions: Modifying designs based on feedback and testing results.                "
Software Testing,"
                            Relinns Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Understand business processes and client requirements for the project
2. Create detailed, comprehensive, and well-structured test plans and test cases
3. Identify, record, document thoroughly, and track bugs
4. Estimate, prioritize, plan and coordinate testing activities
5. Develop and apply testing processes for new and existing products to meet client needs
6. Liaise with internal teams (developers and product managers) to understand system requirements
7. Perform both manual and automated testing and investigate automation test failures
8. Work closely with development teams to improve test coverage & quality and assist in resolving issues identified during testing
9. Meet departmental goals and define key performance indicators (KPIs)
10. Prepare the status report of testing activities
11. Update project managers regularly about the progress of testing activities
12. Perform other duties as assigned                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Bug Aetherium                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 1,500 /month","
                We are looking to grow our team.
 
We are looking for a skilled developer passionate about building robust, scalable, and secure backend systems. You will collaborate closely with frontend developers to ensure smooth integration with modern, responsive interfaces built using Tailwind CSS. The ideal candidate has hands-on experience with Firebase, Node.js, and designing RESTful APIs. Passionate about crafting modern, responsive, and scalable web interfaces. You will collaborate closely with product designers and backend engineers to transform complex concepts into intuitive digital experiences. The ideal candidate has strong fundamentals in Tailwind CSS, Firebase, and the MERN stack.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

Backend Development

1. Design, develop, and maintain scalable backend systems and RESTful APIs using Firebase (Firestore, Realtime Database, Authentication, Hosting, Cloud Functions) and Node.js.
2. Implement secure authentication, role management, and data handling strategies.
3. Manage serverless backend logic using Firebase Cloud Functions.
4. Design and optimize databases for performance, reliability, and scalability.
5. Work with the MERN stack (MongoDB, Express.js, Node.js, React) as needed for full-stack integration.
6. Optimize backend systems for speed, security, and scalability.
7. Maintain clean, reusable, and well-documented code.
8. Participate in code reviews and adopt backend best practices.
9. Stay updated with emerging backend frameworks, Firebase ecosystem updates, and web standards.

Frontend Development

10. Develop and implement dynamic user interfaces using Tailwind CSS, HTML, and core CSS.
11. Integrate front-end features with Firebase (Firestore, Authentication, Cloud Functions) and backend APIs.
12. Collaborate with backend engineers to ensure seamless data flow between the frontend and APIs.
13. Work with the MERN stack (MongoDB, Express.js, React, Node.js) to develop and maintain interactive, production-grade applications.
14. Transform wireframes and UI mockups into highly responsive, user-friendly, and accessible web applications.
15. Optimize web applications for speed, cross-browser compatibility, and device responsiveness.
16. Participate in code reviews and contribute to UI/UX and performance best practices.
17. Maintain clean, modular, and well-documented frontend codebases.
18. Stay updated with emerging frontend frameworks, CSS methodologies, and web development trends.                "
3D Printing,"
                            Garuda3d                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 11,000 /month","
                The mechanical engineering intern will be responsible for slicing, 3D printing, post-processing, local fabrication, machine assembly and troubleshooting, etc.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Slicing 3D models and initiating print jobs using slicing software (e.g., Cura, PrusaSlicer) 
2. Operating and maintaining 3D printers—setting up hardware, loading materials, and calibrating machines for optimal performance 
3. Post-processing printed parts: removing supports, sanding, and finishing to meet design specifications 
4. Fabricating metal components using additive or subtractive techniques and integrating them into assemblies
5. Sourcing and purchasing local parts and materials, maintaining inventory levels for smooth operations
6. Assembling 3D printers, installing hardware components, and troubleshooting mechanical/electronic issues 
7. Installing necessary firmware/software, configuring printers, and resolving software errors or print failures                "
Subject Matter Expert (Civil Engineering: Hydrology),"
                            ITutorly                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Solving subject-related engineering questions with accuracy and clarity.
2. Providing step-by-step solutions using the methods, notations, tables, and standard values from the assigned textbooks.
3. Working on Q&A tasks aligned with the specified textbooks.
4. Resolving queries raised during Q&A sessions in a timely and effective manner.                "
Python Development,"
                            Scoreazy Edutech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 /month","
                1. Writing clean, modular Python code for internal tools and automation workflows
2. Integrating third-party APIs and building AI-powered agents using GPT, LangChain, and related tools
3. Exploring and experimenting with AI automation solutions to solve real-world problems
4. Taking ownership of assigned projects and delivering functional prototypes or systems
5. Participating in short daily sync-ups with the team for task updates and feedback

Note: This internship offers hands-on exposure to real, high-impact projects that will significantly boost your portfolio and learning. You will work directly with the founding team and have the opportunity to build systems that go beyond textbook assignments.                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Herbal Hope                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 /month","
                Are you a WordPress whiz with a passion for making a positive impact? Join Herbal Hope as a WordPress Development intern and help us create a vibrant online presence to support our mission of promoting natural health and wellness. 

Key responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our team to design and develop custom WordPress websites that are visually stunning and user-friendly.
2. Implement SEO best practices to increase visibility and drive organic traffic to our site.
3. Write clean, efficient code in JavaScript, HTML, PHP, and CSS to enhance functionality and optimize performance.
4. Customize themes and plugins to align with our brand identity and enhance user experience.
5. Conduct thorough testing and troubleshooting to ensure seamless functionality across different devices and browsers.
6. Stay up-to-date on the latest WordPress trends and techniques to continuously improve our online presence.
7. Embrace the concept of Vibe Coding to infuse positive energy and intention into our digital platforms. 

If you're a creative problem-solver with a knack for WordPress development and a heart for herbal wellness, we want to hear from you! Apply now and help us spread Herbal Hope to the world.                "
C# Backend Development,"
                            Jogaz Info Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain backend applications using C# and .NET technologies.
2. Collaborate with the development team to design scalable and efficient solutions.
3. Write clean, reusable, and maintainable code.
4. Assist in debugging and troubleshooting production issues.
5. Participate in code reviews and follow best practices.
6. Contribute to database design and optimization tasks.
7. Develop RESTful APIs and Socket integration with frontend systems.
8. Stay updated on emerging technologies and backend development trends.                "
IT Admin,"
                            JP IT STAFFING LLC                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 4,000 /month","
                1. Take care of the IT needs of the team
2. Solve issues related to MS Office and MS Teams

Notes:

1. We are looking for an IT intern familiar with Microsoft Teams and email systems.
2. Should know how to manage Teams settings, users, and basic admin tasks.
3. Must be able to update email signatures and assist with user support.
4. Great opportunity to learn IT admin tools in a real business environment.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Ageit Endorse India Technology                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 19,500 /month","
                We are looking for an enthusiastic and motivated Full Stack Developer Intern to join our remote development team. This internship is ideal for candidates passionate about working with modern JavaScript technologies, developing scalable web applications, and building real-world products alongside experienced developers.  



1. Develop, maintain, and optimize web applications using React.js, Node.js, and related technologies.  
2. Collaborate with UI/UX designers and backend developers to deliver seamless user experiences. 
3. Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code following best practices.  
4. Integrate RESTful APIs and manage backend functionality using Express.js and databases.  
5. Perform debugging, testing, and troubleshooting for ongoing projects.  
6. Stay current with emerging technologies and development trends.                 "
UI/UX Design (Wix),"
                            Brain Quest                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,500 - 5,100 /month","
                We're looking for talented and creative Wix Design Interns who are currently in their 2nd year of college and are eager to gain hands-on experience in designing stunning websites. If you have an eye for clean, user-friendly UI/UX and a portfolio that shows it, we want to hear from you!

 

1. Designing modern, responsive websites using Wix Studio
2. Collaborating with the design team on real-time projects
3. Learning best practices in UI/UX design and website performance

What We’re Looking For:

1. Currently, pursuing a degree (2nd-year students only)
2. Strong portfolio showcasing UI/UX and web design work
3. Basic understanding of website structure and user flows
4. Self-motivated with a strong learning attitude
5. Available to work full-time, 5 days a week

Perks:

1. Certificate of Internship
2. Opportunity to earn performance-based incentives
3. Opportunity to work on real client projects                "
Instrumentation and Control Engineering,"
                            Material Intelligence Lab                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Scientific Instrumentation is a highly technical industry. 

As an electronics/electrical engineer, you'll design, develop and test components, devices, systems or equipment. You may be involved at any stage of a project including the initial brief for a concept, the design and development stage, testing of prototypes and the final manufacture and assembly of the electronics board, wiring of scientific devices, and quality checks also procurement of electronics and electrical components. You'll closely work with colleagues in other branches of engineering.

Required skill sets (Must-have)

a) Basic knowledge about working of electronics components like microcontrollers,IC's, resistors ,diodes etc
b) Must know how to use a multimeter.
c) Basic understanding of Voltage type transducers (pressure gauges etc)
d) Must be familiar with basic electrical wiring terminology.

Optional

1) Hands on experience of Soldering through hole components.

Diploma or B.E must.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            She Can Foundation                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Are you passionate about using your HTML skills to make a positive impact on the world? Join She Can Foundation as a Full Stack Development intern and help us empower women through technology! 



1. Collaborate with our development team to design and implement innovative web solutions.
2. Utilize your knowledge of HTML to create visually appealing and user-friendly websites.
3. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging code to ensure optimal performance.
4. Stay up to date on the latest trends and technologies in web development.
5. Communicate effectively with team members to ensure project deadlines are met.
6. Participate in brainstorming sessions to generate creative ideas for new projects.
7. Take initiative to learn new skills and contribute to the overall success of our mission. 

If you are a motivated and enthusiastic individual looking to gain hands-on experience in full stack development, apply now and be a part of our mission to support women in achieving their full potential!                "
ReactJS Development,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Build reusable and responsive UI components using ReactJS
2. Implement designs using HTML5, CSS3, and JavaScript (ES6+)
3. Work with React features like JSX, state management, props, and lifecycle methods
4. Manage application state using React’s Context API or libraries like Redux or MobX
5. Handle asynchronous data fetching and state updates                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Alphanumeric Ideas Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy individual with a passion for Full Stack Development? Alphanumeric Ideas Private Limited is looking for a talented intern to join our dynamic team! If you have a strong understanding of PHP, MySQL, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Python, MongoDB, AngularJS, Node.js, React, and Bubble.io, we want to hear from you!

Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our team to develop innovative web applications using a variety of programming languages and tools.
2. Design and implement user-friendly interfaces that enhance user experience and drive engagement.
3. Troubleshoot and debug code to ensure optimal performance and functionality of our web applications.
4. Stay updated on the latest industry trends and technologies to continuously improve our development processes.
5. Assist in testing and quality assurance to identify and address any issues or bugs in the software.
6. Participate in team meetings and brainstorming sessions to contribute ideas and solutions to project challenges.
7. Take ownership of assigned tasks and projects, demonstrating a strong work ethic and commitment to excellence.

If you are eager to gain hands-on experience and enhance your skills in Full Stack Development, apply now to be part of our innovative team at Alphanumeric Ideas Private Limited!                "
Electrical Engineering,"
                            Hitachi India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,001 /month","
                1. Provide necessary test, commissioning, and warranty support to T&C Engineers.
2. Perform fault investigations, fault data analysis, and repair failures in collaboration with T&C Engineers as soon as they occur.
3. Should be able to perform mainline tests, trials, and investigations in coordination with the Engineers. 
4. Execute SECP, HECP modification programs at the site under the guidance of T&C Engineers.
5. Comply with site EHS (Environment, Health, and Safety) procedures.
Flexible to work night shifts.                "
Industrial And Production Engineering,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Assist in tracking daily production output and comparing it with targets.
2. Observe and document production processes to identify inefficiencies.
3. Coordinate with production supervisors to ensure smooth operations on the shop floor.
4. Participate in process optimization projects to reduce cycle time and waste.
5. Help identify bottlenecks in workflow and suggest improvements using Lean tools.
6. Support implementation of 5S, Kaizen, or other continuous improvement techniques                "
Software Development,"
                            Techdome Solutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 16,000 /month","
                Join Techdome’s tech doctor team as an SDE and be at the forefront of crafting innovative web solutions. Collaborate with a dynamic team to build powerful applications, leveraging your expertise in front and backend technologies. If you're passionate about creating seamless user experiences, optimizing data systems, and developing high-performance RESTful APIs, this is an opportunity to drive innovation and shape the future of our backend systems at Techdome.



1. Develop web applications using React/Redux and integrate backend services.
2. Collaborate with the team to manage, optimize, and customize multiple web applications.
3. Create and maintain technical documentation, insightful client dashboards, and APIs for frontend developers. Ideate software solutions, design architecture, and build client-side and server-side applications.
4. Manage databases, test, debug, and upgrade software, ensuring responsiveness and security.
5. Collaborate with data scientists and analysts to enhance software functionality. 

Plus points (good to have): 

1. Deployment experience CI/CD, Kubernetes, Azure, AWS.
2. AI engineering projects knowledge.
3. Product-based or startup organization working experience.
4. Testing experience, i.e., automation testing.                "
Robotics,"
                            APEX ENGINEERING                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 22,000 /month","
                As a Robotics intern , you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects in the field of Robotics, Mechanical & Electrical Product Design, Embedded C, Embedded Systems, Raspberry Pi, Arduino, Internet of Things (IoT), and ARM Microcontroller. We are looking for a talented individual who is passionate about robotics and eager to learn and grow within our dynamic team.

1. Assist in the design and development of robotic systems and products.
2. Collaborate with engineers to troubleshoot and debug robotics systems.
3. Conduct research on new technologies and trends in the field of robotics.
4. Program and test embedded systems using C programming language.
5. Prototype and develop projects using Raspberry Pi, Arduino, and ARM Microcontroller.
6. Contribute to the implementation of Internet of Things (IoT) solutions.
7. Participate in team meetings and present findings and progress updates.

If you are a self-motivated individual with a strong background in robotics and a desire to make an impact in the industry, we encourage you to apply for this exciting internship opportunity.                "
E-Commerce,"
                            Mumma Mitra                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Key responsibilities:

1. Upload videos and creatives to ad platforms
2. Convert files (e.g., JPG/PNG to WebP) and organize assets
3. Maintain creative libraries (Google Drive/Sheets)
4. Assist with small editing, resizing, and formatting tasks
5. Help with reports and other support work                "
Front End Development,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Develop responsive and interactive web pages using HTML5, CSS3, and JavaScript (ES6+)
2. Work with frontend frameworks/libraries like React, Angular, or Vue.js
3. Implement designs based on wireframes and mockups provided by UI/UX teams
4. Ensure applications work smoothly across different browsers and devices
5. Test and fix layout issues on mobile, tablet, and desktop screens                "
Java Development,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Develop, test, and maintain Java applications or modules based on project requirements
2. Write clean, reusable, and efficient code following coding standards
3. Assist in building backend services or desktop applications using Java
4. Identify, analyze, and fix bugs in Java programs
5. Use debugging tools (e.g., Eclipse, IntelliJ IDEA debuggers) to resolve issues
6. Collaborate with QA teams to reproduce and fix reported defects                "
3D Object Annotator (iPhone 12 Pro And Above – Pro/Pro Max Models),"
                            Solvitude                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Do you have an eye for detail and accuracy in 3D image Object Scanning? Join us for an iPhone 3D Object Scanning Collection project at Solvitude! This is an exciting opportunity to showcase your skills.

1. Device requirement: iPhone 12 Pro/Pro Max or above all Pro and Pro Max models of iPhone with LiDAR sensor.
2. Attention to detail and ability to follow project guidelines carefully

 

1. Submit a minimum of 10 to 20 3D scanned objects as per guidelines in a day.
2. Capture high-quality 3D Objects through iPhone 12 Pro or above pro models with LiDAR sensor for a 3D framed object collection project.
3. Collaborate with the team to ensure project deadlines are met.
4. Work towards the timely delivery of content that meets the quality requirements.
5. Follow all the guidelines properly.
6. Coordinate with the team leader.

This project offers valuable industry-level experience and the chance to contribute to many Solvitude AI projects

Important: An iPhone 12 Pro/Pro Max or above Pro/Pro Max model of iPhone with LiDAR is mandatory.

If you are detail-oriented, creative, and enthusiastic about scanning 3D objects, we want to hear from you! This internship offers valuable hands-on experience in 3D object scanning and the opportunity to work with a dynamic team. Apply now and be a part of our exciting 3D object collection project!                "
Frontend Developer (Next.js),"
                            Reddway Hyperspace Systems Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Build responsive, pixel-perfect UIs using HTML, CSS (Flex box, Grid, Media Queries), Tailwind, and Next.js (React components).
2. Translate Figma designs and product ideas into functional, accessible web interfaces.
3. Write clean, modular, and maintainable code with reusable components and clear Git commits.
4. Debug layout/visual issues and optimize performance, including Core Web Vitals; apply SSR/SSG/ISR appropriately.
5. Integrate basic REST APIs, handle client-side state, and follow code review feedback from mentors.

Required Skills:

1. Solid understanding of HTML5 and CSS3, including Flexbox, Grid, and responsive design principles.
2. Basic JavaScript plus React/Next.js fundamentals (components, props, hooks, routing).
3. Familiarity with Tailwind CSS or utility-first styling workflows.
4. Awareness of accessibility basics and cross-browser compatibility.
5. Attention to detail, eagerness to learn, good communication, and teamwork.                "
Oncology Research,"
                            VRRX Therapeutics Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Conducting comprehensive field research within assigned hospital(s) to identify the personalized cancer medicine landscape, existing methodologies, technologies, and collaborative opportunities.
2. Interacting with oncologists, pathologists, and healthcare teams to gather insights, feedback, and requirements for implementing VRRX solutions.
3. Supporting laboratory activities, including sample preparation, experimental documentation, and data management as per protocols.
4. Assessing the current utilization of personalized cancer medicine services and identifying areas for clinical or operational improvement.
5. Developing structured reports summarizing both field and lab findings, analyses, and recommendations.
6. Assisting in correlating clinical observations from field studies with laboratory results.
7. Staying updated on advancements in personalized cancer medicine, diagnostics, and regulatory developments.
8. Supporting internal and external meetings, workshops, and educational sessions related to personalized cancer medicine.
9. Collaborating closely with cross-functional teams to ensure data consistency, operational efficiency, and alignment with research goals.                "
MERN Stack,"
                            CYBERED TECH PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,599 - 7,099 /month","
                1. Develop both front-end and back-end components to create a seamless and functional application
2. Address review comments to improve code quality and ensure project requirements are met                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            KidZoo (Jersey City, United States)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                1. Integrate Cloud Firestore into the existing Flutter front-end
2. Work on Firebase integration
3. Work on social APIs

Requirement: 

1. Need a good base/understanding of Firebase and Cloud Firestore
2. Candidates with MacBooks preferred
3. Need to be strong in logic                "
Junior Wordpress Developer,"
                            Codematics Solution LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000-15,000 /month","
                We are seeking a dedicated Junior WordPress Developer to join our team. This role is essential for building and maintaining our WordPress websites, ensuring they are user-friendly, visually appealing, and optimized for performance

 

1. Assist in the development and customization of WordPress themes to align with  brand standards and project requirements especially in Elementor, Custom Field Advanced Pro and other similar environments.
2. Support the installation and configuration of plugins to enhance website functionality and user experience.
3. Collaborate with designers and other developers to create responsive, high-quality web pages using HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
4. Implement basic SEO best practices to improve site visibility and performance in search engines.
5. Troubleshoot and resolve website issues related to functionality, performance, and compatibility using browser developer tools.
6. Conduct regular website updates and backups to ensure security and performance are maintained.
7. Strong problem-solving abilities, basic understanding of SEO, and familiarity with design tools like Adobe XD or Figma.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Altbridge                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                We’re looking for a motivated Full Stack Developer Intern to join our development team. You’ll work closely with senior engineers to design, build, and deploy scalable web applications. This internship is a great opportunity to gain hands-on experience in both frontend, backend technologies and AI knowledge/tools.



1. Assist in developing and maintaining web applications (frontend and backend).
2. Collaborate with team members to design, test, and deploy new features.
3. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code.
4. Debug and troubleshoot software issues.
5. Participate in code reviews and contribute ideas for improvement.
6. Work with APIs, databases, and cloud platforms as needed.

Benefits:

1. Hands-on experience in full-stack web development.
2. Mentorship from experienced developers.
3. Opportunity for a full-time offer based on performance.
4. Flexible working hours and supportive learning environment.                "
Prototyping,"
                            Venture Center                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Support in design, prototyping, and fabrication of medical devices
2. Assist in the design and prototyping of medical devices and harvesters
3. Work on embedded systems and the integration of various hardware components
4. Develop and test GUI applications for device interfaces
5. Assist in technical and non-technical workshops                "
Workflow Automation,"
                            Arc Digitech                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Design, build, test, and maintain automation workflows using n8n, Zapier, Make, Pabbly, and/or Python (APIs, webhooks, schedulers).
 2. Set up integrations across CRMs, Google Workspace, and marketing platforms to streamline data flow and tasks.
 3. Analyse business processes, map data flows, and identify high-impact automation opportunities.
 4. Document solutions (SOPs/flow diagrams), and test and refine automation builds.
 5. Monitor runs, troubleshoot errors, and implement logging/alerts to ensure reliability and accuracy.                "
React Native Development,"
                            Boom Entertainment                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 40,000 /month","
                We’re looking for a React Native Frontend Developer who specializes in performance optimization. Your goal will be to enhance app speed, responsiveness, and overall user experience by identifying and fixing performance bottlenecks.



1. Optimize app startup and video loading times
2. Improve frame rates, responsiveness, and memory usage
3. Refactor and clean the existing React Native codebase
4. Debug UI/UX issues and fix unnecessary re-renders
5. Implement lazy loading, caching, and offline optimization
6. Collaborate with backend developers to streamline API integration
7. Ensure smooth animations and navigation performance                "
Solar Design Engineer,"
                            Rezillion Tech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,001 - 14,000 /month","
                Join our dynamic team at Rezillion Tech Private Limited as a Solar Design Engineer intern! We are seeking a talented individual who is proficient in AutoCAD, Google SketchUp, and STAAD.Pro and MS-Excel. As a member of our team, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge solar design projects and gain valuable hands-on experience in the renewable energy industry. 



1. Assist in the design and layout of solar PV systems using AutoCAD and Google SketchUp
2. Perform structural analysis and design using STAAD.Pro software
3. Generate detailed engineering drawings and specifications for solar projects
4. Conduct feasibility studies and cost analysis for proposed solar installations
5. Collaborate with engineers and project managers to ensure project deadlines are met
6. Utilize MS-Excel to track project progress and update project documentation
7. Stay current with industry trends and best practices in solar design and engineering. 

If you are passionate about renewable energy and looking to gain valuable experience in the field, apply now to join our team at Rezillion Tech Private Limited!                "
Game Development,"
                            Frolic Frog Studios                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                * Please don't apply if you haven't worked on hyper casual game and released on playStore. 

Are you a passionate game developer looking to gain hands-on experience in the industry? Join Frolic Frog Studios as a Game Development intern and work with cutting-edge technology like Unity 3D and Unity Engine! 

1. Collaborate with our team to design and develop interactive gameplay experiences.
2. Assist in creating and implementing game mechanics, features, and assets.
3. Conduct testing and debugging to ensure smooth performance and user experience.
4. Work on optimizing game performance and solving technical challenges.
5. Participate in brainstorming sessions to generate new game ideas and concepts.
6. Stay up-to-date on industry trends and technology to contribute innovative solutions.
7. Contribute to a positive team environment and bring creativity to our projects.

If you are a self-motivated individual with a strong passion for game development, apply now and bring your skills to Frolic Frog Studios!                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            Whatbytes                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the development team to design, develop, and maintain Flutter applications.
2. Assist in the development of new features and enhancements for existing applications. Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code.
3. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to peers.
4. Work closely with UX/UI designers to implement user interfaces that are both functional and attractive.
5. Debug and resolve issues reported by users and the QA team.
6. Stay up-to-date with the latest trends and advancements in Flutter development and suggest improvements.
7. Apply principles of data structures and algorithms (DSA) to solve complex problems efficiently.
8. Assist in system design discussions and contribute to architecture decisions.                "
Site Engineering (Civil),"
                            Design Magnet Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. On-Site Measurement
 2. AutoCAD Drafting
 3. Coordination & Documentation                "
Subject Matter Expert - Technical Coding,"
                            Blackbuck Engineers Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Develop and review academic content such as assignments, quizzes, solutions, and explanations.
2. Provide accurate, step-by-step solutions to subject-related questions.
3. Research and ensure the factual accuracy and conceptual clarity of learning materials.
4. Collaborate with content teams, editors, and quality analysts to enhance the overall content quality.
5. Analyze feedback and continuously improve question-solving and content creation processes.
6. Maintain consistency in style, formatting, and pedagogy as per company guidelines.
7. Support in developing new learning resources, study guides, and practice materials.                "
Electronics Engineering,"
                            SoulEET Makers LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,500 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Review and maintain database of electronic components (datasheets, specs, stock, alternates).
2. Identify equivalent/replacement parts for obsolete or out-of-stock components.
3. Assist in component selection for customer/student projects and prototype designs.
3. Verify technical specifications, footprints, and pinouts for accuracy.
4. Coordinate with suppliers for part availability, pricing, and lead time.
5. Support PCB designers or customers in choosing correct passive/active components.
6. Test or verify component samples (basic functional checks, pin mapping, etc.).                "
Robotics,"
                            Techinfinity                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 750 - 1,125 /week","
                Job Description: STEM Trainer (Robotics)

Position Overview:
We are seeking an enthusiastic and experienced STEM Trainer to join our team and inspire the next generation of learners in the fields of Science, Technology, Engineering, and Mathematics (STEM). The ideal candidate will possess a strong background in STEM disciplines, along with the ability to design engaging and interactive learning experiences for students. As a STEM Trainer, you will play a key role in fostering a love for STEM subjects and helping students develop critical thinking, problem-solving, and innovation skills.

Key Responsibilities:
Instruction and Facilitation:
Deliver engaging and interactive STEM lessons in a classroom or workshop setting.
Explain complex concepts in an accessible manner and encourage student participation through discussions and group activities.

Demonstrations and Experiments:
Set up and conduct science experiments, engineering challenges, and technological demonstrations that captivate students' interest.
Explain the scientific principles behind experiments and encourage students to observe and analyse results.

Technology Integration:
Incorporate digital tools, simulations, and educational technology to enhance learning experiences and demonstrate real-world applications of STEM concepts.

Problem-Solving and Critical Thinking:
Engage students in activities that promote problem-solving, critical thinking, and creativity.
Guide students through analysing problems, exploring multiple solutions, and making evidence-based decisions.

Collaboration and Teamwork:
Organise group projects and activities that encourage collaboration, communication, and teamwork among students.
Foster an inclusive and supportive learning environment that values diverse perspectives.

Assessment and Progress Tracking:
Assess student understanding through quizzes, assignments, and practical assessments.
Provide constructive feedback to help students improve their grasp of STEM concepts.

Professional Development:
Stay updated on the latest advancements in STEM education, teaching methodologies, and instructional technologies.

Qualifications and Requirements:
Bachelor's or Master's degree in a STEM field (Science, Technology, Engineering, Mathematics) or related discipline.
Excellent communication skills and the ability to convey complex concepts in an engaging and comprehensible manner.
Proven experience working with robotics systems, including programming, assembly, and troubleshooting.
Familiarity with simulation software and virtual training environments is a plus.
Strong organisational skills and attention to detail in curriculum execution.
Prior experience in teaching, training, or mentoring is desirable.


Benefits:
Certified training from Technobotics Education Centre.
Opportunity to make a significant impact on individuals' career development in robotics.
Access to cutting-edge robotic systems and technologies.
Ongoing professional development and training opportunities.
Collaborative and innovative work environment.

If you are passionate about robotics, education, and helping others unlock their potential in the field of robotics, we encourage you to apply and join our dynamic team of trainers.                "
Architecture,"
                            HourSpace                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                We are seeking students or fresh graduates of B.Arch, interior design students can apply if they meet the below criteria  

 

1. Prepare detailed architectural drawings using computer-aided design (CAD) software like AutoCADand Revit.
2. Create digital 3D models of designs to help visualize projects.
3. Participate in site visits to assess project feasibility, collect data, and document observations.
4. Help prepare project proposals, presentations, and other documentation for clients and stakeholders.
5. Research building codes, regulations, material specifications, and emerging trends in architecture and smart living.
6. Assist with maintaining project files and coordinating with construction teams.                 "
Product Operations,"
                            Zeko                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Monitor AI interview workflows — Oversee the daily execution of automated interview processes to ensure smooth operations and accurate functioning.

2. Review AI interview recordings — Evaluate candidate interviews, flag inconsistencies or potential malpractices, and ensure data integrity.

3. Analyze operational data — Collect and organize data from interviews and platform activities to identify trends and performance metrics.

4. Prepare feedback reports — Generate structured feedback for product and tech teams to improve system efficiency and user experience.

5. Track and document issues — Record technical or process-related issues, escalate them promptly, and maintain issue logs for review.

6. Maintain dashboards & reports — Update and manage operational dashboards to track interviews, candidate progress, and system health.                "
Civil Engineering,"
                            Tapi Prestressed Products Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Follow up with sites for material requirements
2. Follow up with vendors for the material
3. Proper filling of documents                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Salesqueen Software Solutions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 5,000 /month","
                As a Full Stack Development intern at Salesqueen Software Solutions, you will have the exciting opportunity to work on real projects and gain hands-on experience in developing cutting-edge software solutions. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement user-friendly interfaces using HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
2. Assist in creating dynamic web applications using PHP and MySQL to meet client requirements.
3. Help in optimizing website performance and ensuring cross-browser compatibility.
4. Participate in code reviews and provide feedback to improve code quality and efficiency.
5. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure smooth functioning of web applications.
6. Stay updated on emerging technologies and trends to enhance your skills and contribute innovative ideas to the team.
7. Communicate effectively with team members and stakeholders to deliver projects on time and within budget. 

Join us at Salesqueen Software Solutions and unleash your full potential in the world of full stack development!                "
Digital Marketing,"
                            Nak Auditing (Dubai, United Arab Emirates)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 30,000 /month","
                Are you a digital marketing enthusiast with a passion for SEO, WordPress, and Google AdWords? Nak Auditing is seeking a dynamic Digital Marketing intern to join our team and help us drive online visibility and engagement. As a key member of our marketing department, you will have the opportunity to gain hands-on experience in executing digital marketing strategies and campaigns. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Conduct keyword research and optimize website content for search engines.
2. Manage and update WordPress website, ensuring it is user-friendly and optimized for conversions.
3. Implement and monitor Google AdWords campaigns to drive traffic and generate leads.
4. Analyze website traffic and performance metrics to identify areas for improvement.
5. Assist in creating and scheduling social media content to engage our audience.
6. Collaborate with team members to brainstorm and execute creative marketing campaigns.
7. Stay up-to-date on the latest trends and best practices in digital marketing to continuously improve our strategies. 

If you are a proactive and creative individual with a strong understanding of digital marketing principles, we want to hear from you! Join us at Nak Auditing and gain valuable experience in a fast-paced and dynamic industry. Apply now!                "
Front End Development,"
                            Lunacal                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Join us for an exceptional opportunity to build groundbreaking products! We're looking for a creative and driven front-end developer intern with NextJS skills to join our innovative team. If you're eager to learn and develop amazing web applications, this is the perfect role for you!

What You'll Do:

1. Build Cool Stuff: Create user-friendly web applications with NextJS.
2. Design Magic: Bring design specs to life with engaging user interfaces.
3. Interactive Fun: Implement animations and interactive components.
4. Team Up: Collaborate with backend developers to make everything work seamlessly.
5. Speed and Scale: Optimize applications for performance and scalability.
6. Keep Learning: Stay on top of the latest trends and best practices in front-end development.

What You Need:
1. Experience with NextJS or React.
2. Hands-on projects with NextJS are a big plus.
3. Knowledge of JavaScript, CSS and Tailwind CSS.
4. Understanding of responsive design.
5. Experience of implementing animations and interactive component design.
6. Ability to work well in a team.                "
Biotechnology Engineering,"
                            WML Biotechnology Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 14,000 /month","
                1. Set up laboratory procedures following standard operating procedures (SOPs) with minimal supervision
2. Setting up a lab for plant tissue culture
3. Ensure proper documentation relating to all experiments is kept up to date.
4. Preparation of media and stock solutions
5. Transferring plants on selection media through growth chamber production                "
WordPress Development,"
                            The Earth Ace                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 4,500 /month","
                Are you skilled in WordPress and passionate about creating impactful digital experiences? The Earth Ace is looking for a WordPress Development Intern who can help us build, optimize, and maintain websites that support our eco-friendly mission.

Key Responsibilities
1. Website Development: Build and customize WordPress websites (themes, layouts, plugins) as per business needs.
2. Content Optimization: Structure and optimize website content to be SEO-friendly and aligned with marketing goals.
3. Website Maintenance: Regularly update and improve existing websites, ensuring smooth performance and security.
4. SEO Implementation: Apply best practices for search engine optimization to improve rankings and visibility.
5. Troubleshooting: Identify and resolve issues (bugs, errors, compatibility problems) promptly.
6. Performance Monitoring: Track website performance, loading speed, and user experience, suggesting improvements.
7. Collaboration: Work closely with marketing and design teams to deliver engaging, user-focused websites.
8. Innovation: Stay updated with the latest WordPress trends, plugins, and technologies to keep our sites modern and effective.

Who We’re Looking For
- Strong knowledge of WordPress (themes, plugins, customization).
- Understanding of SEO principles and content optimization.
- Ability to maintain and update live websites with attention to detail.
- Problem-solving mindset with a proactive approach.
- Passion for sustainability and willingness to contribute creative ideas.

If you’re eager to grow as a WordPress developer and want to use your skills to make a positive impact, apply now and join The Earth Ace team!                "
Front End Development,"
                            Ramyoz                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 20,000 /month","
                We are seeking a dynamic and talented Front End Development intern who is proficient in Next.js to join our team at Ramyoz. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects, gain valuable experience, and contribute to the growth of our company. 

Key responsibilities include:
1. Collaborating with the design and development teams to create user-friendly interfaces.
2. Implementing responsive designs and ensuring cross-browser compatibility.
3. Writing clean, efficient, and maintainable code using Next.js.
4. Assisting in the optimization of web applications for maximum speed and scalability.
5. Conducting testing and debugging to ensure seamless functionality.
6. Keeping up-to-date with the latest trends and technologies in front end development.
7. Providing support and assistance to team members as needed.

If you are passionate about front end development, eager to learn, and ready to take on new challenges, we want to hear from you. Join us at Ramyoz and take the first step towards a successful career in web development. Apply now!                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Meru Technosoft Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 3,000 /month","
                Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our development team to design and implement new features for our mobile applications.
2. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code using Flutter and Dart.
3. Integrate Firebase services and REST APIs into our applications for seamless functionality.
4. Test and debug applications to ensure high performance and functionality on both Android and iOS platforms.
5. Work closely with our team to optimize user experience and interface design.
6. Stay up-to-date with the latest trends and technologies in mobile development to enhance our applications.
7. Assist in deploying applications to Cloud Firestore and providing support for ongoing maintenance and updates.

If you are passionate about mobile development and eager to learn and grow in a dynamic environment, we encourage you to apply for this exciting opportunity with Meru Technosoft Private Limited.                "
Java Development,"
                            Crossing Hurdles                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 /month","
                As an intern, you'll have the opportunity to work on advanced Java-based web development projects that drive the platform's capabilities. From enhancing backend systems to designing seamless web interfaces, you'll play a key role in delivering a world-class experience.



1. Developing and optimizing backend systems to support large-scale, real-time applications.
2. Designing and implementing RESTful APIs for seamless integration with our AI-driven recruitment engine.
3. Enhancing the platform's scalability and performance to handle concurrent user interactions effectively.
4. Collaborating with frontend developers to ensure a smooth user experience and seamless functionality.
5. Troubleshooting, debugging, and improving existing Java-based applications.
6. Staying up-to-date with the latest technologies and best practices in web development and software engineering.                "
UI/UX Developer,"
                            Icecreamlabs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 30,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

 1.Extend an existing Next.js/React app: new features, UI states, and component refactors.
 2. Build sleek, accessible UI/UX with Tailwind/ShadCN (or similar).
 3. Integrate Supabase auth, DB, and storage; wire backend APIs to the client.
 4. Ship UI for AI agent clients (chat, task runs, artifacts viewer, logs).
 5. Use AI coding tools daily (v0/Vo, Lovable, Claude Code/Cursor) to speed delivery.
 6. Own small features end-to-end: spec → PRD-lite → implementation → tests → docs.

You’re a good fit if you 
 1.Know Next.js, React, TypeScript, hooks, server actions/Route Handlers.
 2. Are strong at UI thinking: empty states, loading, errors, responsive behavior.
 3. Can turn a Figma/wireframe into pixel-tight components fast.
 4. Are comfortable reading API docs and integrating REST/GraphQL.
 5. Have used AI dev tools meaningfully (not just autocomplete).

 • Bonus: Supabase, Zod/React Hook Form, TanStack Query, OpenAI/Claude APIs.

Tools you’ll touch

Next.js, React, TypeScript, Tailwind, ShadCN, Supabase, TanStack Query, PostHog/Analytics, OpenAI/Claude SDKs, v0/Vo, Lovable, Claude Code/Cursor.

How we work

 • Short, outcome-driven sprints, tight PRs, clear acceptance criteria.
 • Mentorship + code reviews; we value clarity, pace, and thoughtful UX.

Responsibilities

 • Implement features from tickets/PRDs with clean, typed components.
 • Create reusable UI primitives; maintain a design system feel.
 • Manage client state (server components + query caching) cleanly.
 • Write basic tests (vitest/playwright preferred) for critical paths.
 • Document components and decisions in the repo (MDX/Storybook optional).                "
Shopify Web Development,"
                            Global Trend                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 /month","
                1. Assist in the development and maintenance of Shopify websites
2. Customize existing themes and create custom Shopify themes to meet client needs
3. Implement new features and functionalities using Liquid templating language
4. Optimize web applications for speed and scalability
5. Collaborate with the design and SEO teams to ensure the technical feasibility and usability of the UI/UX design

Note: Working hours: 2:30 p.m. to 10:30 p.m. (Monday to Saturday).                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            Pneumatic Equipments Corporation                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 5,000 /month","
                1. Assisting in manufacturing processes: Helping with the production of pneumatic tools and equipment.
2. Maintenance and repair: Assisting in the maintenance and repair of pneumatic equipment.
3. Quality control: Ensuring the quality of products and equipment.
4. Learning and development: Gaining hands-on experience and developing skills in mechanical engineering.
5. Collaboration and teamwork: Working alongside experienced professionals to achieve team goals.                "
Web Development,"
                            Dharte                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                Join our dynamic team and take ownership of Dharte's online presence! 

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include having strong CSS skills for layout and designing updates across our websites, including our main site dharte.com, and others (dharte.co.uk, dharte.us, dharte. events). 

Requirements:

1. Experience with both WordPress and Wix is essential.
2. You'll ensure a seamless user experience, troubleshoot any issues, and manage event ticket sales.

If you're a detail-oriented web enthusiast with a passion for smooth functionality, this is the perfect opportunity for you!                "
Cyber Security,"
                            OPTRENEX INTERNATIONAL PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                As a Cyber Security intern at Optrenex International Private Limited, you will have the exciting opportunity to apply your skills in VAPT, Linux, Ethical Hacking, Python, Computer Networking, and Web Application Security to protect our organization from cyber threats. Your responsibilities will include:

1. Conducting Vulnerability Assessment and Penetration Testing (VAPT) to identify and mitigate security vulnerabilities.
2. Implementing security measures on Linux systems to prevent unauthorized access and data breaches.
3. Using ethical hacking techniques to test the security of our systems and networks.
4. Writing secure code in Python to enhance the security of our applications and software.
5. Monitoring and managing computer networks to ensure they are secure and protected from cyber attacks.
6. Identifying and patching vulnerabilities in web applications to prevent exploitation by malicious actors.
7. Collaborating with our team to develop and implement comprehensive cyber security strategies to safeguard our organization's data and assets.

If you are passionate about cyber security and eager to gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced environment, apply now to join our team at Optrenex International Private Limited.                "
CAD Design,"
                            RED ENGINEERS                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,100 - 13,500 /month","
                1. Good communication and presentation skills
2. Knowledge of 3D modeling
3. Understanding of manufacturing drawings and GD&T                "
Game Artist/ Concept Artist,"
                            GOG Studios Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Create characters and their animation, environments, and props.
2. Work closely with designers and developers to bring visuals to life in gameplay.
3. Produce concept art, visual explorations, and polished assets.
4. Contribute to 3D modeling or animation if you have experience                "
E-Commerce Business Management,"
                            Fabricstudio Crafts Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Work on product management
2. Work on website management
3. Work on website updation                "
Product Management,"
                            Optima Learn                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                What You’ll Work On:

1. As a Product Manager Intern at Optima Learn, you’ll work directly with the founding team on live projects shaping our next product version. Your core focus areas will include
2. User Research & Insights: Talking to real users, understanding their pain points, and identifying unmet needs.
3. Product Flows: Designing intuitive user journeys and wireframes for features across our web app and dashboard.
4. Automation Design: Identifying opportunities for process automation across onboarding, agent setup, and data capture.
5. User Testing: Conducting usability tests, capturing qualitative and quantitative feedback, and recommending product improvements.
6. Collaboration: Working closely with the design, tech, and content teams to turn insights into features.

What We’re Looking For:

1. Curiosity to deeply understand user problems
2. Structured thinking and strong communication skills
3. Basic understanding of UX, product metrics, and wireframing tools (like Figma or Miro)
4. Hustle mindset — ready to take ownership and iterate fast

What You’ll Gain:

1. Direct mentorship from founders
2. Hands-on exposure to real-world product building
3. Opportunity for PPO (Pre-Placement Offer) based on performance                "
N8n Worklfow Builder,"
                            Biztel.ai                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 /month","
                1. Build automation workflows using n8n
2. Integrate with other necessary platforms using their APIs
3. Deploy the product in the cloud and make it production-ready                "
PHP/Laravel Developer,"
                            Shipper4u                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,001 - 11,000 /month","
                Are you a talented PHP / Laravel Developer looking to gain real-world experience in a dynamic and fast-growing company? Shipper4u is seeking an enthusiastic intern to join our team and contribute to our innovative projects. As a Laravel Developer intern, you will have the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technologies such as PHP, Laravel, Vue.js, and JavaScript. 



1. Collaborate with our development team to design, develop, and implement new features for our platform
2. Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code following industry best practices
3. Test and debug code to ensure high-quality performance and user experience
4. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve code quality
5. Stay up-to-date with the latest technologies and trends in web development
6. Assist in troubleshooting and resolving technical issues as they arise
7. Contribute to the overall success of our projects by actively participating in team meetings and brainstorming sessions

If you are passionate about web development and eager to learn from experienced professionals, this internship is the perfect opportunity for you to kickstart your career. Apply now and take the first step towards becoming a valued member of our team at Shipper4u.                "
Python/Django & React Engineering,"
                            The Agency Source                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Re-architect our Python codebase
2. Optimize queries and code
3. Work on becoming as skilled as a senior software architect
4. Work directly under senior developers and get trained on production level code
5. Interact with production servers                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            Brand Leap Media                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. College students passionate about Android development
2. Have previously built and deployed at least one functional app (to showcase)
3. Professional, consistent, and serious about deadlines
4. Eager to learn, innovate, and grow in a startup environment
5. Excited to work on an AI-based real-world project
6. Bonus: If the project succeeds, ESOPs and early-stage bonuses will be offered                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Starkzapp Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 5,500 /month","
                Are you a talented Flutter Development intern with a strong grasp of Dart and Flutter? Starkzapp Technologies Private Limited is looking for someone like you to join our dynamic team! As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects, collaborate with experienced developers, and enhance your skills in mobile app development. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Develop and maintain Flutter applications for Android and iOS platforms.
2. Collaborate with the design team to create user-friendly interfaces.
3. Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code in Dart language.
4. Conduct thorough testing and debugging to ensure the quality of the applications.
5. Stay updated on the latest trends and technologies in mobile app development.
6. Assist in the optimization and performance tuning of applications.
7. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to team members. 

If you are passionate about mobile app development and eager to learn and grow in a supportive environment, apply now to be a part of Starkzapp Technologies Private Limited!                "
Blockchain Development,"
                            Vitwit Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                We are seeking a talented Blockchain Development intern to join our team at Vitwit Technologies Private Limited. If you have a deep understanding of Blockchain technology and are eager to learn and grow in a fast-paced environment, then this opportunity is perfect for you!

Key responsibilities:
1. Work closely with our team of experienced developers to design, develop, and test blockchain solutions.
2. Collaborate on blockchain projects to enhance existing products and develop new features.
3. Research and implement the latest trends and best practices in blockchain technology.
4. Assist in troubleshooting and resolving technical issues related to blockchain applications.
5. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve code quality.
6. Contribute to the overall success of the team by taking on additional tasks as needed.
7. Actively participate in team meetings and brainstorming sessions to contribute innovative ideas and solutions.

If you are passionate about blockchain technology and are looking to gain hands-on experience in the field, apply now to join our dynamic team at Vitwit Technologies Private Limited!                "
Implementation,"
                            Maxyfi Tech Pvt Ltd                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,500 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Assist in implementing and configuring software solutions for clients.
2. Support clients during the onboarding process and provide necessary training.
3. Collaborate with internal teams to ensure smooth software deployment and integration.
4. Address client inquiries and resolve basic technical issues promptly.
5. Gather feedback and work with the team to enhance the implementation process.
6. Maintain accurate documentation for configurations, issues, and resolutions.                "
WordPress Development,"
                            ViralChilly                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 5,000 /month","
                ViralChilly is looking for interns who want to build a career in Wordpress Development. We will train you by giving practice work on Live Websites. 

Candidate will get a chance to learn 
- WordPress theme customization
- Theme creation
- Wordpress site performance improvement
- Page Builder usage like: Oxygen, Divi Builder, Elementor, Webflow. 

At the end of internship we will provide a 3 month experience certificate on WordPress Development, experience certificate will be provided to those candidates only who successfully complete full 6 months training. Excellently performing interns will also have a permanent job opportunity option available with ViralChilly.



** Working on testing and improving the design of the website.
** Working on maintaining the appearance of websites by enforcing content standards.
** Working on optimizing sites for maximum speed and scalability.
** Working on troubleshooting bugs, maintaining and enhancing existing websites.
** Building creative and conversion-focused websites and landing pages using WordPress.

Only those candidates can apply who:

1. are available for full time (in-office) internship in Jaipur
2. are available for duration of 3 months
3. have relevant skills and interests
4. ARE FUN TO WORK WITH, WE LIKE HAPPY FACES

If you want to be part of a team that grows together with you, do apply.                "
Field Service Engineer,"
                            Shail Healthcare Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                We are looking for B.Tech/Diploma candidates in electronics & communication, electrical & electronics engineering (EEE), or instrumentation & control.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Finding faults in electronic components.
2. Installing and servicing electronic systems.
3. Maintaining electronic systems and components.
4. Understanding product manuals and interacting with the service manager of the company.
5. Understanding software and drivers required for electronic systems.
6. Building a good rapport with the team and the service manager.
7. Maintaining good relations with clients.
8. Applying knowledge to troubleshoot and propose solutions for electronics-related issues.

Job Type: Full-time
Salary: Up to ₹10,000 to 12,000 per month
Location- PAN UP                "
Python Automation,"
                            Learn Basics                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 3,500 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborative Development: Work alongside experienced developers to design and build scalable backend systems using Python.
2. API Development: Developing and integrating APIs that power real-world applications. 
3. Code Review & Best Practices: Maintain high-quality code by participating in code reviews and following best development practices. 
4. Optimization: Troubleshooting, optimizing, and improving existing applications.
5. CI/CD Implementation: Build CI/CD pipelines to streamline application deployment. 
6. Automation: Design and implement Python-based automation scripts to streamline repetitive tasks and optimize day-to-day operations.

By the end of this internship, you will be familiar with:

1. Master Advanced Python & Database Concepts: Dive deep into Python while gaining hands-on experience with large-scale databases (300+ tables). 
2. Understand Data Models & System Design: Develop a strong foundation in creating and optimizing data models for scalable systems. 
3. Build Scalable Backend Systems: Collaborate on designing and building backend systems that can grow with the needs of our applications.

Selection process: 
As a student, we don't expect you to have full knowledge of all the technologies. However, a moderate understanding is required. 
The selection process has 3 Levels: 2 rounds of Python Tasks, followed by a live task session, and a final interview.

Note: This full-time internship is designed for students who are eager to learn, grow, and contribute to real-world projects. It provides an opportunity to gain hands-on experience while helping our team explore and innovate in key areas. If you are passionate about learning and growth, Learn Basics is the right place for you.                "
Web Development,"
                            Expert4DM                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 5,001 /month","
                Web development & design intern
Company: EDM Digital
 Location: Remote 
 Type: Internship (6 Months)
 Stipend: Performance-based
 Start Date: Immediate

About EDM Digital:

At EDM Digital, we help brands grow through data-driven marketing, web solutions, and creative technology.  We’re looking for a passionate web development & design intern who’s excited to learn, experiment, and build impactful digital experiences.
If you love blending design creativity with technical development, this internship is the perfect launchpad for your career.



1. Design and develop responsive websites using HTML, CSS, WordPress, JavaScript, and PHP.
2. Collaborate with the creative team to turn wireframes and mockups (via Figma or Canva) into live web pages.
3. Support in backend development or Python-based automation/integration tasks.
4. Maintain, test, and optimize websites for performance, SEO, and user experience.
5. Assist in managing website updates, bug fixes, and content uploads.
6. Research and implement emerging web technologies or plugins to enhance project output.

Why Join EDM Digital?
1. At EDM Digital, we’re not just about websites — we build digital ecosystems that perform.
2.  If you’re ready to learn, innovate, and make an impact, we’d love to have you on board.                "
Sales and Marketing,"
                            BookMySession                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 2,000 /month","
                As a sales and marketing intern at BookMySession, you will have the opportunity to work closely with our dynamic sales and marketing teams to drive business growth and increase brand awareness.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Conducting market analysis to identify potential opportunities for growth.
2. Assisting in the development and implementation of marketing campaigns to promote our services.
3. Working closely with the sales team to generate leads, follow up with clients, and close sales.
4. Helping in managing sales pipelines and tracking progress towards sales targets.
5. Collaborating with the marketing team to create engaging content for social media and other promotional channels.
6. Assisting in organizing and attending networking events to build relationships with potential clients.
7. Providing support with data analysis and reporting to measure the success of sales and marketing efforts.

This role is perfect for someone who is eager to learn and grow in the sales and marketing field while gaining valuable hands-on experience in a fast-paced startup environment. Apply now to join our team and make a meaningful impact on our business!                "
React Native Development,"
                            Tellis Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain mobile applications using React Native
2. Collaborate with designers, product managers, and backend developers
3. Debug and fix bugs, ensuring app optimization and performance
4. Write clean, reusable, and well-documented code
5. Implement UI/UX designs and ensure responsiveness across devices
6. Conduct unit testing and ensure cross-platform compatibility
7. Stay updated with the latest React Native and mobile development trends
8. Participate in daily stand-ups, sprint planning, and agile meetings
9. Contribute to technical documentation for new features and APIs                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            LivNSense                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                As a Full Stack Development intern at LivNSense, you will have the exciting opportunity to work with cutting-edge technologies like HTML, PostgreSQL, CSS, JavaScript, GitHub, REST API, Node.js, CI/CD, and Docker. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborating with the development team to design, develop, and test new features for our software products.
2. Writing clean, maintainable code that meets industry standards and best practices.
3. Assisting with troubleshooting and debugging issues in both front-end and back-end code.
4. Implementing RESTful APIs to enhance the functionality of our applications.
5. Contributing to the continuous integration and continuous deployment processes within the development pipeline.
6. Working with Docker containers to package and deploy applications in a scalable and efficient manner.
7. Participating in code reviews and providing feedback to help improve the overall quality of our software products. 

This internship will provide you with valuable hands-on experience in a fast-paced and innovative environment, allowing you to enhance your skills and make a real impact on our product development efforts.                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            Pexaworks Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                At Pexaworks, we create innovative digital products that drive the future of technology. Our focus on mobile applications means we're constantly developing next-gen solutions that delight users. We’re looking for a Mobile Developer (React Native) to join our team and help us bring amazing ideas to life on both Android and iOS.

If you’re passionate about building mobile apps, solving problems, and working with a creative team, keep reading!

What You’ll Be Doing

1. Mobile App Development – Build and maintain high-quality mobile apps using React Native for both Android and iOS.
2. Cross-Platform Solutions – Develop apps that run seamlessly across platforms, ensuring consistency and performance.
3. Collaborating with Teams – Work with the product, design, and backend teams to deliver exceptional mobile experiences.
4. Troubleshooting & Debugging – Identify and fix bugs, optimize app performance, and ensure smooth user interactions.
5. Staying Up-to-Date – Continuously learn and implement the latest trends, tools, and technologies in mobile development.
6. User-Focused Design – Implement responsive, intuitive user interfaces and ensure a seamless user experience.

What We’re Looking For

1. Strong experience with React Native and its ecosystem.
2. Proficiency in JavaScript, ES6, and React.
3. Experience with APIs and integrating mobile apps with backend services.
4. Familiarity with mobile UI/UX design principles and responsive design.
5. Knowledge of Version Control systems, such as Git.
6. Strong problem-solving skills, attention to detail, and passion for delivering high-quality products.
7. Experience with Android Studio and Xcode is a plus.
8. Knowledge of native modules and third-party libraries is a plus.

Why You’ll Love It Here

1. Real Projects – Get hands-on experience with building and launching mobile apps.
2. Awesome Team – Work with a talented, collaborative team of developers, designers, and product managers.
3. Career Growth – Learn and grow with us; this could be the start of something long-term.
4. Flexible & Remote-Friendly – Enjoy the flexibility to work remotely.
5. Impact – Your code will directly affect users and shape the future of our mobile products.                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Reliant Business Information Systems Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 12,000 /month","
                Are you a skilled WordPress Development intern with a passion for PHP, HTML, WordPress, JavaScript, and CSS? Join our dynamic team at Reliant Business Information Systems Private Limited! As a key member of our development team, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and contribute to the growth of our company. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Assist in developing and maintaining WordPress websites for our clients.
2. Collaborate with team members to implement new features and functionalities.
3. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure optimal performance of websites.
4. Customize themes and plugins to meet client requirements.
5. Stay up-to-date with the latest web development trends and technologies.
6. Conduct quality assurance testing to identify and fix bugs.
7. Provide support and training to clients on website management and updates. 

If you are a motivated and creative individual looking to gain hands-on experience in WordPress development, apply now to join our team at Reliant Business Information Systems Private Limited!                "
Embedded Systems,"
                            LivNSense                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                We are seeking a dynamic Embedded Systems intern with a passion for innovation to join our team at LivNSense. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects involving C Programming, C++ Programming, Internet of Things (IoT), Object Oriented Programming (OOP), Data Structures, Algorithms, and ARM Microcontroller.

Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our team to design and develop embedded systems solutions for real-time monitoring and control applications.
2. Write efficient and optimized code in C/C++ for embedded systems.
3. Implement IoT technologies to connect embedded devices to the cloud for data analysis and visualization.
4. Utilize OOP principles to design modular and scalable embedded software solutions.
5. Apply knowledge of data structures and algorithms to optimize system performance and memory usage.
6. Work with ARM Microcontrollers to develop firmware for embedded systems.
7. Assist in testing, debugging, and troubleshooting embedded systems to ensure functionality and reliability.

If you are a motivated individual with a strong technical background and a desire to learn and grow in the field of Embedded Systems, we want to hear from you. Apply now to join our innovative team at LivNSense!                "
Electrical Engineering OR Electronics Engineering,"
                            Edufeat Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Solving subject-related questions (engineering level)
2. Using methods, notations, tables and standard values from the textbook we provide
3. Solving questions using appendix tables (wherever needed)
4. Checking the quality of the solutions submitted by the tutors working for us
5. Working on documentation                "
QA Testing,"
                            HEU Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Understand product requirements and translate them into test scenarios.
2. Write clear, concise, and comprehensive test cases.
3. Prepare test plans covering functional, regression, and integration testing.
4. Execute manual test cases and record results.
5. Identify, log, and track bugs using issue tracking tools.
6. Collaborate with developers to troubleshoot issues and verify fixes.
7. Assist in documenting QA processes and best practices.
8. Learn and contribute to basic automation testing                 "
Full Stack Development,"
                            OPTRENEX INTERNATIONAL PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 30,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Designing and developing a B2B website on WordPress.
2. Uploading SKUs and managing product listings on the website.                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            APEX ENGINEERING                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 /month","
                We are looking for a dynamic Mechanical Engineering intern to join our team at APEX ENGINEERING. If you are passionate about Mechanical & Electrical Product Design and proficient in AutoCAD, Autodesk Fusion 360, MS-Office, SolidWorks, Catia, and ANSYS, we want to hear from you! 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in the design and development of mechanical and electrical products.
2. Collaborate with senior engineers to create detailed drawings and 3D models using AutoCAD, SolidWorks, and Catia.
3. Conduct simulations and analyses using ANSYS to optimize product performance.
4. Support in prototyping and testing of new product designs.
5. Prepare technical reports and documentation for project progress tracking.
6. Participate in team meetings and contribute innovative ideas to enhance product designs.
7. Stay updated on industry trends and advancements in mechanical engineering technology. 

If you are a motivated individual with a strong technical skillset and a passion for innovation, apply now to kickstart your career in the exciting field of mechanical engineering                "
Tech Assistant,"
                            Supervaisor.AI                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                As a Tech Assistant Intern at our AI company, you will have the opportunity to work alongside a dynamic team of professionals and gain hands-on experience in the cutting-edge technology industry. With your English proficiency, attention to detail, and strong communication skills, you will play a crucial role in supporting the daily operations of our tech department.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Attend internal and client meetings and prepare clear, structured and concise meeting notes.
2. Summarize and circulate key points post-meeting.
3. Provide light tech support to Developers.
4. Utilize Google Workspace to collaborate on projects and streamline communication within the team.
5. Demonstrate effective time management skills to prioritize tasks and meet deadlines.
6. Adapt quickly to new technologies and software updates to support team efficiency.

Join us as a Tech Assistant Intern and be a part of our innovative team driving advancements in AI technology.                "
Electrical Engineering,"
                            APEX ENGINEERING                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 21,200 /month","
                As an Electrical Engineering intern at APEX ENGINEERING, you will have the exciting opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects in Electric Vehicle Technology, Circuit Design, Power Systems, Control systems, Electrical Machines, Embedded Systems, PLC Programming, MATLAB, Simulink, AutoCAD, PCB Design, ARM Microcontroller, Industrial automation, and ETABS. Your key responsibilities will include:

1. Assisting in the development and testing of electric vehicle components and systems.
2. Designing and implementing circuitry for power systems and control systems.
3. Conducting research and analysis to optimize electrical machines for efficiency.
4. Programming PLCs for automated manufacturing processes.
5. Utilizing MATLAB and Simulink for simulation and modeling of electrical systems.
6. Creating detailed designs for PCBs using AutoCAD.
7. Programming and integrating ARM microcontrollers for industrial automation projects.

Join our dynamic team and gain hands-on experience in the exciting field of Electrical Engineering with APEX ENGINEERING!                "
Civil Engineering,"
                            APEX ENGINEERING                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 21,200 /month","
                We are looking for a dynamic Civil Engineering intern to join our team . If you have a strong background in AutoCAD, Structural Analysis, Construction Management, Project Management, Autodesk Revit, STAAD.Pro, ETABS, SAP, and MS-Excel, then this is the perfect opportunity for you to gain hands-on experience in the field. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Assist in the design and analysis of structural systems using software such as ETABS and STAAD.Pro.
2. Collaborate with project managers to ensure projects are completed on time and within budget.
3. Utilize Autodesk Revit to create detailed construction drawings and models.
4. Conduct site visits to observe construction progress and identify any discrepancies.
5. Assist in the preparation of project proposals and reports using MS-Excel and SAP.
6. Participate in project meetings and provide input on design and construction issues.
7. Work closely with senior engineers to gain valuable insight and knowledge in the field of civil engineering. 

If you are eager to learn and grow in a fast-paced environment, apply now to be part of our innovative team at APEX ENGINEERING.                "
Electronics Engineering,"
                            APEX ENGINEERING                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 22,000 /month","
                We are looking for a talented Electronics Engineering intern to join our team at If you have a strong background in Analog Electronics, ARM Microcontroller, Embedded Systems, Arduino, and more, we want to hear from you! As an intern with us, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects in the field of electronics engineering. 

Key responsibilities:
1. Design and develop analog circuits for various applications
2. Work on ARM Microcontroller programming and embedded systems development
3. Design and implement PCB layouts for electronic devices
4. Explore Internet of Things (IoT) applications and integration
5. Assist with VLSI design and signal processing tasks
6. Collaborate on power electronics and control systems projects
7. Utilize MATLAB, Simulink, Proteus Design Suite, Raspberry Pi, and Verilog for various engineering tasks 

If you are passionate about electronics engineering and eager to learn and grow in a dynamic work environment, apply now to join our team                "
XR-VR Unity Developer,"
                            Bhavesh K                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,500 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Develop interactive VR experiences using Unity for the Meta Quest/Pico platform.
2. Integrate and optimize assets, UI, and interactions tailored for immersive environments.
3. Work with Meta (Oculus) SDKs, OpenXR, and related VR tools/APIs.
4. Test, debug, and optimize applications for performance and stability.
5. Collaborate with team members to deliver high-quality XR solutions on time.                "
Java Development,"
                            TwiLearn EduTech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                Are you a Java enthusiast looking to kickstart your career in software development? TwiLearn EduTech Private Limited is seeking a dynamic Java Development intern to join our team! As an intern, you will have the opportunity to hone your skills in Java, MySQL, JSP, J2EE, Hibernate ORM, and Spring MVC while working on exciting projects that aim to revolutionize the education industry. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with senior developers to design and implement software solutions using Java technologies.
2. Develop and maintain web applications using JSP, J2EE, and Spring MVC frameworks.
3. Utilize Hibernate ORM to manage data persistence and database interactions.
4. Participate in code reviews and contribute to the continuous improvement of coding standards.
5. Troubleshoot and debug complex issues in existing applications to ensure optimal performance.
6. Research and stay updated on the latest Java trends and technologies to enhance your skill set.
7. Assist in testing and quality assurance processes to deliver high-quality software products. 

Join us at TwiLearn EduTech to gain hands-on experience and take your Java development skills to the next level!                "
Python Development,"
                            TwiLearn EduTech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                As a Python Development intern at TwiLearn EduTech Private Limited, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects in the field of education technology. Your knowledge in HTML, CSS, Python, Django, Machine Learning, and REST API will be put to the test as you collaborate with our team of experienced developers. This internship will provide you with hands-on experience and valuable skills that will enhance your career in the tech industry.

Key Responsibilities:
1. Assist in the development and maintenance of web applications using Python, Django, HTML, and CSS.
2. Implement machine learning algorithms to improve the functionality of our education platforms.
3. Collaborate with team members to design and develop REST APIs for seamless integration of various systems.
4. Troubleshoot and debug issues in existing codebase to ensure smooth functioning of our applications.
5. Research and stay updated on the latest trends and technologies in the field of software development.
6. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve code quality.
7. Contribute innovative ideas to enhance the user experience and overall performance of our products.                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Humanity Founders                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 6,000 /month","
                Are you a talented WordPress Development intern looking to make a difference? Join our team at Humanity Founders and help us create a positive impact on the world! We are seeking an enthusiastic individual who is proficient in PHP, WordPress, JavaScript, SEO, CSS, and HTML.

Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our team to design and develop customized WordPress websites for our nonprofit organization.
2. Implement SEO best practices to increase our online visibility and drive traffic to our website.
3. Troubleshoot and resolve any technical issues that may arise with our website.
4. Assist in maintaining and updating content on our WordPress site.
5. Optimize website performance and user experience through CSS and HTML enhancements.
6. Stay current with industry trends and technologies to continually improve our online presence.
7. Contribute creative ideas and solutions to enhance our digital outreach efforts.

If you are passionate about using your skills to support a worthy cause, apply now to be a part of our dynamic team!                "
Information Technology,"
                            Cynergi                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                1. Offer initial support for desktop and laptop hardware and software concerns
2. Diagnose and resolve technical problems, encompassing both hardware and software glitches
3. Install, set up, and upgrade computer systems and software as required
4. Manage and uphold our local area network (LAN) infrastructure
5. Rectify network connectivity problems swiftly and implement solutions
6. Safeguard network integrity by monitoring for potential threats and enforcing security protocols
7. Assist in the integration of new software products and technologies
8. Provide ongoing assistance for software applications, tackling user issues and technical hitches
9. Conduct user training sessions to ensure proficient use of software and technology tools
10. Keep accurate records of all IT-related activities, including software licenses, hardware inventory, and network configurations
11. Generate regular reports on IT performance, challenges, and resolutions for management evaluation                "
ReactJS Development,"
                            GrowMeOrganic Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                You'll exposed to a bunch of things which is going to upgrade your React Skills to next level.



1. Assist with the development of web applications using React
2. Write clean and maintainable code
3. Collaborate with the development team to meet project timelines and deliverables
4. Test and debug code to ensure optimal performance
5. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback
6. Work on document code and processes for future reference
 
Requirements:

1. Strong understanding of Typescript, HTML, and CSS
2. Knowledge of React and its ecosystem (e.g., React Router, MUI, etc.)
3. Familiarity with Git and agile development methodologies
4. Excellent problem-solving skills and attention to detail
 
Additional Information:

1. This is a paid internship position
2. The duration of the internship is 6 months                "
Digital Transformation,"
                            LST RGInnotech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,500 - 1,800 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy individual with a passion for web development and a strong understanding of Python and React? Look no further! LST RGInnotech Private Limited is seeking a software development engineering (web) intern to join our dynamic team. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects, gain hands-on experience, and enhance your skills in a supportive environment.



1. Collaborate with team members to design and develop web applications using Python and React.
2. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code for various projects.
3. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to peers.
4. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging technical issues.
5. Stay updated on the latest web development trends and technologies.
6. Attend meetings and contribute ideas for improving processes and workflows.
7. Take ownership of assigned tasks and deliver high-quality work within deadlines.


If you are a motivated self-starter looking to kickstart your career in software development, apply now and be a part of our innovative team at LST RGInnotech Private Limited!                "
Interior Design,"
                            ELFA Spaces                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Are you a talented interior design student looking to gain real-world experience with a dynamic company? ELFA is seeking a motivated intern with proficiency in Google SketchUp, AutoCAD, Autodesk 3ds Max, and V-Ray to join our team. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and collaborate with our experienced design team.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Assisting in creating detailed 3D models and renderings using Google SketchUp and Autodesk 3ds Max.
2. Supporting the design team in developing floor plans and elevations using AutoCAD.
3. Utilizing V-Ray to create realistic lighting and materials for visualizations.
4. Collaborating with team members to brainstorm and present design concepts to clients.
5. Conducting research on current design trends and materials to enhance project proposals.
6. Assisting in sourcing materials and furniture for projects.
7. Attending client meetings and site visits to gain hands-on experience in the field.

If you are passionate about interior design and eager to learn, this internship opportunity at ELFA is perfect for you. Join us and take your skills to the next level!                "
Python Development,"
                            Xtract.io Technology Solutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                Are you a talented 'Platform Development Intern' looking to gain hands-on experience in cutting-edge technology? Xtract.io Technology Private Limited is seeking a dynamic individual who is proficient in Python, JavaScript, and artificial intelligence to join our team.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Collaborating with senior developers to design and implement new features for our platform.
2. Utilizing your expertise in Python and JavaScript to write clean, efficient code.
3. Assisting in the integration of artificial intelligence algorithms to enhance platform functionality.
4. Conducting thorough testing to ensure the reliability and performance of new features.
5. Troubleshooting and resolving technical issues as they arise.
6. Staying updated on industry trends and advancements in platform development.
7. Contributing innovative ideas to improve the overall user experience.

This internship offers a unique opportunity to work on exciting projects and sharpen your skills in a fast-paced, collaborative environment. Join us and make a difference in the world of technology!                "
React Native Development,"
                            Brihat Infotech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 5,000 /month","
                As a React Native Development intern at Brihat Infotech Private Limited, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects and gain valuable experience in the field. We are looking for someone who is well-versed in React Native, React, Next.js, and Express.js to join our dynamic team. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Assist in the development of mobile applications using React Native.
2. Collaborate with the design and development teams to implement new features and functionalities.
3. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure the smooth functioning of the applications.
4. Write clean, maintainable code following best practices and company guidelines.
5. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to peers.
6. Stay updated on the latest trends and technologies in mobile development to contribute innovative ideas.
7. Take ownership of assigned tasks and deliver high-quality work within deadlines.

If you are passionate about mobile development and eager to learn, this internship opportunity is perfect for you. Join us and take your career to the next level with Brihat Infotech Private Limited. Apply now!                "
Civil Engineering,"
                            Urbanroof                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 16,000 - 22,000 /month","
                A. Inspection:
1. Conduct detailed inspections, diagnoses, and assessments of prospects passed on by the Sales (CSE) team in accordance with company standards.
2. Identify problems on-site and propose practical solutions that align with customer requirements and budget constraints.
3. Share relevant site data and insights with the CSE to help prepare the most suitable proposal for the client.
4. Accompany the CSE in final discussions and meetings with prospects to minimize delivery gaps and support the conversion of prospects into clients.

B. Execution:
1. Review and comprehend project plans provided by the CSE, making necessary arrangements for timely execution.
2. Oversee crew performance by counseling and guiding team members, ensuring smooth project execution and minimizing the gap between planned vs. actual delivery (within a 20% confidence interval).
3. Communicate project updates through daily reports (site updates, material consumption, closures, audit reports) to CSE and clients.
4. Provide relevant operational and cost-related data to management or data analysts for cost optimization and performance improvement.                "
ReactJS Development,"
                            Lume Software Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Web Application Development – Using React, Python, and MySQL.
2. Application Testing – Ensuring functionality, performance, and reliability.
3. Cloud Deployment – Deploying applications on scalable cloud platforms.                "
iOS App Development,"
                            DERIVED MIND TECHNOLOGIES PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Design and develop advanced iOS applications.
2. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define, design, and implement new features.
3. Ensure applications are performant, responsive, and of high quality.
4. Identify and resolve performance bottlenecks and bugs.
5. Maintain clean, organized, and automated code.
6. Follow best practices for iOS development and app lifecycle management.                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Dignifyd Digital Solutions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,500 - 25,000 /month","
                1. Designing and building the website front-end
2. Creating the website architecture
3. Designing and managing the website back-end including database and server integration
4. Generating WordPress themes and plugins
5. Conducting website performance tests
6. Troubleshooting content issues
7. Conducting WordPress training with the client
8. Monitoring the performance of the live website                "
Grafana,"
                            Jampot Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Assisting in designing, building, and maintaining Grafana dashboards for various applications and systems.
2. Collaborating with the IT/DevOps team to collect, integrate, and visualize data from multiple sources.
3. Monitoring system performance metrics and alerting setups.
4. Helping in troubleshooting and improving existing dashboards for better insights.
5. Documenting dashboard configurations, alerts, and data sources.
6. Learning and applying best practices for data visualization and monitoring.                "
Research And Development,"
                            Talrn                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 5,000 /month","
                We’re seeking a curious, driven, and detail-oriented research & development intern to join our innovation team. This internship offers hands-on experience in exploring new technologies, conducting experiments, and contributing to the development of cutting-edge solutions. If you thrive on solving complex problems and love turning ideas into reality, this is your playground.



1. Assist in designing and executing research experiments and prototypes
2. Collect, analyze, and interpret data to support product development
3. Collaborate with cross-functional teams including engineering, product, and design
4. Document findings, prepare reports, and present insights to stakeholders
5. Stay updated on emerging trends, technologies, and academic literature
6. Support patent research and technical documentation as needed                "
Backend Development,"
                            Primetrade.ai                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 /month","
                1. Designing and developing secure, scalable backend systems.
2. Building robust backend APIs to support application functionality.
3. Creating a basic frontend interface to demonstrate and interact with the developed APIs.
4. Writing clean, efficient, and well-documented code.
5. Collaborating with the team to integrate backend services with frontend components.
6. Debugging and resolving technical issues as they arise.
7. Staying updated with industry best practices in backend development.                "
Mobile App Testing,"
                            PRAM                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 11,000 - 11,002 /month","
                Are you a passionate individual with a keen eye for detail and a strong understanding of Software Testing? Join PRAM Company as a Mobile App Testing intern and take your skills to the next level! As part of our dynamic team, you will have the opportunity to test and ensure the functionality and usability of our mobile applications. This hands-on role will give you the chance to work closely with our development team and gain valuable experience in the tech industry. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Conduct thorough testing of mobile applications to identify bugs and defects
2. Create detailed test plans and test cases to ensure comprehensive coverage
3. Collaborate with developers to troubleshoot and resolve issues in a timely manner
4. Document and report any issues found during testing for further analysis
5. Assist in regression testing to validate fixes and enhancements
6. Stay up-to-date with industry best practices and emerging trends in mobile app testing
7. Provide constructive feedback and recommendations for improving the overall quality of our apps

If you are a proactive individual with a passion for technology and a strong desire to learn, then this internship opportunity is perfect for you! Apply now and kickstart your career in Mobile App Testing with PRAM Company.                "
Front End Development,"
                            Primetrade.ai                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 /month","
                1. UI/UX quality & responsiveness
2. Integration between frontend & backend
3. Security practices (hashed passwords, token validation)
4. Code quality & documentation
5. Scalability potential (project structure, modularity)                "
Python Development,"
                            Primetrade.ai                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Implement market/limit orders via Binance API
2. Build a CLI interface for trade execution
3. Validate inputs (symbol, quantity, order type)
4. Log all transactions and errors systematically
5. Collaborate using Git/GitHub                "
UX-UI Designer And Wordpress Developer,"
                            Komiq Labs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 13,000 - 17,000 /month","
                1. Design end-to-end basic landing pages and develop them on WordPress (Elementor)
2. Design simple clickable prototypes on Figma
3. Use generative AI technologies to process business plans and extract concrete requirements
4. Occassional social media post design                "
Vessel Performance,"
                            GET Marine Management (India) Pvt Ltd - Geoserve                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 /month","
                1) Data Collection and Management
 a) Collect data from vessels, vendors, as required, and collate the same.
 b) Maintain data of allied processes as required.
2) Performance Data Management
 a) Collect and collate data from vessels/clients as required, for vessel performance evaluation.
3) Admin work scope
 a) Process optimization/development – help in continuous improvement in the team’s various processes by testing/checking of data on the PMS platform.
4) Process improvement & development
 a) Assist in the automation of manual data processes and ensure continuous process
 b) Work on improvements while working within the team to support the development of the next-generation application/user platform.                "
AI System Development & Automation,"
                            Fast Action Claims                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                Fast Action Claims is a rapidly growing claims management business specializing in handling irresponsible lending complaints on behalf of clients. We’re now developing an AI-powered automation system to revolutionize how we manage client data, communication, and claims processes through smart integration of AI, CRM, and automation tools.

We are looking for a motivated AI System Development & Automation Intern to assist in building, integrating, and maintaining our next-generation AI Call Centre System. You’ll be working on the development of an AI-integrated automation ecosystem connecting:

1. CRM: GoHighLevel
2. Automation Platforms: n8n, Zapier
3. Hosting & Backend: Hostinger
4. Data Management: Google Sheets / Google Drive
5. AI Services: OpenAI API, Retail AI tools
6. Voice Automation: AI Call Centre bots (incoming & outgoing calls)
7. Your role will focus on designing intelligent workflows, setting up AI chat/call bots, and ensuring smooth integration between all platforms.



1. Assist in building and integrating AI call bots for inbound and outbound communication.
2. Develop and automate workflows between GoHighLevel, n8n, Zapier, and Google Sheets.
3. Set up and maintain APIs for OpenAI, Retail AI, and other automation tools.
4. Build backend connections and manage hosting configurations on Hostinger.
5. Collaborate with the team to implement AI-based CRM automations for lead management and customer support.
6. Test, monitor, and optimize AI workflows for efficiency and scalability.
7. Document processes, integrations, and automation structures.                "
Content and Social Media Marketing,"
                            Bacca Bucci Fashion Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Creating engaging video content, reels, and short clips for Instagram, YouTube, and other platforms.
2. Assisting in social media strategy, calendar planning, and daily posting.
3. Supporting content creation, copywriting, and captions that fit the brand tone.
4. Researching current trends, hashtags, and viral formats.
5. Collaborating with the marketing team to brainstorm creative campaign ideas.
6. Tracking engagement and performance metrics on social channels.                "
Bounding Box Annotation,"
                            Solvitude                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 18,500 - 33,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

Core Annotation Skills

1. Accurately place skeleton key points (17-point COCO format or project-defined schema).
2. Maintain consistent alignment of joints across frames, even in cases of motion blur, occlusion, or extreme poses.
3. Draw bounding boxes that are precise, tight, and consistent across all frames.
4. Effectively handle scale variations, perspective shifts, and partially visible or occluded subjects.

Video Annotation Expertise

1. Perform frame-by-frame labeling with careful and responsible use of interpolation/propagation tools.
2. Ensure temporal consistency of skeletons and bounding boxes across video sequences.
3. Detect and correct annotation drift in long or complex video segments.
4. Balance speed with accuracy to deliver high-quality results on large datasets.

Note: Interns will be expected to meet daily annotation targets as per project requirements.                "
Video Annotation Executive,"
                            Solvitude                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 18,500 - 33,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

Core Annotation Skills
1. Accurate placement of skeleton key points (17-point common object in context or project-defined schema).
2. Consistent alignment of joints across frames, even under motion blur, occlusion, or extreme poses.
3. Precise drawing of bounding boxes that are tight, consistent, and smooth across frames.
4. Handling scale changes, perspective shifts, and partially visible/occluded subjects.

Video Annotation Expertise
1. Skilled in frame-by-frame labeling and responsible use of interpolation/propagation.
2. Ensures temporal consistency in skeletons and bounding boxes across sequences.
3. Detects and corrects annotation drift over long video segments.
4. Balances efficiency with precision in complex or high-volume datasets.

Note: There will be a daily target.                "
DevOps Oriented Full-Stack Engineer,"
                            CodeIncubate                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 - 35,000 /month","
                1. Assist in building and maintaining CI/CD pipelines and cloud infrastructure.
2. Write, test, and integrate backend APIs (NestJS/FastAPI) with databases like PostgreSQL.
3. Support containerized deployments using Docker and Kubernetes.
4. Help set up monitoring dashboards, alerts, and logging tools.
5. Collaborate with mobile and front-end teams to ensure smooth API integrations.
6. Participate in code reviews, follow Git workflows, and learn DevOps best practices.

You’ll get hands-on exposure across the full stack — from infrastructure automation to feature delivery — while being mentored on modern DevOps and cloud-native engineering.                "
Quality Analyst,"
                            Sabato Exports Pvt Ltd                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 11,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about quality and have a keen eye for detail? Sabato Exports Pvt Ltd is seeking a Quality Analyst intern to join our dynamic team. As a QA/QC enthusiast, you will play a crucial role in ensuring the highest standards of quality across our products. Effective communication and problem-solving skills are essential in this role, along with analytical thinking to identify and resolve quality issues. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Conduct thorough quality inspections on incoming and outgoing products
2. Create and implement quality control processes to improve overall product quality
3. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to address quality issues in a timely manner
4. Analyze data and generate reports to track quality metrics and trends
5. Assist in developing and implementing training programs for quality assurance
6. Participate in root cause analysis and corrective action plans for quality discrepancies
7. Stay updated on industry trends and best practices to continuously improve quality standards

If you are a proactive and detail-oriented individual looking to gain valuable experience in quality assurance, we want to hear from you! Apply now and embark on an exciting journey with Sabato Exports Pvt Ltd.                "
Web Development,"
                            NoirCapial                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 5,000 /month","
                As a Web Development intern at NoirCapital, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects, collaborate with an innovative team, and gain hands-on experience in the fast-paced world of technology. You will be responsible for leveraging your skills in JavaScript, React, CSS, HTML, MySQL, and Node.js to contribute to the development of our website and digital solutions. 

Key responsibilities:
1. Assist in designing and developing interactive and user-friendly web applications
2. Collaborate with team members to troubleshoot and resolve technical issues
3. Optimize website performance and enhance user experience through responsive design
4. Implement security protocols and best practices to safeguard user data
5. Conduct regular testing and debugging to ensure functionality and usability
6. Stay up-to-date on industry trends and technologies to make recommendations for improvements
7. Assist in maintaining and updating databases to support website functionality and content management. 

If you are passionate about web development and eager to expand your skills in a dynamic environment, this internship is the perfect opportunity for you to grow and thrive. Join us at NoirCapital and be a part of shaping the future of digital innovation. Apply now!                "
Front End Development,"
                            NoirCapial                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 6,000 /month","
                Are you a talented Front End Development intern with a passion for creating stunning websites? Look no further! Join us at NoirCapital, a cutting-edge tech company that values innovation and creativity. As part of our dynamic team, you will have the opportunity to work with top-tier professionals and gain valuable hands-on experience in the industry. Your expertise in HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Node.js, and React will be put to the test as you collaborate on exciting projects that push the boundaries of web development. 

1. Collaborate with our design team to bring creative concepts to life through interactive and visually appealing web applications.
2. Develop and maintain user-friendly interfaces that enhance the overall user experience on our platform.
3. Write clean, efficient, and well-documented code that adheres to best practices and industry standards.
4. Conduct thorough testing and debugging to ensure seamless functionality across various browsers and devices.
5. Stay up-to-date on the latest trends and technologies in front end development to continuously improve our products.
6. Participate in team meetings and brainstorming sessions to contribute innovative ideas and solutions.
7. Take on additional tasks and projects as needed to support the growth and success of our company. 

If you're ready to take your skills to the next level and make a real impact in the tech world, apply now to join our team at NoirCapital!                "
Android App Development,"
                            JSK Healthcare                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 5,000 /month","
                1. Working on the development of the app or website for the company.
2. Testing and incorporating changes based on feedback for successful app/website functioning.
3. Making and incorporating design pages or banners as per content given related to the company.                "
Backend Development,"
                            NoirCapial                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 8,000 /month","
                As a Backend Development intern at NoirCapital, you will have the exciting opportunity to work with cutting-edge technologies such as Java, PHP, MySQL, HTML, Python, Node.js, Django, and MongoDB. You will be an integral part of our dynamic team, collaborating with experienced developers to create innovative solutions for our clients. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Develop and maintain backend systems using Java, PHP, and Node.js
2. Design and optimize database structures using MySQL and MongoDB
3. Implement RESTful APIs for seamless communication between front-end and backend systems
4. Collaborate with the front-end development team to ensure smooth integration of features
5. Debug and troubleshoot issues to ensure optimal performance of backend systems
6. Stay updated on the latest trends and technologies in backend development
7. Contribute ideas and solutions to enhance our products and services 

If you are a passionate and talented developer with a strong foundation in backend technologies, this internship at NoirCapital is the perfect opportunity for you to gain hands-on experience and take your skills to the next level. Apply now and be part of our innovative team!                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Shiplee                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                We are looking for talented Full Stack Developers with real-time experience building Shopify apps. You will work on developing and scaling Shopify tools and e-commerce solutions for our platforms shiplee.click and tapzap.live. This role includes working on backend & frontend development, integrating REST APIs, and deploying real-world projects for D2C brands.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Develop, maintain, and enhance Shopify tools for shiplee.click and tapzap.live.
2. Integrate and manage REST APIs for various services.
3. Deploy and monitor web applications and internal tools.
4. Collaborate with the team to design scalable and efficient solutions.
5. Troubleshoot and optimize front-end and back-end systems.                "
System Design,"
                            International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                As a System Design intern at the International Institute of SDGs & Public Policy Research, you will have the exciting opportunity to utilize your knowledge of Feature Engineering to work on cutting-edge projects that contribute to global sustainable development goals. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborating with senior team members to design and implement innovative system solutions that address complex public policy challenges.
2. Conducting in-depth research and analysis to identify key features and variables for effective data modeling.
3. Developing and implementing algorithms to extract, transform, and select relevant features for predictive modeling.
4. Working closely with cross-functional teams to integrate feature engineering techniques into existing systems and processes.
5. Evaluating and optimizing system performance through continuous monitoring and refinement of feature engineering pipelines.
6. Contributing to the development of best practices and guidelines for feature selection and engineering.
7. Participating in team meetings, workshops, and training sessions to enhance your skills and knowledge in system design and feature engineering.

If you are a motivated and innovative individual with a passion for leveraging technology for social impact, we invite you to join our dynamic team and make a meaningful contribution to advancing sustainable development goals worldwide.                "
Web Development,"
                            TwiLearn EduTech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                As a Web Development intern at TwiLearn EduTech Private Limited, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects that will enhance the online learning experience for students around the world. Your skills in PHP, MySQL, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, jQuery, WordPress, Bootstrap, Node.js, and React will be put to the test as you collaborate with our experienced development team.

Key responsibilities:
1. Develop and maintain websites and web applications using a variety of programming languages and frameworks.
2. Collaborate with designers and other developers to create user-friendly interfaces and seamless user experiences.
3. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure optimal performance and functionality of web projects.
4. Utilize WordPress and other CMS platforms to customize and manage content for various educational websites.
5. Implement responsive design techniques to ensure compatibility across different devices and browsers.
6. Stay up-to-date on emerging technologies and trends in web development to continuously improve our digital offerings.
7. Support the team with ad-hoc tasks and contribute creative ideas to enhance our online learning platforms. 

If you are a passionate and motivated individual looking to gain hands-on experience in web development, apply now to join our dynamic team at TwiLearn EduTech Private Limited!                "
Software Development,"
                            Planys Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,500 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Design, modify and maintain various components of our system software framework
2. Support in research and development initiatives
3. Conceptualize and implement features using robust software engineering principles
4. Write software to use/control/tweak embedded hardware platforms e.g. cameras, embedded microcontrollers, input devices, wireless devices, analog/digital signal generating devices
5. Develop module specific system test-suite to ensure quality of deliverables
6. Conduct extensive testing of the ROV in controlled and real-world situations
7. Fix the issues observed during field trials and document those for future reference
8. Communicate and coordinate with various stakeholders while ensuring adoption of latest frameworks and tools within our software ecosystem                "
QA Testing,"
                            RKO Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 4,000 lump sum","
                As a QA Testing intern at RKO Services Private Limited, you will have the exciting opportunity to work with cutting-edge technologies such as Firebase, Amazon Web Services (AWS), React, JavaScript, Database Testing, and Google Cloud Platforms (GCP). Your key responsibilities will include:

1. Conducting thorough testing of web and mobile applications to ensure high-quality deliverables.
2. Collaborating with development teams to identify and resolve technical issues.
3. Writing and executing test cases to validate software functionality.
4. Performing regression testing to maintain product integrity.
5. Reporting bugs and tracking resolutions through JIRA or similar tools.
6. Contributing to the continuous improvement of QA processes and best practices.
7. Staying updated on industry trends and advancements in testing methodologies to enhance overall product quality. 

Join our dynamic team and gain valuable hands-on experience in QA testing while making a meaningful impact on our projects. Apply now to kickstart your career in software testing!                "
Web Development,"
                            Shubham Gupta                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy individual with a passion for web development? Our Company is seeking a talented Web Development intern with expertise in WordPress to join our dynamic team. As an intern with us, you will have the opportunity to gain hands-on experience in creating and maintaining websites, enhancing user experience, and optimizing site performance. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Assist in designing and developing websites using WordPress.
2. Collaborate with the team to implement new features and functionalities.
3. Conduct regular website maintenance and updates.
4. Optimize website performance for speed and efficiency.
5. Troubleshoot and resolve any technical issues that may arise.
6. Stay up-to-date on the latest web development trends and technologies.
7. Support the team in various web development projects and initiatives.

If you are a motivated self-starter with a keen eye for detail and a strong desire to learn and grow in the field of web development, we want to hear from you! Join us and take the first step towards a rewarding career in web development. Apply now and unleash your full potential!                "
Embedded Systems,"
                            MyPad                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                We’re looking for a React Native developer to build a simple BLE-enabled mobile app using Expo. The app will connect to a simulated Bluetooth device and send data to a Bubble.io backend.



1. Set up BLE connection using React Native BLE Manager.
2. Connect to a simulated BLE device (e.g., nRF52840 DK or ESP32).
3. Read and verify mock telemetry data (flow, temperature, UV cycle, battery).
4. Push verified data to Bubble.io for temporary storage and visualization.
5. Work with a provided UUID map and data schema.                "
Product Management Associate,"
                            Jarurat Care                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                1. Define user personas (patients, caregivers, doctors) and design their end-to-end journeys.
2. Work on feature prioritization to identify what’s most critical for the MVP.
3. Design logical workflows for mapping patients with oncologists (based on cancer type, financial status, and other attributes).
4. Brainstorm solutions with a balance of impact, feasibility, and scalability.
5. Contribute ideas on automation and simple AI-based workflows to improve efficiency.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            J D Jones & Company Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Build and maintain automation dashboards for production, sales, and operations.
2. Develop Excel/Python-based tools for data processing, reporting, and decision-making.
3. Design and maintain web applications using Python, JavaScript, Node.js, and SQL.
4. Integrate AI/ML features into company workflows to improve productivity.
5. Work with cross-functional teams (production, sales, supply chain) to understand
requirements and deliver automation solutions.
6. Ensure code quality, maintain documentation, and follow best practices.                "
PHP Training,"
                            Webgenesis                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 2,500 /month","
                Are you a PHP enthusiast looking to kickstart your career in web development? Look no further! WebGenesis is seeking a dynamic PHP Training Intern to join our innovative team. This is a fantastic opportunity for someone with a strong foundation in PHP, HTML5, CSS3, and MySQL to gain hands-on experience and expand their skills in a supportive environment.



1. Collaborate with experienced developers to build and maintain web applications using PHP.
2. Assist in coding, testing, debugging, and implementing web-based projects.
3. Develop and optimize database structures using MySQL for efficient data storage and retrieval.
4. Create responsive and visually appealing front-end designs with HTML5 and CSS3.
5. Troubleshoot and resolve technical issues to ensure the smooth functionality of websites.
6. Stay updated on industry trends and best practices to contribute fresh ideas to the team.
7. Take part in training sessions and workshops to enhance your knowledge and capabilities.

If you are passionate about PHP and eager to learn, apply now to become a valuable member of our team!                "
Electrical Engineering,"
                            Bleeper-INDIA                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Work on the new installation of autofill-SENSOR at the customer site
2. Do periodic service visits to the user site
3. Visit to fix issues on demand                "
Product (AI Content & Analytics),"
                            OpenPrep Academy                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 5,000 /month","
                1. Using AI tools to build new features for the future of GMAT prep.
2. Analyzing user data to uncover learning patterns and pinpoint exactly how to make our platform better.
3. Generating and quality-checking GMAT questions, becoming an expert on the test's logic and common traps.                "
PHP Development,"
                            Rise Retail & Payment Solutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Developing new modules/improving existing modules on core PHP - PDO and MySQL as per the defined requirement
2. Working on front-end to be user-friendly and attractive to the eyes and back-end to function as per requirement
3. Understanding the functionalities perfectly and code exactly as per that                "
Android App Development,"
                            Hybr1d Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Join our dynamic team as an Android Kotlin Intern where you'll take on the significant responsibility of owning and improving a widely-used app with over 5 million downloads. Dive deep into the world of app development, and work with seasoned developers to not just enhance your skills but also simplify complex codebases.



1. App Ownership: As the primary person responsible for the application, you will oversee app updates, maintenance, and user feedback.
2. Codebase Management: Ensure that the application code is maintainable, scalable, and follows the best practices.
3. Feature Development: Design and develop new features that align with user needs and company objectives.
4. Team Collaboration: Work closely with cross-functional teams, including UI/UX designers, backend developers, and product managers.                "
Software Development,"
                            Amritesh Kumar Bhaskar                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Code Writing & Implementation: Develop features using Python, JavaScript, Java, or C++ for web/backend tasks.
2. Bug Fixing & Testing: Debug code, run unit/integration tests, and ensure application stability.
3. Team Collaboration: Contribute to feature design, API integrations, and database work (SQL/NoSQL) in agile sprints.
4. Version Control & Documentation: Manage code with Git/GitHub and maintain clear project docs.
5. Problem-Solving: Optimize algorithms, handle daily coding challenges, and adapt to new tools/languages.
6. Project Support: Assist in deployments, updates, and team stand-ups under guidance.                "
Web Development,"
                            Digital Heroes                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Developing and optimizing backend functionality for client websites, including database management and API integrations
2. Managing and maintaining shopify websites, including updates, plugin configuration, security enhancements, and performance optimization
3. Building comprehensive e-commerce solutions using WooCommerce, including payment gateway integration, product catalog management, and custom checkout experiences
4. Collaborating with the design team to implement responsive front-end features that align with client requirements
5. Troubleshooting technical issues and implementing solutions to ensure optimal website performance
6. Assisting with server management and hosting environment configurations
7. Implementing SEO best practices across all web development projects
8. Documenting development processes and creating technical guides for clients
9. Participating in client meetings to understand project requirements and provide technical insights                "
Software Development,"
                            Codifinary Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                We are building a world-class observability and AI platform that empowers enterprises to understand their software systems in real time — across metrics, logs, traces, and security events.

We’re a team that obsesses over clarity, precision, and engineering excellence.
 We believe great systems aren’t just built — they’re understood deeply and improved continuously.

Our interns aren’t just observers; they are part of the journey — learning how world-class observability products are built, hardened, and scaled in production.
Role Overview

As a Software Engineering Intern, you’ll work directly on production-grade modules of CodeXray — not dummy or experimental projects.

You’ll learn to think like a systems engineer: how telemetry flows, how alerts trigger, how APIs stay reliable, and how security integrates into everything we build.
Your work will span real components that matter — metric ingestion, API endpoints, alert engines, or dashboard layers — depending on your area of interest and ability.
This is a role for builders who want to learn deeply and grow fast, alongside people who care deeply about craft and product.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

Work on real CodeXray features, such as:
1. Collecting and processing telemetry data (metrics, logs, traces).
2. Implementing secure APIs and session flows for observability modules.
3. Enhancing alerting logic and event pipelines.
4. Writing clean, efficient, and production-quality code.

Learn the systems behind observability:
1. Understand how data flows from agents → collectors → ClickHouse → dashboards → anomaly models.
2. Collaborate with mentors and engineers on code reviews, design discussions, and debugging sessions.
3. Participate in sprint cycles — contribute to releases, testing, and performance improvements.
4. Contribute documentation and internal tooling that improves our development process.

What You’ll Learn

You’ll gain firsthand experience in:
1. Production engineering practices — how we write, test, and ship live code.
2. Observability systems — metrics, logs, traces, and anomaly detection.
3. Performance optimization — tuning ingestion, queries, and storage.
4. Team collaboration — Git workflows, CI/CD, and release hygiene.

By the end of your internship, you won’t just have “experience building a project” — you’ll have worked on a living, breathing product used by real organizations.

What We’re Looking For
1. Solid understanding of data structures, algorithms, and OOPs.
2. Comfortable with Go, React, Vue, Java or other enterprise application development.
3. Basic exposure to REST APIs, databases, and Linux systems.
4. Passion to learn by building and debugging, not just reading.
5. Curiosity about observability, monitoring, or platform engineering.
6. Desire to grow into a product engineer — not just a task executor.

Why Join CodeXray
1. Work on production systems, not prototypes.
2. Learn from people who’ve built large-scale observability platforms using Prometheus, ClickHouse, and OpenTelemetry.
3. See your code go live — small commits, real impact.
4. Understand how data becomes insight — metrics to AI.
5. Grow into a core engineer — we prefer to hire full-time from within.
6. Collaborative, no-hierarchy culture — everyone writes code, everyone learns.

What Success Looks Like

After 3–6 months, you will:

1. Have contributed code that runs in production.
2. Understand the end-to-end observability stack.
3. Know how to reason about performance, alerts, and scaling.
4. Have the opportunity to convert to a full-time Software Engineer at CodeXray.                "
Zbrush Specialist,"
                            3D Spot                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. 3D modeling: Creating detailed and accurate 3D models using ZBrush based on 2D images or other reference materials
2. STL file preparation: Optimizing and converting all 3D models into STL files ready for 3D printing
3. File adjustments: Making minor fixes and adjustments to existing 3D files to meet client specifications and printing requirements                "
Backend Development,"
                            International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Are you a skilled Backend Development intern with expertise in Node.js and MongoDB? Join us at the International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research to work on exciting projects that contribute to global sustainability and policy research. As a key member of our team, you will have the opportunity to make a meaningful impact while gaining valuable hands-on experience in a dynamic and collaborative environment.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with our team to design and develop scalable backend solutions using Node.js.
2. Optimize database performance and design efficient MongoDB schemas for data storage.
3. Implement RESTful APIs to facilitate communication between frontend and backend systems.
4. Conduct thorough testing and debugging to ensure the reliability and security of our applications.
5. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve code quality and maintainability.
6. Stay up-to-date on industry best practices and trends to enhance your skills and contribute innovative ideas.
7. Take ownership of assigned tasks and deliver high-quality results within agreed upon timelines.

If you are passionate about technology, sustainability, and policy research, this is the perfect opportunity for you to gain valuable experience and make a real difference. Join us in our mission to drive positive change and shape a better future for all. Apply now and take the first step towards an exciting career in backend development.                "
Front End Development,"
                            Tellis Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with our development team to build and maintain web applications using ReactJS
2. Participate in the full software development lifecycle, including design, coding, testing, and deployment
3. Implement responsive and user-friendly interfaces
4. Work closely with designers to translate UI/UX designs into functional code
5. Troubleshoot and debug issues to improve performance and user experience
6. Stay updated with the latest industry trends and technologies                "
MERN Full Stack (Fulltime/Remote),"
                            Tellis Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain web applications using the MERN stack
2. Build user-facing features and ensure seamless functionality
3. Work on backend development tasks, including API creation and integration
4. Collaborate with team members to deliver high-quality software solutions
5. Ensure effective communication within the team and meet project deadlines                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Coding Junior                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Implement SSR/SSG pages and components
2. Integrate with APIs and manage state
3. Write unit/integration tests (Jest, Cypress)
4. Collaborate on design and accessibility fixes                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Think41                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 /month","
                1. Work across technology languages and stacks to build modern software solutions and user experiences
2. Learn to effectively use AI tools across the software development lifecycle for high-quality, best practices-tested, and well-documented code
3. Stay up-to-date on the latest advancements in AI and LLM research, tooling products, and agents, and suggest and utilize them in day-to-day work
4. Collaborate effectively with teammates across different disciplines
5. Learn and grow your technical skill set continuously                "
Front End Development,"
                            Manish Kumavat                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 22,000 /month","
                1. Build clean, responsive, and user-friendly web pages using Next.js, React, and Tailwind CSS.
2. Ensure pixel-perfect UI with proper spacing, color consistency, and responsiveness across devices.
3. Connect frontend components with REST APIs for fetching and updating data.
4. Keep UI state consistent with backend responses.
5. Manage and synchronize data using React Hooks, Context API, or libraries like Zustand/Redux.                "
Backend Development,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                1. Write clean, maintainable, and efficient server-side code using languages like Node.js, Python (Django/Flask), Java, Ruby, or PHP
2. Develop and maintain APIs (RESTful or GraphQL) to connect frontend and backend systems
3. Implement business logic and data processing functionalities
4. Design and work with databases (SQL: MySQL, PostgreSQL; NoSQL: MongoDB, Redis)
5. Write efficient database queries and optimize performance
6. Assist in schema design and data modeling                "
Software Testing,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                1. Review software requirements and technical documentation
2. Collaborate with developers and QA leads to understand project goals and test scenarios
3. Clarify functional and non-functional expectations of the software
4. Write detailed and structured test cases based on user stories or requirements
5. Define test scenarios for functional, regression, and UI testing
6. Use tools like Excel, TestRail, or Jira for test case documentation                "
Python Development,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                1. Develop clean, efficient, and well-documented Python scripts or modules
2. Assist in building features for web applications, tools, or automation scripts
3. Write unit tests to ensure code reliability
4. Identify and fix bugs in existing Python codebases
5. Use debugging tools and logs to resolve errors or exceptions
6. Review peer code for potential issues or improvements                "
Technical Writer,"
                            TeamLease Regtech                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Collaborating with teams: Working with cross-functional teams, including developers, engineers, product managers, and QA specialists, to gather information and ensure documentation is accurate.
2. Simplifying technical information: Translating complex product and technical concepts into clear, concise, and user-friendly content for diverse audiences.
3. Conducting research: Researching technical subjects and analyzing information to ensure documentation is relevant, accurate, and adheres to industry standards.
4. Proofreading and editing: Reviewing and proofreading all technical documents for grammatical accuracy, clarity, consistency, and adherence to company style guidelines.
5. Maintaining content repositories: Assisting in organizing and maintaining documentation in content management systems (CMS) or other repositories.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Itax Easy Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                As a Flutter development intern at Itax Easy Private Limited, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge mobile applications using Flutter and Dart. Your expertise in iOS and Android development, as well as REST API integrations, Firebase, and Cloud Firestore, will be essential in creating innovative solutions for our clients.



1. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to design, develop, and test mobile applications using the Flutter framework.
2. Implement user-friendly interfaces and interactive features to enhance the overall user experience.
3. Integrate REST APIs and Firebase services to enable seamless data transfer and cloud storage.
4. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure optimal performance and functionality of mobile applications.
5. Stay updated on the latest trends and advancements in mobile app development to suggest improvements and enhancements.
6. Assist in the deployment and maintenance of mobile applications on different platforms.
7. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve code quality and efficiency.

If you are passionate about mobile app development and eager to expand your skills in Flutter, this internship opportunity at Itax Easy Private Limited is perfect for you. Join our dynamic team and make a significant impact in the world of digital innovation. Apply now!                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Are you a talented and passionate Full Stack Developer looking to kickstart your career? Join us at the International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research as a Full Stack Development intern! We are seeking someone with expertise in Node.js, MongoDB, and AngularJS, as well as proficiency in spoken English.

Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our team to design, develop, and implement web applications for our research projects.
2. Maintain and optimize existing codebase to ensure smooth functionality and performance.
3. Conduct thorough testing and debugging to identify and resolve any issues.
4. Assist in creating innovative solutions to improve user experience and overall project efficiency.
5. Stay up-to-date with the latest technologies and trends in Full Stack Development.
6. Communicate effectively with team members to ensure project goals are met.
7. Contribute to a positive and collaborative work environment, sharing ideas and knowledge with colleagues.

If you are ready to gain hands-on experience and make a real impact in the field of public policy research, apply now and join our dynamic team!                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                1. Assist in building responsive web interfaces using HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and frameworks like React, Angular, or Vue.js
2. Work on UI/UX improvements and browser compatibility
3. Fix layout bugs and enhance user interactions
4. Support development of server-side logic using Node.js, Python (Django/Flask), PHP, or Java
5. Work with databases (SQL or NoSQL) like MySQL, PostgreSQL, MongoDB
6. Assist in creating and integrating RESTful APIs and microservices                "
Software Developer,"
                            RoadVision AI Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                About the Role: 

We are looking for a Software Developer Intern who is eager to learn and contribute to building scalable web applications. The ideal candidate should have a good understanding of Flask (Python) for backend development, React.js for frontend development, and basic knowledge of AWS services for cloud deployment. This role offers hands-on experience working on real-world projects in a fast-paced, collaborative environment.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in the design, development, and testing of web applications using Flask and React.js.
2. Support the development and integration of RESTful APIs.
3. Work with the tech team to deploy and manage applications on AWS.
4. Collaborate with product managers, designers, and QA teams to deliver quality features.
5. Write clean, maintainable, and well-documented code.
6. Help troubleshoot, debug, and optimize applications for performance and scalability.
7. Participate in code reviews and agile sprint activities to gain professional development exposure.

Required Skills & Qualifications: 

1. Pursuing or recently completed a degree in Computer Science, IT, or related field.
2. Basic understanding of Python (Flask) and React.js.
3. Familiarity with AWS services like EC2, S3, or Lambda is a plus.
4. Knowledge of REST APIs, JSON, and web technologies.
5. Understanding of version control systems such as Git.
6. Good problem-solving skills and eagerness to learn.
7. Ability to work collaboratively in a team-oriented environment.                "
Cyber Security,"
                            Alfennzo NextGen Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                Are you a Cyber Security enthusiast with a passion for Ethical Hacking, Linux, VAPT, and Web Application Security? Join our team at Alfennzo NextGen Private Limited as a Cyber Security intern and embark on an exciting learning journey in the world of cybersecurity.

Key Responsibilities:

1. Conducting ethical hacking activities to identify and mitigate vulnerabilities in our systems.
2. Implementing security measures on Linux-based systems to protect confidential information.
3. Performing Vulnerability Assessment and Penetration Testing (VAPT) to ensure the security of our network.
4. Securing our web applications by identifying and addressing potential security threats.
5. Assisting in the development and implementation of cybersecurity policies and procedures.
6. Keeping abreast of the latest cybersecurity trends and technologies to enhance our security measures.
7. Collaborating with our team to respond to and resolve any cybersecurity incidents that may arise.
unpaid work

If you are a motivated individual with a strong understanding of cybersecurity principles and a desire to gain hands-on experience in a dynamic environment, then we want to hear from you. Apply now and take the first step towards a rewarding career in Cyber Security.                "
Node.js Development,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                Develop backend APIs using Node.js and frameworks like Express.js

Implement features as per the project requirements

Identify issues in the code and work on fixes

Use debugging tools and logs to troubleshoot problems

Follow coding standards and documentation guidelines

Write clean, modular, and reusable code                "
IT Project Management (Full-Time Remote),"
                            Tellis Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                We are looking for a highly motivated IT project management intern to assist in managing our SaaS projects, ensuring smooth execution, and coordinating between teams. This role is perfect for web developers and AI/ML candidates who want to gain exposure to project management while working in an environment that involves coding, AI applications, and the complete software development lifecycle. You’ll get hands-on experience collaborating with developers and learning how to manage real-world tech projects effectively.



1. Assist in managing multiple SaaS projects, ensuring timely delivery
2. Coordinate with developers, designers, and stakeholders to track project progress
3. Maintain project documentation, timelines, and reports
4. Identify project risks and suggest mitigation strategies
5. Ensure clear communication and efficient workflow among team members
6. Research and implement best practices for project management in a SaaS environment                "
"IT HR, Admin & Coordinator","
                            Tellis Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                As an IT HR, admin & coordination intern at Tellis Technologies Private Limited, you will have the opportunity to gain hands-on experience in various aspects of human resources, administration, and coordination within a dynamic tech company. You will work closely with the founder and tech team to support recruitment efforts, assist with onboarding processes, and help coordinate employee training sessions.



1. Assist the founder and tech team with recruitment activities, including sourcing candidates and scheduling interviews.
2. Support onboarding processes for new hires, including preparing paperwork and conducting orientations.
3. Help coordinate employee training sessions and events.
4. Assist with administrative tasks such as data entry, filing, and record-keeping.
5. Help organize and coordinate company meetings, events, and travel arrangements.
6. Provide general support to the HR and administrative teams as needed. 

This internship will provide you with valuable experience in IT HR, administration, and coordination, as well as the opportunity to work in a fast-paced and innovative tech company. Join us at Tellis Technologies and kickstart your career in the exciting world of technology and human resources.                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Pexaworks Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                Join Pexaworks – Where Ideas Turn Into Impactful Digital Experiences

At Pexaworks, we build more than just websites—we create innovative, user-focused digital solutions powered by the latest technologies. From AI-driven platforms to mobile apps and sleek eCommerce sites, we bring bold visions to life.

We’re now looking for a Web Developer Intern skilled in WordPress and Shopify to support our web development team in building dynamic, responsive, and scalable websites. If you’re passionate about web development, love working with themes and plugins, and have a sharp eye for design and detail, this opportunity is for you.

What You’ll Be Doing

1. Building & Customizing Websites – Assist in developing and maintaining WordPress and Shopify websites.
2. Theme & Plugin Management – Customize themes, integrate plugins/apps, and optimize for performance and usability.
3. Collaborating Across Teams – Work closely with designers, marketers, and developers to bring visual concepts to life.
4. Troubleshooting & Debugging – Help identify and resolve issues related to design, responsiveness, or functionality.
5. Continuous Learning – Stay up to date with the latest trends in WordPress, Shopify, and web technologies.

What We’re Looking For

1. Currently pursuing or recently completed a degree in Computer Science, Web Development, or a related field.
2. Basic knowledge of WordPress (themes, plugins, admin panel) and Shopify (theme customization, product setup).
3. Familiarity with PHP, HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
4. Understanding of responsive web design and cross-browser compatibility.
5. Bonus: Experience with Elementor, Gutenberg, or Shopify's Liquid templating language.
6. Detail-oriented, proactive, and eager to learn.
7. A collaborative mindset and strong communication skills.

Why You’ll Love It Here

1. Real-World Projects – Contribute to actual client websites and digital products.
2. Experienced Mentors – Learn directly from our expert development team.
3. Flexible & Remote-Friendly – Work from wherever you’re most productive.
4. Career Growth – High performers may receive full-time offers.
5. Meaningful Impact – See your work go live and be used by real businesses and users.                "
Industrial Design,"
                            Pereyan LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Sketch ideas or create renderings which are images on paper or on a computer that provides a visual of design ideas
2. Develop different designs
3. Create physical prototypes of their designs
4. Examine materials and manufacturing requirements to determine production costs
5. Investigate appropriate materials and production processes
6. Produce sketches and sample designs using open-source basic software                "
Linux Kernel Developer,"
                            Vicharak Computers LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 16,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Dive into the sophisticated Linux kernel and witness the collaborative efforts of thousands of developers
2. Gain hands-on experience with U-Boot, C/C++ programming, and various Linux driver developments (e.g., camera, display, USB, UART, power management)
3. Master kernel module development, GUI creation, and various intricacies of Linux systems                "
Systems Software Developer,"
                            Vicharak Computers LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 16,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. To design, develop, and optimize software applications using C/C++ programming languages, considering computer architecture principles.
2. To collaborate with FPGA engineers to integrate software components with FPGA-based hardware accelerators, optimizing for performance and efficiency.
3. To implement and optimize algorithms for FPGA architectures, leveraging computer architecture insights.                "
Web Development,"
                            NFJ Labs Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,500 - 12,500 /month","
                1. Create, update, and manage content for 10 websites.
2. Update blog and podcast of website pages with relevant keywords and meta descriptions.
3. Manage Contents and SEO for these websites
4. Provide IT & Digital services as needd                "
Bioinformatics,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                Analyze biological datasets (e.g., genomic, transcriptomic, proteomic data)

Use bioinformatics tools and software (e.g., BLAST, FASTQC, Bioconductor)

Perform sequence alignment, gene expression analysis, and variant calling

Write and modify scripts using Python, R, or Perl for data cleaning and analysis

Automate repetitive tasks and pipeline processes

Develop small tools or modules for internal use                "
Front End Development,"
                            Ezygo Innovation Labs Pvt Ltd                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 /month","
                1. Build and enhance modern, responsive web interfaces.
2. Integrate REST APIs.
3.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            DataVinci Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                As a Junior Full-Stack Developer intern, you'll work closely with our product and AI teams to build and scale our analytics dashboard, API integrations, and data pipelines. You'll gain hands-on experience with modern web frameworks, cloud deployment, and AI-driven SaaS architecture.



1. Develop and maintain Next.js/React frontend for the analytics dashboard.
2. Build FastAPI/Python backend services for data processing & API integrations.
3. Work with PostgreSQL/Supabase for storing and querying marketing data.
4. Assist in deploying and optimizing apps on Vercel & Railway.
5. Implement Git best practices (branching, PR reviews, CI/CD).
6. Collaborate with AI engineers to integrate predictive models into the UI.

Must-Have Skills:

1. Frontend: React, Next.js, TypeScript (basic), TailwindCSS.
2. Backend: Python, FastAPI (or Flask/Django), REST APIs.
3. Database: PostgreSQL (basic queries, schema design).
4. DevOps: Git, Vercel/Railway (or willingness to learn).
5. Problem-Solving: Debugging, performance optimization.

Why work with us?

1. International exposure.
2. Work from home.
3. Fun & supportive team.
4. Weekly Friday-yay calls.                "
Web Development,"
                            Ramyoz                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Create, maintain, and update responsive websites using HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and modern frameworks (e.g., React, Angular, or Vue).
Backend Development (if applicable)
1. Develop and maintain server-side logic, APIs, and database connections using technologies like Node.js, PHP, Python, or Java.
Testing & Debugging
1. Identify and fix bugs, optimize code, and ensure websites function smoothly across different browsers and devices.                "
Ethical Hacker,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Perform vulnerability scans on networks, web applications, and systems using tools like Nmap, OpenVAS, Nessus.
2. Identify and document potential security weaknesses.
3. Assist senior ethical hackers in conducting penetration tests (web, network, wireless).
4. Help exploit known vulnerabilities in controlled environments to validate risks.
5. Collect open-source intelligence (OSINT) on target systems, domains, and IP ranges.
6. Use tools like whois, Shodan, and theHarvester to gather data                "
Pharmaceutical,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Support in conducting experiments, sample preparations, and quality control tests under supervision.
2. Maintain and calibrate lab equipment to ensure accuracy.
3. Follow standard operating procedures (SOPs) and safety protocols strictly.
4. Assist in data collection, analysis, and interpretation related to drug formulation and testing.
5. Prepare detailed lab reports and maintain accurate records of experiments.
6. Review scientific literature and summarize findings relevant to ongoing projects                "
ReactJS Development,"
                            Educase India                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                Are you a talented ReactJS developer looking to kickstart your career in a dynamic and innovative environment? Educase India is seeking a passionate ReactJS Development intern to join our team! 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our experienced development team to create and implement user-friendly interfaces using ReactJS, JavaScript, and HTML.
2. Develop and maintain RESTful APIs to support the front-end applications.
3. Utilize React Native to build mobile applications for both iOS and Android platforms.
4. Work with Node.js to integrate backend services and databases.
5. Implement Redux for state management in our applications.
6. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging code to ensure optimal performance and user experience.
7. Stay up-to-date with the latest trends and technologies in the ReactJS ecosystem to continuously improve our products.

If you are a self-motivated individual with a strong foundation in ReactJS and a passion for creating cutting-edge solutions, then we want to hear from you! Join us at Educase India and take the next step in your development career. Apply now!                "
Software Testing,"
                            Educase India                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                Are you a passionate and tech-savvy individual looking to kickstart your career in software testing? Join us at Educase India as a Software Testing intern and gain hands-on experience in manual testing, software testing, GUI testing, and database testing. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Conduct thorough manual testing of software applications to identify bugs and defects.
2. Develop and execute test cases to ensure the quality and functionality of software products.
3. Perform GUI testing to evaluate the user interface for ease of use and efficiency.
4. Conduct database testing to validate data integrity and accuracy.
5. Collaborate with the development team to troubleshoot and resolve issues in a timely manner.
6. Document test results and provide recommendations for improvements.
7. Stay updated on industry best practices and emerging trends in software testing.

If you are a detail-oriented and proactive individual with a strong passion for quality assurance, we want to hear from you! Apply now and take the first step towards a rewarding career in software testing with Educase India.                "
Google Apps Script,"
                            Red Dot Foundation                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                1. Maintain and troubleshoot existing Google Apps Scripts used in Google Sheets and Forms
2. Ensure automated scripts (e.g., for data cleaning, geocoding, and field derivations) are functioning as intended
3. Support integration of Google Forms with BigQuery via Apps Script
4. Debug and fix issues in automation pipelines as they arise
5. Collaborate with the data team to ensure quality and integrity of incoming form responses
6. Document scripts and updates for easy future reference                "
Web Development,"
                            VaultofCodes                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 5,000 /month","
                Are you a talented Web Development intern with a passion for coding and a strong knowledge of Python and Java? Join VaultofCodes, a cutting-edge tech company on the forefront of innovation! 

Key responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with the development team to create and maintain dynamic websites and applications.
2. Write clean, efficient, and reusable code for various projects.
3. Conduct thorough testing and debugging to ensure optimal performance.
4. Assist in the implementation of new features and functionality.
5. Stay up-to-date on the latest web development trends and technologies.
6. Participate in team meetings and brainstorming sessions to drive innovation.
7. Take initiative on assigned projects and contribute creative ideas for improvement. 

If you're ready to take your web development skills to the next level and work with a dynamic team, apply now to become a part of VaultofCodes!                "
Web Development,"
                            Venue                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Build and customize Shopify themes
2. Add and organize products with descriptions and images
3. Improve website layout and responsiveness
4. Integrate basic apps (reviews, payments, inventory
5. Coordinate with design & marketing teams for website updates

We’re looking for a Shopify Developer Intern to help us set up and manage our online store.                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Veerangna By Indra                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 30,000 /month","
                About Us 
At Indra Dhar Consulting, we exist to help MSME manufacturing business owners break free from chaos and scale with clarity. Led by Indra Dhar, a Business Systems Coach with 30+ years of hands-on experience in export manufacturing and ERP implementation.  We help founders increase profit margins, streamline operations, and reclaim their time, without adding more people, stress, or complexity. Over the last three decades, Indra has worked with 1,500+ MSMEs, transforming messy, manual processes into smooth, scalable systems.

About the Role

We’re looking for a creative all-rounder who can design stunning visuals, manage and build WordPress landing pages, and support our team with basic video editing. If you’re someone who loves turning ideas into eye-catching content and functional web experiences, this is for you.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Create ad creatives, social media posts, and marketing visuals
2. Maintain brand guidelines across all designs
3. Build, update, and maintain landing pages
4. Optimize designs for speed, responsiveness, and performance
5. Support the editing team with basic edits, cuts, and creative adjustments
6. Repurpose content into short-form clips for social media when required

Skills We’re Looking For

1. Proficiency in tools like Photoshop, Illustrator, Canva (bonus if you’re quick and resourceful)
2. WordPress expertise (themes, plugins, customizations, troubleshooting)
3. Basic video editing skills (Premiere Pro, Final Cut, or similar)
4. A creative eye + attention to detail
5. Ability to work independently and meet deadlines

Perks
1. Opportunity to work on high-impact projects and campaigns
2. Growth-focused, creative work environment
3. Hands-on experience with marketing funnels, ads, and digital campaigns

1. Create ad creatives, social media posts, and marketing visuals
2. Maintain brand guidelines across all designs
3. Build, update, and maintain landing pages
4. Optimize designs for speed, responsiveness, and performance
5. Support editing team with basic edits, cuts, and creative adjustments
6. Repurpose content into short-form clips for social media when required                "
Electrical Engineering,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                Assist in creating and updating electrical schematics, wiring diagrams, and layouts using CAD software (e.g., AutoCAD, EPLAN).

Support the design of electrical systems for projects like circuits, control panels, or power distribution.

Help conduct tests on electrical equipment and components to ensure functionality and safety.

Assist in troubleshooting faults in circuits, machinery, or installations.

Use testing tools like multimeters, oscilloscopes, and insulation testers.                "
Frontend Developer & Designer,"
                            Trigrexam                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Codes visually appealing, user-friendly, and responsive interfaces for web and mobile platforms. 
2. Utilize expertise in HTML, CSS, React, and Angular to create interactive and dynamic UI components.
3. Create wireframes, prototypes, and high-fidelity mockups using design tools like Figma, Adobe XD, or Sketch (coding is must, knowledge of Figma is secondary that may not be considered for final selection process. 
4. Collaborate with developers to meet the requirements.
5. Ensure brand consistency and adherence to accessibility and usability standards across all designs.
6. Stay updated with current UI trends, design best practices, and emerging technologies.
7. Conduct usability testing and incorporate feedback to improve the user experience.
Note: We need candidates that are good at coding and fronted development.

Other websites of the organisation (to more about us): https://trigredge.com/ & https://pesofts.com/                "
Data Science,"
                            Business Quant                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Build Python parsers for XML and HTML documents, and store the output in a structured data shape
2. Adopt best practices and brainstorm with the team to store and process large sets of data efficiently (500 million+ rows of data)
3. Cross-verify our datasets against other datasets and clean up the mismatched data points
4. Use Numba-based GPU computing to distribute computations between CPU and GPU
 5. Detect, examine, and decode trends or patterns within intricate datasets                "
Shopify Developer,"
                            Betatest Solutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in setting up and configuring Shopify stores.
2. Support the team in theme customization using Liquid and HTML/CSS.
3. Help with store migration and data organization.
4. Work with APIs and third-party app integrations under supervision.
5. Participate in troubleshooting, debugging, and testing Shopify stores.
6. Collaborate with designers and developers to deliver responsive, user-friendly interfaces.

1. Basic understanding of Shopify, Liquid, HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
2. Familiarity with Shopify themes and store setup.
3. Interest in learning Shopify Storefront API, GraphQL, and modern front-end tools.
4. Strong problem-solving and analytical thinking skills.
5. Good communication and willingness to learn in a fast-paced environment.

Good to Have:

1. Exposure to Remix, TypeScript, or other modern frameworks.
2. Knowledge of Git or version control tools.
3. Understanding of SEO and web performance optimization basics.                "
Workflow Automation,"
                            Global Trend                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Design, build, test, and maintain automation workflows using n8n, Zapier, Make (Integromat), and/or Python (APIs, webhooks, schedulers).
2. Set up integrations across CRMs, Google Workspace, and marketing platforms to streamline data flow and tasks.
3. Analyse business processes, map data flows, and identify high-impact automation opportunities.
4. Document solutions (SOPs/flow diagrams), and work with the team to test and refine automation builds.
5. Monitor runs, troubleshoot errors, and implement logging/alerts to ensure reliability and accuracy.                "
Product Management,"
                            Jarurat Care                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                This internship offers exposure full cycle product management in e-commerce publishing. Interns will assist in managing children’s books on Amazon Kindle, supporting market research, quality checks, launch planning, and post-launch tracking while coordinating with design, editorial, and social media teams.

Selected Intern's day-to-day responsibilities:

1. Conduct in-depth market research to understand current publishing trends and audience preferences.
2. Analyze competitor listings to identify key differentiators and improvement opportunities.
3. Identify content gaps, keyword trends, and pricing benchmarks to strengthen book positioning.
4. Review manuscripts, illustrations, formatting, and metadata for quality and structure.
5. Ensure accuracy and consistency in title, subtitle, keywords, and book descriptions.
6. Check that all listings comply with Amazon KDP guidelines and quality standards.
7. Identify and flag design or content-related issues that could affect book visibility or readability.
8. Assist in book upload, launch coordination, and post-launch performance tracking.
9. Prepare progress reports and performance summaries for internal team reviews.
10. Collaborate with editing, design, and marketing teams to ensure timely project completion.                "
Software Development,"
                            Veltrix Tech                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 4,000 /month","
                As a software development intern at Veltrix Tech, you will have the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technologies and gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced and dynamic environment. With your expertise in Java, Spring Boot, MySQL, JavaScript, Node.js, React, web development, backend development, agile methodology, Python, HTML, CSS, object-oriented programming (OOP), and REST API, you will play a crucial role in developing innovative software solutions for our clients.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Collaborating with senior developers to design and implement software solutions using Java, Spring Boot, and MySQL.
2. Developing front-end features using JavaScript, React, HTML, and CSS to create user-friendly interfaces.
3. Utilizing Node.js and Python to build scalable and efficient backend services.
4. Following agile methodology practices to ensure timely delivery of high-quality software.
5. Implementing REST APIs to enable seamless communication between different systems.
6. Participating in code reviews and providing constructive feedback to improve code quality.
7. Contributing to the overall success of the team by actively participating in meetings, brainstorming sessions, and knowledge-sharing activities.

If you are passionate about software development and eager to learn and grow in a supportive and collaborative environment, we invite you to join our team at Veltrix Tech. Apply now and take the first step towards an exciting and rewarding career in technology!                "
Electronics Engineering,"
                            Onlilo Technologies LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Designing, developing, and testing electronic projects using Arduino, ESP, Raspberry Pi, and Embedded C/Python.
2. Collaborating with cross-functional teams on product development and prototyping.                "
Field Surveyor,"
                            NexSpace Realty                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about real estate and looking to gain hands-on experience in the industry? NexSpace Realty is seeking a talented Field Surveyor Intern to join our dynamic team! As a Field Surveyor Intern, you will have the opportunity to work closely with clients and developers, utilize your photography skills, and enhance your proficiency in MS Excel.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Validating data on projects and properties by visiting them.
2. Utilizing MS Excel to organize and analyze data.
3. Capturing high-quality photographs of properties for marketing purposes.
4. Assisting in creating property listings and presentations.
5. Collaborating with team members to support various real estate projects.
6. Learning and growing in a fast-paced and innovative real estate environment.

Don't miss out on this exciting opportunity to kickstart your career in real estate with NexSpace Realty! Apply now and become a valuable member of our team.                "
Front End Development,"
                            Business Quant                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Build front-end web apps for our WordPress website using JavaScript, PHP, and CSS
2. Optimize the website to speed up the loading time of our website
3. Co-ordinate with the back-end development team and convey your requirements to them
4. Help formulate an effective, responsive design and turn it into a working plugin                "
Product Management,"
                            Actolap Solutions India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Company Overview:

 About Antrika Technologies LLP Antrika Technologies LLP is a fast-growing technology company focused on building innovative SaaS products that simplify business operations. We aim to empower organizations with modern, user-friendly and AI solutions that enhance productivity, communication, and customer engagement. Our vision is to drive digital transformation for businesses of all sizes. 

About Flostr:

 Flostr is one of Antrika Technologies’ flagship products – a powerful WhatsApp Automation and Marketing Platform. It enables businesses to streamline communication, automate workflows, and scale customer engagement with ease. Designed for modern marketing and sales teams, Flostr combines automation, analytics, and personalization to help businesses maximize ROI from WhatsApp as a channel. 

Job Description: 

We are looking for a Product Intern who will work closely with our product, design and technology teams to optimize Flostr’s WhatsApp Automation platform. The intern will assist in researching competitors, helping improve product workflows, gathering requirements, analyzing user feedbacks. 

Responsibilities: 

● Conduct competitor research and market analysis to identify trends.
 ● Collaborate with cross-functional teams (design, tech, marketing, sales) for feature enhancements.
 ● Assist in creating and maintaining product requirement documents (PRDs). 
● Analyze user feedback and suggest improvements in product usability.
 ● Support in testing new features and documenting bugs/issues. 
● Help in preparing product presentations, demos, and training material. 

Requirements: 

● Currently pursuing/completed a degree in Business, Engineering, Computer Science, or related field. 
● Strong interest in SaaS, B2B software, or marketing platforms.
 ● Basic understanding of Product Management lifecycle. 
● Excellent communication and analytical skills. 
● Proficiency in MS Office/Google Workspace; knowledge of tools like JIRA, Trello, or Notion is a plus. 
● Ability to work independently and manage tasks with attention to detail. What You’ll Gain 
● Hands-on experience working in a fast-paced SaaS product startup.
 ● Exposure to the WhatsApp Automation & MarTech industry. 
● Opportunity to learn product lifecycle management, feature building, and user research. 
● Certificate of Internship & potential for PPO (Pre-Placement Offer) based on Performance. 

Compensation: 

● Duration: 3 Months (Internship) 
● stipend: ₹10,000/- per month
 ● Working Days: Monday to Saturday (alternative Saturday's off). The fifth saturday of the month will be working 
● Working Hours: 10 AM - 7 PM 
● Post successful completion of training: Based on performance during the internship, Full-time CTC starting from ₹4 LPA Location: Noida (No Remote) 

Address: 

BCN 10,12 Logix Infotech Park, D Block Plot No: D - 5, Vishwakarma Rd, Sector 59 Noida, Uttar Pradesh, 201301 Landmark: Sector 59 Metro Station                "
Robotics,"
                            NK Engineering                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 18,000 /month","
                Are you a robotics enthusiast looking for an exciting internship opportunity? Join us at NK Engineering and showcase your skills in 3D modelling, CAD designing and structural simulations! As a robotics intern, you will have the chance to work on cutting-edge projects and gain valuable hands-on experience.



1. Design and develop robotics systems using Autodesk Fusion 360, SolidWorks or AutoCAD.
2. Program and troubleshoot robotics systems using Python.
3. Utilize 3D Printing technology to create prototypes and parts for robotics projects.
4. Collaborate with the engineering team to brainstorm and implement innovative solutions.
5. Assist in testing and evaluating the performance of robotics systems.
6. Create detailed 3D models for various components of robotics systems.
7. Contribute to the overall success of projects by providing support and expertise in robotics technologies.

Don't miss out on this amazing opportunity to learn and grow in the field of robotics! Apply now and take the first step towards a rewarding career at NK Engineering.                "
SQL Developer,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                1. Create and test SQL queries to retrieve, insert, update, or delete data
2. Write JOINs, subqueries, and aggregate functions for business reports
3. Optimize slow-running queries and improve database performance
4. Assist in designing and updating database schemas (tables, indexes, views)
5. Help maintain data integrity and normalization standards
6. Document database structures and relationships                "
Site Engineering - Interior Design,"
                            RNJ Infratech Pvt. Ltd.                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Working on reporting and collating information
2. Making site visits and updates
3. Working on basic design                "
React Native Development,"
                            Sihari Labs Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Develop core UI screens and app navigation using React Native
2. Integrate video streaming and playback functionalities (e.g., AWS S3, CloudFront, Firebase, or similar)
3. Handle user authentication, video uploads, and streaming APIs
4. Optimize app performance and responsiveness
5. Participate in code reviews and testing                "
Software Development Engineering (Web),"
                            Sunlight Sports Studio LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Web Development: Build and maintain modern, responsive websites.
2. E-commerce: Develop, customize, and maintain online storefronts on the Shopify platform.
3. B2B Internal Tools: Create custom web applications to streamline internal business-to-business (B2B) operations.                "
Web Development,"
                            Serve Amigo Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with our team to design and develop responsive websites and web applications
2. Implement web services and APIs to enhance user experience and functionality
3. Utilize HTML, JavaScript, and other technologies to create dynamic and interactive web pages
4. Optimize websites for speed and performance using HTTP and REST API best practices
5. Work with frameworks such as React, Netlify, and WordPress to build scalable web solutions
6. Experiment with Flutter and Node.js to explore new ways of creating engaging web experiences
7. Manage databases using MySQL and utilize tools like Context API to streamline data management processes                "
Full Stack Developer – Enterprise Software & System Integration,"
                            UnifyXperts                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                As a full stack development intern at UnifyXperts, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain valuable hands-on experience. Join our dynamic team and contribute to creating innovative solutions!

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include: 

1. Enterprise software configuration: Customize business management software to meet specific client requirements across various industries
2. API integration development: Build robust connections between enterprise systems and third-party platforms (payment gateways, e-commerce, logistics, accounting software)
3. Business automation scripts: Write and optimize JavaScript (client-side) and Python (server-side) scripts to automate business processes and enhance user workflows
4. Cross-industry experience: Every six months, work with different business domains (Manufacturing → Retail → Services → Healthcare) to build versatile implementation skills
5. Integration innovation: Participate in quarterly ""integration challenges"" connecting enterprise software with emerging platforms
6. Technical documentation: Create implementation guides, API documentation, and script libraries for the internal knowledge base
7. Client solution design: Collaborate with business analysts to translate complex workflows into technical configurations and custom automations

What makes this different?

1. Real business impact: Your integrations and scripts directly improve how companies operate
2. Diverse technology stack: Work with Python, JavaScript, MySQL, REST APIs, and modern web technologies
3. Industry specialization: Deep-dive into specific business sectors while maintaining broad enterprise software knowledge
4. Client exposure: Direct interaction with clients during implementation phases, building both technical and consulting skills
5. Open-source contribution: Opportunities to contribute to widely-used enterprise software platforms

If you are passionate about full stack development and eager to learn from industry experts, this internship opportunity at UnifyXperts will provide you with a solid foundation to kick-start your career. Join us and embark on an exciting journey in the world of technology! There is a possibility of converting the internship to a full-time job at the end of the internship. Apply only if you are available full-time post-internship.                "
Quantum Safe Migration & PQC Solutions,"
                            AvinyaSQ Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Develop Proof-of-concepts (PoCs)/Prototypes, features, capabilities, or modules, and perform research for the solutions targeted for an effective quantum safe migration platform.
2. Show definition, design and development, testing, and validation of the software.                "
Backend Development,"
                            PyCray                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Assist in developing and maintaining RESTful APIs using Django and Django REST Framework for web and mobile applications.
2. Work with both relational (PostgreSQL/MySQL) and non-relational (MongoDB) databases for data modeling, queries, and performance optimization.
3. Collaborate with frontend and QA teams to integrate APIs, debug issues, and ensure scalable, secure backend architecture.                "
Operations,"
                            AirBrick Infra Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                About AirBrick:

At AirBrick, we are revolutionizing the Commercial Design & Build industry by integrating cutting-edge technology and AI-driven solutions into every aspect of our projects. As a front-runner in tech innovation, we leverage advanced tools to design, construct, and upcycle workspaces that are not only sustainable but also adaptable to the dynamic needs of modern businesses.

Our commitment to transforming traditional processes through automation, AI, and data-driven insights sets us apart, enabling us to deliver superior efficiency, precision, and customization in every project. By seamlessly blending technology with design, we are shaping the future of workspaces—making them smarter, more efficient, and truly innovative.
 
Role overview:

The planning & coordination lead plays a strategic role in AirBrick’s execution engine by ensuring project predictability, milestone discipline, and early risk detection. This central PMO role governs project planning systems, live tracking, milestone coordination, and interdepartmental alignment. Acting as a control tower, the role bridges design, procurement, QS, CRM, and site execution to enable integrated delivery across all projects.



1. Master project planning & baseline setup: Develop master schedules and lock pre-mobilization baselines in collaboration with all departments.
2. Live project tracking & lookahead planning: Maintain weekly progress reports and lead 2–4 week lookahead planning for execution.
3. Milestone alignment & RA billing support: Manage RA milestone calendars, ensure billing coordination, and flag risk areas.
4. Risk management & escalation: Own the Delay Log, highlight risk areas, and drive escalation processes.
5. Interdepartmental coordination: Conduct weekly planning syncs, align cross-functional dependencies, and close planning gaps.
6. MIS, dashboards & review reporting: Own planning dashboards, provide leadership visibility through weekly MIS, and enable recovery planning.
7. SOP compliance & planning governance: Enforce planning SOPs, digitize tracking systems, and drive planning process improvements.                "
Intern Quality Analyst,"
                            Instawork                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Review videos using a predefined QA checklist
2. Tag or reject low-quality footage
3. Track work in sheets or tools provided
4. Share recurring issues with the QA lead
5. Coordinate with collection teams when needed
6. Act as a substitute for data collection agents whenever required.                 "
Full Stack Development,"
                            LiteThink AI                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Developing AI-powered modular nano apps for product management tools (PRD Prioritizer, Risk Assessment, Market Fit Analyzer, etc.)
2. Writing AI prompt engineering instructions for intelligent analysis features
3. Building user interfaces using React, JavaScript (ES6+), and Tailwind CSS
4. Integrating with Firebase backend (Firestore, Cloud Functions)
5. Testing and debugging across devices, ensuring responsive design
6. Participating in code reviews and maintaining documentation
7. Following established patterns from existing nano apps (Product Strategy, Design Ideation, Product Design)
8. Conducting sprint-based development - planning on Mondays, developing Tue–Thu, reviewing and deploying on Fridays

You’ll work on developing ten AI-powered nano apps such as PRD Prioritizer, Risk Assessment Matrix, Market Fit Analyzer, Competitive Gap Analysis, Feature Impact Scorecard, User Journey Mapper, OKR Alignment Tool, Pricing Strategy Canvas, and North Star Metric Finder. Each app is designed to solve real product challenges and help users make smarter, faster strategic decisions.                "
AI Drone Engineer,"
                            Oxygen To Innovation                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                1. Collaborating with senior engineers to develop AI algorithms for drone navigation and surveillance.
2. Designing and implementing embedded systems for autonomous drone operations in defense environments.
3. Conducting tests and experiments to optimize the performance and reliability of drone systems.                "
Communication Manager,"
                            QuadB Tech                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 23,000 - 25,000 /month","
                1. Executive Support: Assist in managing the founders’ schedules, including coordinating meetings, calls, and travel arrangements for partnership engagements and Web3 events.
2. Partnership Communication: Support communication efforts with investment firms, strategic partners, and portfolio companies on behalf of the founders, including drafting emails, preparing meeting materials, and following up on action items.
3. Internal Coordination: Work with internal teams, particularly project managers, to ensure alignment on partnership goals, project timelines, and deliverables, facilitating smooth information flow.
4. Industry Research: Compile daily updates on Web3 industry trends, competitor activities, and relevant news, presenting concise insights to the founders to inform strategic decisions.
5. Event Representation: Represent SIG Labs at select domestic and international Web3 events, conferences, or networking sessions, acting as a professional ambassador to build relationships and promote the company’s mission.
6. Travel Support: Assist in coordinating travel logistics for the founders and yourself for Web3 events, ensuring seamless itineraries and expense tracking, with a willingness to travel as needed.
7. Administrative Tasks: Maintain organized records of communications, partnership progress, and event details, handling sensitive information with discretion.                "
Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS) Researcher,"
                            The Asian Institute Of Transport Development                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Assist in the research, design, and evaluation of ITS applications and architectures.
2. Conduct literature reviews and benchmarking of international ITS best practices.
3. Prepare technical notes, presentations, and documentation for internal and external use.
4. Provide research and coordination support for stakeholder consultations and capacity building programmes.
5. Support ongoing projects involving traffic management, urban mobility, and freight transport systems.
6. Assist in data analysis, modeling, and basic simulation studies.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            iTech Mission Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                1. Candidates with good knowledge of JavaScript are preferred.
2. Experience working with Angular and the MVC framework is preferred.
3. Hands-on experience with Node.js and Express.js for backend development.
4. Proficiency in MongoDB or any NoSQL database.
5. Familiarity with RESTful APIs and API integration.
6. Experience using Git and version control tools.                "
PHP Development,"
                            SPIDERWEB                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 5,000 /month","
                1. Work on designing and developing the website
2. Work on coding and implementing all languages
3. Develop proficiency in multiple programming languages to support diverse project requirements
4. Collaborate on website design and development projects                "
Quality And Policy,"
                            Unibots                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Review and evaluate ad content for quality, relevance, and compliance
2. Analyze ad performance metrics to identify trends and improvement areas
3. Collaborate with internal teams to resolve ad quality issues
4. Conduct ad testing for Google Ads & Meta Ads
5. Perform regular audits of ad inventory
6. Stay updated with industry trends and advertising best practices                "
Quality Management Trainee,"
                            Amantya Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Supporting audits and driving continuous improvement initiatives aligned with ISO and CMMI standards.
2. Assist in quality audits and compliance checks.
3. Monitor and report on quality metrics.
4. Support process improvement initiatives.
5. Maintain quality documentation and SOPs.                "
SAP Finance,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                1. Entering and validating financial data into SAP FI/CO modules
2. Assisting with posting of journal entries, invoices, or payments
3. Supporting accounts payable (AP) and accounts receivable (AR) tasks
4. Helping with bank reconciliations and ledger maintenance
5. Generating standard SAP reports (e.g., balance sheets, profit & loss statements)
6. Assisting in monthly/quarterly closing activities
7. Extracting and analyzing data from SAP tables or reports
8. Helping prepare financial dashboards or summaries                "
Shopify Developer,"
                            Ridvig Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,500 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Assist in developing and customizing Shopify themes to meet client requirements.
2. Collaborate with the product management team to optimize the user experience and drive sales.
3. Troubleshoot and resolve any technical issues related to Shopify websites.
4. Keep up-to-date with the latest Shopify updates and best practices.
5. Communicate effectively with team members to ensure projects are completed on time and within budget.
6. Support the implementation of new features and functionality on Shopify websites.
7. Participate in team meetings and contribute ideas to improve our overall development process.                "
Test Analyst,"
                            AppSynergies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Creating detailed test plans, test cases, and test scripts for both mobile and web applications.
2. Executing test cases manually and using automated testing tools.
3. Documenting test results accurately and reporting identified defects in a structured manner.
4. Collaborating with developers to track and resolve software defects effectively.
5. Working closely with developers, business analysts, and stakeholders to understand project requirements and ensure complete test coverage.
6. Developing and maintaining automated test scripts to enhance testing efficiency and coverage.
7. Conducting regression testing to verify that new changes do not affect existing functionalities.
8. Performing performance testing to ensure the application meets predefined performance standards.
9. Applying different testing methodologies to suit various project needs.
10. Utilizing test management tools like Azure DevOps, JIRA, or TestRail for managing test cases, execution, and reporting.
11. Using programming languages such as Java or Python to support test automation efforts.
12. Participating in Agile and Scrum ceremonies and understanding their workflows to align testing processes accordingly.                "
Live Project & Site Visit (Kerala),"
                            Inspacco                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Prepare and submit daily progress reports.
2. Manage vendors and ensure smooth coordination across all project stages.
3. Supervise sites and oversee day-to-day project execution.
4. Gain hands-on practical exposure through live project involvement.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Everything About AI                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 4,000 /month","
                1. Build end-to-end applications from concept to production using modern tech stacks
2. Leverage AI-powered tools like Cursor (GenAI IDE) for enhanced coding efficiency
3. Create rapid prototypes with Lovable or Replit, or Vercel V0, for quick application development
4. Design scalable database solutions using Supabase (PostgreSQL) and MongoDB
5. Deploy high-performance applications on Vercel with an optimization focus
6. Develop responsive React frontends with HTML5, CSS3, and JavaScript
7. Build robust Node.js backends with RESTful APIs and serverless functions
8. Maintain code quality through reviews and best practices
9. Drive innovation by exploring emerging technologies and contributing to technical decisions                "
Python Development,"
                            Everything About AI                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 4,000 /month","
                1. Develop scalable Python applications from concept to deployment using modern frameworks
2. Build and integrate RESTful APIs and third-party service integrations 
3. Work with FastAPI or Flask for backend development and API creation 
4. Implement database solutions using PostgreSQL, MongoDB, or SQLAlchemy ORM 
5. Deploy applications on cloud platforms like AWS or Google Cloud Platform 
6. Develop data processing pipelines and automation scripts 
7. Apply machine learning concepts using libraries like scikit-learn, pandas, and NumPy 
8. Create comprehensive API documentation and maintain code quality standards 
9. Collaborate on AI-powered features and explore emerging ML/AI technologies 
10. Optimize application performance and implement best practices for scalable code.                "
Neuro Technology,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                1. Assisting with EEG, EMG, or FMRI recordings
2. Setting up experiments with human or animal subjects
3. Cleaning neural data (e.g., removing noise/artifacts)
4. Running pre-written scripts in Python or MATLAB
5. Preparing and calibrating devices (e.g., brain-computer interface systems)
6. Monitoring live data during experiments
7. Reading papers to support ongoing projects or publications                "
Electrical Engineering,"
                            Vibjuti Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,500 - 15,000 /month","
                Are you a talented Electrical Engineering student with a passion for Construction Management? Join our team at Vibjuti Private Limited as an Electrical Engineering intern! In this exciting role, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects and gain hands-on experience in the field. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in the design and implementation of electrical systems for construction projects.
2. Utilize AutoCAD to create detailed electrical drawings and schematics.
3. Collaborate with the team to ensure projects are completed on time and within budget.
4. Conduct site visits to monitor the progress of electrical installations.
5. Utilize Microsoft 365 tools to communicate and collaborate effectively with team members.
6. Assist in troubleshooting and resolving electrical issues on construction sites.
7. Participate in meetings and presentations to discuss project updates and recommendations.

If you are a motivated and proactive individual with a strong knowledge of AutoCAD, Construction Management, and Microsoft 365, we want to hear from you! Apply now to kickstart your career in the exciting world of Electrical Engineering with Vibjuti Private Limited.                "
.NET Development,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                1. Writing clean, maintainable code using C#, ASP.NET, or .NET Core
2. Assisting with the development of web applications (frontend/backend)
3. Supporting API development and integration (RESTful services)
4. Working with databases using Entity Framework or ADO.NET
5. Implementing minor features or fixing small bugs assigned by mentors
6. Performing unit testing using tools like xUnit, NUnit, or MSTest
7. Debugging code under the supervision of a senior developer
8. Reporting and documenting bugs using tracking systems (e.g., Jira, Azure DevOps)                "
Asp.net Development,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                1. Writing and editing code using ASP.NET MVC or ASP.NET Core
2. Creating and maintaining controllers, models, and views
3. Assisting in the development of Razor pages, web APIs, or .NET web forms (depending on the project)
4. Writing HTML, CSS, and JavaScript for front-end UI (or using Blazor if working in .NET Core)
5. Building and consuming RESTful APIs using ASP.NET Web API
6. Handling JSON data and connecting frontend components with backend logic
7. Debugging API endpoints and handling errors properly                "
Angular.js Development,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                Writing and maintaining code using HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and AngularJS

Developing and updating views, controllers, and services

Creating reusable components and custom directives

Binding data with $scope and managing application logic with controllers

Testing app behavior across browsers and devices

Writing basic unit tests (using Karma/Jasmine if applicable)

Assisting with cross-browser compatibility and performance improvements                "
Game Development Mentor,"
                            Young Hustlers                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Teach game development concepts to K-12 students (Grades 6-12) interactively and engagingly.
2. Assist students in creating their game projects.
3. Provide personalized feedback and support to help students improve their skills
4. Create curriculum and plan sessions
6. Stay updated with the latest trends and tools in game development                "
Full Stack/App Developer,"
                            Admunch                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,500 - 11,000 /month","
                1. Review and understand existing codebases (Web, App, and Dashboard).
2. Implement new features and optimize existing ones.
3. Fix UI/UX and backend issues.
4. Integrate APIs, Supabase services, and deployment systems.
5. Work on performance, analytics, and error handling improvements.
6. Collaborate directly with the founder and give feedback on tech direction.                "
Backend Development,"
                            Archit Dhir                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 25,000 /month","
                1. Design, implement, document, and version APIs.
2. Secure endpoints and manage API gateways or authentication layers.
3. Monitor and test APIs for reliability, performance, and data consistency.
4. Monitor, troubleshoot, and optimize AWS resources for performance and cost                "
Interior Design,"
                            Express Kitchens Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Assist in developing and executing design concepts.
2. Support in preparing drawings, layouts, 2020 Design, AutoCad. 
3. Coordinate with senior designers on client requirements, vendor communication, and site work.                "
Information Technology,"
                            Milltex Blanks Inc (New York, United States)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 25,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Work with Odoo developers to extract and automate ERP data (stock, sales, production).
2. Build Style × Color × Size × Warehouse dashboards for live sales & inventory tracking.
3. Automate key metrics — revenue, margins, sales velocity, stockouts, aging reports.
4. Design OPT (Optimal Stock) logic to trigger draft POs to production when levels drop.
5. Recommend inter-warehouse transfers based on shortages, lead times, and sales velocity.
6. Create AI-driven tools in Replit and n8n to generate reports, alerts, and insights.
7. Sync new colors/styles from the Milltex catalog to Shopify & Amazon using AI (Claude / OpenAI).
8. Automate daily Slack / email digests summarizing key performance and exceptions.                "
Robotics,"
                            Gephr Labs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Design and implement control systems for humanoid locomotion, manipulation, and balance
2. Develop and optimize training pipelines for humanoid behaviors using RL and imitation learning
3. Build robust simulation environments and sim-to-real transfer workflows
4. Contribute to the core Gephr platform architecture—kinematics, dynamics, perception, and control
5. Create comprehensive documentation, tutorials, and examples for the open-source community
6. Collaborate with external contributors and maintain high code quality standards
7. Debug and solve complex robotics challenges in both simulation and hardware
8. Push the boundaries of what's possible with accessible humanoid robotics                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            NativeSoftTech                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 5,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with the development team to design and build mobile applications using React Native.
2. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code for Android and iOS platforms.
3. Assist in UI/UX design, testing, and debugging of mobile app features.
4. Integrate APIs and third-party libraries into the application.
5. Participate in daily stand-ups and team discussions to improve product features.
6. Document code, features, and updates clearly for team reference.                "
Unity Game Developer,"
                            IDZ Digital Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 /month","
                1. Develop code for games.
2. Work on bug fixing and improve application performance.
3. Build a prototype to demonstrate the game concepts.                "
Software Development,"
                            Hello Live NA                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. -->Build cool stuff with ChatGPT — because Googling is so 2020.
2. -->Turn half-baked ideas into full-stack miracles (or at least working prototypes).
3. -->Talk to APIs like they’re your best friends.
4. -->Break things, fix them, then pretend it was all part of the plan.
5. -->Survive daily “Can we make this in 2 hours?” moments.
6. -->Keep learning until your coffee gives up.
7. -->Send progress updates that make us say “Wait… you actually did it?”
8. -->Treat bugs as plot twists, not problems.
9. -->>Weekly updates and deadlines.                "
ReactJS Development,"
                            Betatest Solutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Assist in the development of web applications using React.js
2. Collaborate with the design and backend teams to integrate user-facing elements with server-side logic.
3. Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code.
4. Participate in code reviews and contribute to team knowledge sharing.
5. Help troubleshoot and debug issues.
6. Stay up-to-date with the latest industry trends and technologies.

Required Skill Set :

1. Good understanding of JavaScript, HTML, and CSS
2. Familiarity with React.js and its core principles.
3. Strong problem-solving skills and attention to detail.
4. Understanding of RESTful APIs and asynchronous request handling.                "
Web Development,"
                            TUNGSTEN FITNESS CLUB PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Conduct research and support development tasks.
2. Prepare regular reports and documentation.
3. Test website features and identify bugs or issues.                "
Embedded Systems,"
                            XiLiR Technologies LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Preparing project-based core hardware setups for embedded/engineering domain
2. Preparing documents related to projects
3. Coding for Microcontrollers, Arduino, AVR, Raspberry Pi, ARM, etc. 
4. Preparing prototypes for drones and Arduino based projects
5. Making project videos for YouTube, SEO for projects, and writing technical matters for projects
6. Using basic engineering tools- drilling, cutting, soldering, etc. for project development
7. Teaching clients confidently about components, working, and software part of the project                "
Product Engineering (Mechatronics),"
                            Moonrider                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 30,000 /month","
                Role Overview
As a Product Engineering Intern, you will work directly with the CPTO to support end-to-end product development of Moonrider’s electric tractor and implement systems. You will bridge the gap between mechanical design, electronics integration, and control systems, contributing to real prototype builds and test programs.
This internship offers hands-on exposure to vehicle systems engineering, mechatronic subsystem development, and prototype testing.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Support system-level design and integration of mechatronic subsystems (steering, hydraulics, implements, driveline).
2. Assist in writing SOR, designing, assembling, and testing mechanical-electrical subsystems on prototype vehicles.
3. Work with product and controls teams to instrument sensors, actuators, and ECUs.
4. Support CAD-to-hardware realization, including BOM creation, tolerance checks, and manufacturability review.
5. Coordinate with suppliers and internal teams on component selection and benchmarking (motors, sensors, actuators, harnesses).
6. Participate in test validation, data logging, and issue tracking for prototype builds.
7. Document product learnings, test results, and design changes in a structured format.

What You’ll Gain:

1. Direct mentorship from the CPTO and product leadership team.
2. Exposure to the complete EV and mechatronics product lifecycle — from design to testing.
3. Hands-on work on real prototype electric tractors and farm robotics systems.
4. Opportunity to transition to a full-time role based on performance.                "
Software Development,"
                            Medical Slot                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 /month","
                As a Software Development intern with a focus on Next.js at our innovative Medical Slot company, you will have the exciting opportunity to work on cutting-edge technology that is revolutionizing the healthcare industry. Your main responsibilities will include:

1. Collaborating with the development team to design and implement new features for our medical appointment scheduling platform.
2. Writing clean, efficient code using Next.js to enhance the user experience and functionality of our software.
3. Conducting thorough testing and debugging to ensure the quality and reliability of our product.
4. Participating in code reviews and providing feedback to improve the overall codebase.
5. Researching and staying informed about the latest trends and advancements in Next.js development.
6. Assisting with documentation and training materials to support our internal team and clients.
7. Contributing to a positive and collaborative work environment where creativity and innovation thrive.

If you are a passionate and driven individual with a strong knowledge of Next.js and a desire to make a meaningful impact in the healthcare industry, we encourage you to apply for this exciting internship opportunity. Join our team and help us create a more efficient and effective way for patients to schedule their medical appointments.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Visiq Technology Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                We are a team of high-quality technologists from IITs, IIITs, and NITs. We are developing high-quality machine learning, computer vision, and  NLP applications. Are you a passionate and ambitious full stack development intern with expertise in JavaScript, Python, AngularJS, Node.js, and React? Join our team at GPT Innovations and dive into the world of cutting-edge technology and innovation! 



1. Collaborate with our team of developers to design and implement new features for our software products.
2. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code using your knowledge of JavaScript, Python, AngularJS, Node.js, and React.
3. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to your peers.
4. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging issues to ensure seamless functionality of our applications.
5. Stay up-to-date with the latest trends and technologies in full stack development to contribute fresh ideas to our projects.
6. Work closely with our UX/UI designers to create visually appealing and user-friendly interfaces.
7. Take on additional tasks and projects as needed to support the growth and success of our company.

If you're ready to gain hands-on experience, learn from industry experts, and make a real impact in the world of technology, apply now for our full stack development intern position at GPT Innovations!                "
Mobile App Testing,"
                            Corefinexperts Global Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 50,000 - 75,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

Test Planning & Strategy

1. Understand app requirements and create detailed test plans.
2. Define test scope, objectives, and timelines.
3. Identify devices, OS versions, and network conditions for testing.

Test Case Design & Execution

1. Write and maintain test cases for functional, UI, and usability testing.
2. Execute manual and automated tests on real devices and emulators.
3. Validate app performance under different conditions (battery, network).

Automation & Tools

1. Develop and maintain automated test scripts using tools like Appium, Espresso, or XCUITest.
2. Integrate tests into CI/CD pipelines for continuous delivery.

Bug Reporting & Tracking

1. Log defects with clear steps, screenshots, and logs in tools like JIRA or Bugzilla.
2. Work closely with developers to reproduce and resolve issues.

Compatibility & Regression Testing

1. Ensure app works across multiple devices, screen sizes, and OS versions.
2. Perform regression testing after updates or bug fixes.

Performance & Security Testing

1. Monitor app performance (load time, memory usage).
2. Validate security aspects like data encryption and secure API calls.

Documentation & Reporting

1. Maintain test documentation and provide detailed test reports.
2. Communicate test results and quality metrics to stakeholders.

Collaboration

1. Coordinate with developers, designers, and product managers.
2. Participate in sprint planning and agile ceremonies.                "
Robotics,"
                            Robonite Robotics & STEAM Education Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Designing courses.
2. Implementing courses in the classroom.
3. Collecting feedback, reviewing, and improving.                "
Electronics Circuit Designer,"
                            Vicharak Computers LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 16,000 - 18,000 /month","
                1. Work with a wide spectrum of hardware, from tiny IoT sensors to intricate server-level PCBs, including wireless devices, analog devices, sensors, single-board computers (SBCs), and motherboards
2. Focus on various aspects of PCB design, development, and testing                "
"Software Engineering (Python, React)","
                            Better                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Develop high-quality applications using React (TypeScript) and Python (Flask).
2. Assist with database modeling and management (SQL or NoSQL).
3. Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code following object-oriented programming principles.
4. Collaborate with the team to design and implement RESTful APIs.
5. Contribute to the creation and maintenance of automated tests to ensure code quality.
6. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback.
7. Work in an Agile environment, contributing to sprint planning and retrospectives.                "
Shopify Generalist,"
                            ThePlainsCo.                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Managing and updating the Shopify platform, including product listings, pricing, and promotions
2. Collaborating with the marketing team to create engaging content for product descriptions and website banners
3. Monitoring and analyzing website traffic and sales data to identify trends and opportunities for improvement
4. Assisting in order fulfillment to ensure a positive shopping experience
5. Helping with inventory management and coordinating with vendors to ensure timely product shipments
6. Staying up-to-date on industry trends and best practices to optimize the online shopping experience
7. Supporting the team with any additional tasks or projects as needed                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Wisemonk TA                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 75,000 - 90,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the Engineering team on end-to-end feature development
2. Design, build, test, and deploy full-stack web applications using either MERN (MongoDB, Express.js, React, Node.js)
3. Develop full-stack web applications using PERN (PostgreSQL, Express.js, React, Node.js)
4. Integrate AI-powered developer tools (e.g. Cursor, GitHub Copilot) into your workflow                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            FlowLaunch                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 10,001 /month","
                As a Full Stack Development intern at FlowLaunch, you will have the exciting opportunity to work with cutting-edge technologies such as ElectronJS, JavaScript, CSS, MySQL, React, Tailwind CSS, Next.js, and Node.js. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Develop and maintain Desktop & Web Applications using the latest technologies.
2. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement new features.
3. Optimize applications for maximum speed and scalability.
4. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure the smooth operation of applications.
5. Conduct code reviews and provide constructive feedback to team members.
6. Stay up-to-date with industry trends and best practices in web development.
7. Assist in deploying applications to production servers and ensure they are running efficiently.

If you are a motivated and passionate individual looking to gain real-world experience in full stack development, apply now to join our dynamic team at FlowLaunch!                "
Library Executive,"
                            The Literary Explorer                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Are you a bookworm with a passion for technology? Join us at The Literary Explorer as a Library executive intern! We are seeking a dynamic individual who is proficient in computer skills to assist in managing our extensive collection of literary works. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to gain valuable experience in library operations while utilizing your technical expertise. 



1. Organize and catalog new acquisitions into our digital database
2. Assist patrons with locating books and resources
3. Maintain the organization and cleanliness of library shelves
4. Assist in coordinating and promoting library events and programs
5. Conduct research and compile reports on library usage and trends
6. Provide support for library staff in day-to-day operations
7. Assist in developing and implementing new technology initiatives to enhance library services

If you are a detail-oriented individual with a love for literature and technology, we want to hear from you! Apply now and embark on a literary adventure with us at The Literary Explorer.                "
Backend Development,"
                            Cybernauts Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Writing server-side web application logic
2. Developing back-end portals with an optimized database
3. Troubleshooting application and code issues
4. Updating and altering application features to enhance performance
5. Developing web services, REST API, and JSON
6. Connecting the application with the other (often third-party) web services
7. Writing clean, reusable code with a strong emphasis on stability, security, and performance                "
FPGA Developer,"
                            Vicharak Computers LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 16,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Engage in thrilling projects and delve into various facets of our acceleration framework, encompassing AI acceleration, software acceleration, and optimizing peripherals
2. Gain hands-on experience in Verilog and SystemVerilog, mastering the fundamentals of these languages
3. Learn software languages like C/C++ and Python, and HDL languages like Verilog and SystemVerilog
4. Utilize diverse tools, including compilers such as GCC and x86, alongside IDEs like Visual Studio and PlatformIO
5. Master FPGA tools like Vivado, Radiant, and Efinix FPGAs
6. Develop adaptable skills to tackle challenges effectively and gain insights spanning from keyboards to complex servers                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            APEX ENGINEERING                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 /month","
                Are you a Full Stack Development enthusiast with a strong grasp of JavaScript, Node.js, ReactJS, HTML, CSS, MongoDB, Python, PHP, MySQL, AngularJS, and Bubble.io? Join us as a Full Stack Development Intern and kickstart your career with hands-on experience in a dynamic environment!

1. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement innovative solutions.
2. Develop and maintain scalable web applications using the latest technologies.
3. Perform quality assurance testing to ensure functionality and performance.
4. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging issues to optimize system performance.
5. Participate in code reviews and provide feedback for continuous improvement.
6. Research and implement new technologies to enhance the company's technical capabilities.
7. Contribute to the overall success of projects by actively engaging in team meetings and brainstorming sessions.

If you are passionate about technology and eager to learn, apply now and become a valuable member of our team!                "
Front End Development,"
                            APEX ENGINEERING                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about creating sleek websites, smooth interfaces, and responsive designs? Do you love turning UI/UX designs into pixel-perfect, high-performing frontend code? Join our team as a Frontend Developer Intern and get hands-on experience building real-world web applications using modern technologies.



1. Work closely with designers to translate Figma or XD designs into clean, responsive web pages
2. Use HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and frameworks like React.js or Vue.js to build user-facing features
3. Ensure websites and applications are optimized across all devices and browsers
4. Collaborate with backend developers to integrate APIs and ensure seamless data flow
5. Identify and fix UI bugs, improve load times, and enhance the overall performance of web pages
6. Maintain clean, structured, and reusable code using best frontend practices
7. Participate in regular code reviews, stand-ups, and brainstorming sessions to improve product experience
8. Stay up to date with frontend trends and suggest improvements that can enhance user experience                "
Game Development,"
                            Web3Task                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 17,000 /month","
                We are seeking a highly analytical and versatile Game Developer to join our team. This is a foundational role for a passionate developer who wants to build compelling game experiences across platforms, with an approach rooted in strong engineering principles, mathematics, and physics. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Game Development (2D Focus): Design, implement, and optimize robust gameplay systems primarily using the Unity Engine with C#. This includes developing 2D character controllers, environmental interactions, and custom physics behaviors.
2. Code Architecture: Focus on writing clean, modular, and reusable code, adhering to software design patterns (e.g., Component-Based Architecture) to ensure project scalability and maintainability.
3. System Implementation: Implement and maintain various game systems, including input management, animation integration (Mecanim), and audio systems.
4. Technical Agility: Demonstrate an eager willingness to learn and adapt to new
programming languages, tools, or platform APIs as project needs evolve.
5. Ownership: Willingness to take end-to-end ownership of projects, from initial architecture design to final deployment on target stores (iOS and Android).
6. Performance Optimization: Profile and optimize code to ensure smooth frame rates and efficient resource usage on target platforms (PC, Mobile).                "
Management Information System,"
                            Tapovan Impex Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Collect and organize data from various departments (sales, operations, finance, HR, etc.).
2. Prepare and update daily, weekly, and monthly MIS reports.
3. Analyze data to identify trends, variances, and areas of improvement.
4. Automate reports using Excel formulas, pivot tables, and macros.
5. Ensure accuracy and consistency of all reports and data.
6. Assist in building dashboards using Power BI / Google Data Studio.
7. Support management with ad-hoc data requirements and presentations.                "
Python Development,"
                            Warewe Consultancy Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                Key responsibilities:

1. Creating SaaS products in the Django framework of Python
2. Creating REST APIs in Django REST framework
3. Deploying on a cloud server
4. Experience in Node (would be added advantage).                "
Backend & Full Stack Development,"
                            PLEXO HR Solutions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 30,000 /month","
                We are looking for passionate final-year engineering students or recent graduates eager to gain hands-on experience in backend development, database design, and system integrations. This internship offers the opportunity to contribute to the development of a scalable enterprise-grade SaaS platform built on modern technologies. You will work closely with our product and engineering teams to develop robust APIs, optimize data flow, and build modular components that form the backbone of a fast-growing AI-driven business solution.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Develop and maintain server-side logic using Node.js and TypeScript. 
2. Design, implement, and optimize database schemas and data models in PostgreSQL. 
3. Build and integrate RESTful APIs to support data communication between modules. Work with webhooks and third-party integrations for real-time data synchronization. Participate in code reviews, ensure scalability and performance optimization. 
4. Contribute to product documentation, release testing, and iterative feature development.

Required Skills & Qualifications 

1. Pursuing (4th Year) or recently completed B.E./B.Tech in Computer Science, IT, or related fields. 
2. Strong command of JavaScript / TypeScript and Node.js. 
3. Experience with PostgreSQL or similar relational databases. 
4. Good understanding of API development, authentication, and data structures.
5. Familiarity with version control systems (Git/GitHub). 
6. Knowledge of Express.js, ORMs (like Prisma or Sequelize), and asynchronous programming is a plus. 
7. Curiosity, problem-solving attitude, and ability to collaborate within an agile team.

Technology Stack Exposure 

1. Backend: Node.js, Express.js, TypeScript 
2. Database: PostgreSQL, Prisma ORM 
3. APIs: RESTful services, Webhooks, JSON 
4. Frontend (Basic Exposure): React / Next.js 
5. Tools: Git, Postman, Docker (basic understanding preferred) 
6. Deployment Environments: Vercel, Railway, or AWS 

What We Offer 

1. Opportunity to work on a live enterprise project with real client use cases. 
2. Mentorship from experienced engineers and product managers. 
3. Exposure to end-to-end backend development and integrations. 
4. Certificate of completion and pre-placement offer (PPO) based on performance.                "
Electronics Engineering,"
                            Skillmission Welfare Society                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                1. Assist in creating/editing circuit schematics using EDA tools (Altium, Eagle, KiCad).
2. Perform circuit simulations (SPICE) to verify designs before implementation.
3. Prototype circuits on breadboards and assemble basic hardware.
4. Conduct testing & troubleshooting to identify faults and correct issues.
5. Use instruments (multimeter, oscilloscope, signal generator) for measurements.
6. Support PCB layout design and component placement using CAD tools.
7. Run design rule checks (DRC) to ensure compliance with standards.
8. Maintain proper documentation of schematics, values, and results.
9. Prepare and present progress reports to mentors/team.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Namekart                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy individual looking to gain hands-on experience in Full Stack Development? Join Namekart as a Full Stack Development intern and work with a dynamic team to enhance our e-commerce platform. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Develop and maintain database structures using MySQL.
2. Collaborate with the team to design and implement Java and JavaScript functionalities.
3. Create responsive web pages using React, HTML, and CSS.
4. Utilize Node.js for backend development and API integration.
5. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure smooth functionality of the platform.
6. Assist in implementing new features and enhancements based on user feedback.
7. Stay updated on industry trends and technologies to contribute innovative ideas to the team. 

This internship will provide you with valuable real-world experience and the opportunity to work on exciting projects. Apply now to kickstart your career in Full Stack Development with Namekart!                "
iOS App Development,"
                            Xenofables LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                Develop and implement advanced iOS applications using Swift and Objective-C.
Integrate and utilize web services, including JSON and XML.
Demonstrate strong knowledge of coding practices, socket programming, and debugging techniques.
Work with iOS frameworks, architecture, and SDKs, leveraging experience in iPhone app development.
Address and resolve bugs while enhancing application performance.                "
SAP BI (Business Intelligence) & Analytics,"
                            Entrepreneur Growth Lab (OPC) Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 20,000 /month","
                Are you ready to kickstart your career in SAP BI & Analytics? Entrepreneur Growth Lab (OPC) Private Limited is seeking a dynamic intern to join our team! If you have a strong background in Business Analysis, Power BI, MS-Excel, Data Analysis, Data Analytics, Data Visualization, Tableau, Looker Studio, and Data Engineering, then we want to hear from you.

Key Responsibilities:
1. Work closely with the team to gather and analyze business requirements for BI projects.
2. Develop and maintain reports and dashboards using Power BI and other BI tools.
3. Conduct data analysis to identify trends and insights that drive business decisions.
4. Collaborate with stakeholders to design and implement data visualization solutions.
5. Assist in data engineering tasks to ensure data quality and integrity.
6. Contribute to the continuous improvement of BI processes and tools.
7. Support Entrepreneur Growth Lab in leveraging data for strategic growth opportunities. 

If you are passionate about using data to drive business growth and are eager to learn and grow in a fast-paced environment, then apply now to join our team!                "
Research In Environment,"
                            International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Are you passionate about making a positive impact on the environment? Do you have a keen interest in conducting research to support sustainable development goals? If so, we have the perfect opportunity for you! Join us as a Research In Environment intern at the International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research.

As an intern, you will have the chance to contribute to groundbreaking research projects focused on environmental issues and public policy. You will work closely with our team of experts to gather data, analyze trends, and develop innovative solutions to pressing environmental challenges. This hands-on experience will not only enhance your research skills but also provide you with valuable insights into the world of sustainable development.

Key Responsibilities:
1. Conduct research on environmental policies and their impact on sustainable development goals.
2. Analyze data to identify trends and patterns related to environmental issues.
3. Assist in the development of reports, white papers, and presentations on research findings.
4. Collaborate with team members to brainstorm ideas and strategies for addressing environmental challenges.
5. Attend meetings, conferences, and workshops to stay informed on the latest developments in the field.
6. Support outreach efforts to engage stakeholders and raise awareness about environmental issues.
7. Participate in training sessions and workshops to enhance your skills and knowledge in the field of sustainability.

Don't miss this opportunity to gain hands-on experience and make a difference in the world of environmental research. Apply now to join our dynamic team at the International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research!                "
Front End Development,"
                            NayePankh Foundation                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Are you passionate about using your HTML skills to make a difference in the world? Join NayePankh Foundation as a Front End Development intern and help us transform the lives of underprivileged children through education and empowerment!

1. Collaborate with the design team to create visually appealing and user-friendly websites for our various programs.
2. Implement responsive design principles to ensure seamless user experience across different devices.
3. Optimize website performance by writing clean and efficient code.
4. Conduct regular testing and debugging to ensure the functionality of our websites.
5. Assist in updating and maintaining existing websites to keep them current and relevant.
6. Stay up-to-date with the latest trends and technologies in front end development.
7. Work closely with the marketing team to implement SEO best practices and improve our online presence.

Don't miss out on this opportunity to gain valuable hands-on experience while making a positive impact in the community! Apply now and be a part of our mission to empower the next generation of leaders.                "
XR - VR 3D Designer,"
                            Bhavesh K                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,500 - 7,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Designing immersive and user-friendly XR/VR experiences by combining 3D environment design with intuitive UI/UX principles.
2. Creating, modeling, and optimizing 3D assets using tools like Maya and Blender, ensuring high-quality visuals and performance across platforms.
3. Designing user interfaces and interaction flows tailored for virtual environments using Figma and other prototyping tools.
4. Collaborating with developers, product teams, and stakeholders to turn concepts into functional prototypes and final experiences.
5. Staying current with XR/VR trends, user behavior, and emerging technologies to continuously improve design output and user engagement.                "
Web Development,"
                            Hustlr Staffing Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy individual with a passion for web development? Hustlr Staffing Services is seeking a dynamic Web Development intern to join our team. If you have experience with WordPress, Bootstrap, JavaScript, and Node.js, we want to hear from you!

Key responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our team to design and develop responsive websites using WordPress and Bootstrap.
2. Implement custom functionalities and features using JavaScript and Node.js.
3. Assist in optimizing website performance and speed.
4. Troubleshoot and debug any issues that arise during development.
5. Stay updated on the latest web development trends and technologies.
6. Support the team in various web development tasks and projects.
7. Contribute creative ideas to enhance user experience and overall web design.

If you're eager to gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced environment and expand your skills in web development, apply now to join our innovative team at Hustlr Staffing Services!                "
Backend Development,"
                            Travel Lykke Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the development team to design, develop, and deploy web applications using Python (Django).
2. Assist in the development of front-end interfaces using HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
3. Support the integration and optimization of MySQL databases for our applications.
4. Work on cloud-based infrastructure with AWS services.
5. Participate in code reviews, debugging, and troubleshooting software issues.
6. Contribute to the improvement of internal tools and processes.                "
Car Expert,"
                            Cars24 Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Assist customers visiting the outlet and provide detailed information about cars.
2. Understand customer needs and suggest suitable car options.
3. Drive car sales and achieve monthly sales targets.
4. Conduct and manage test drives for potential buyers.
5. Support in lead generation, follow-ups, and conversions.
6. Promote and cross-sell Value-Added Services (Insurance, Warranty, Loans, Buyback, etc.).
7. Maintain accurate records of customer interactions in CRM tools.
8. Ensure high-quality customer experience during walk-ins and sales interactions.
9. Coordinate with internal teams for car delivery, documentation, and after-sales support.
10. Ready to work on-site full-time (11 AM - 8 PM) and on weekends (Sat-Sun).                "
Car Expert,"
                            Cars24 Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Assist customers visiting the outlet and provide detailed information about cars.
2. Understand customer needs and suggest suitable car options.
3. Drive car sales and achieve monthly sales targets.
4. Conduct and manage test drives for potential buyers.
5. Support in lead generation, follow-ups, and conversions.
6. Promote and cross-sell Value-Added Services (Insurance, Warranty, Loans, Buyback, etc.).
7. Maintain accurate records of customer interactions in CRM tools.
8. Ensure high-quality customer experience during walk-ins and sales interactions.
9. Coordinate with internal teams for car delivery, documentation, and after-sales support.
10. Ready to work on-site full-time (11 AM - 8 PM) and on weekends (Sat-Sun).                "
Car Expert,"
                            Cars24 Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1.Assist customers visiting the outlet and provide detailed information about cars.
2. Understand customer needs and suggest suitable car options.
3. Drive car sales and achieve monthly sales targets.
4. Conduct and manage test drives for potential buyers.
5. Support in lead generation, follow-ups, and conversions.
6. Promote and cross-sell Value-Added Services (Insurance, Warranty, Loans, Buyback, etc.).
7. Maintain accurate records of customer interactions in CRM tools.
8. Ensure high-quality customer experience during walk-ins and sales interactions.
9. Coordinate with internal teams for car delivery, documentation, and after-sales support.
10. Ready to work on-site full-time (11 AM - 8 PM) and on weekends (Sat-Sun).                "
Software Development,"
                            Mindlab Media                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                As a Software Development intern at Devloops technologies you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects and gain hands-on experience with the latest technologies. Your knowledge of JavaScript, Node.js, HTML, CSS, and React will be put to the test as you collaborate with our team of experienced developers to create innovative solutions for our clients. 

Key responsibilities include:
1. Collaborating with team members to design and develop new software applications using JavaScript and Node.js
2. Implementing responsive and visually appealing designs with HTML and CSS
3. Building interactive user interfaces utilizing React
4. Writing clean, efficient, and well-documented code
5. Conducting thorough testing and troubleshooting of software applications
6. Assisting in the maintenance and optimization of existing software systems
7. Staying up-to-date on industry trends and best practices to enhance your skills and contribute to the team's success. 

If you are passionate about software development and eager to learn from industry experts, apply now to join our dynamic team at Mindlab Media!                "
Quant Developer,"
                            QuantGlobal                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Programming and implementing quantitative trading strategies in Python, in   coordination with members of the trading team
2. Optimizing code to reduce latency
3. Conducting primary testing of developed trading programs
4. Analyzing scenarios of the various strategies                "
Web Development,"
                            CareerNest                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 /month","
                1. Developing and maintaining responsive web applications.
2. Enhancing the company website with interactive UI/UX features.
3. Working with front-end technologies like HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and React.js.
4. Building and optimizing backend APIs using Node.js, Django, or Flask.
5. Integrating databases (MySQL, MongoDB, or PostgreSQL) for dynamic content.
6. Ensuring website security, performance, and SEO optimization.
7. Collaborating with designers and business teams to improve user experience.                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            Adornment Engineers India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Conduct industrial visits and gain practical exposure
2. Apply and enhance QA/QC knowledge under professional guidance
3. Assist in the preparation of reports, documentation, and maintenance of records                "
Node.js Generative AI/ML Developer,"
                            Arakoo                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 /month","
                We're building supercharged Perplexity meets chatGPT - fully democratised and open! 



1. Build the OpenAI/GPT library using Express.js, Webpack, and ESBuild in TypeScript
2. Utilize advanced TypeScript packaging and testing tools such as Jest, Mocha, Webpack, Gulp, etc., and demonstrate comfort with advanced JavaScript build tools
3. Customize the build and deployment libraries of Hono.js and Nest.js
4. Use libraries like Next.js to build Generative AI chatbots                "
Front End Development,"
                            NDimensions Design Studio                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Assist in designing, developing, and maintaining web applications.
2. Work on responsive, mobile-first, and user-friendly interfaces.
3. Collaborate with designers, developers, and other team members on ongoing projects.
4. Participate in debugging, troubleshooting, and optimizing applications for performance.
5. Learn and apply modern front-end frameworks, tools, and best practices.
6. Contribute ideas to improve UI/UX and overall product quality.                "
Project Management,"
                            Web3Task                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 15,000 /month","
                We are looking for a Project Management Intern to join our IT team. The ideal candidate should have excellent communication skills, hands-on knowledge of Jira, and the ability to document everything with precision. This role also requires involvement in Sprint Planning and ensuring project tasks meet deadlines.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist the Project Manager in planning, coordinating, and tracking project progress.
2. Participate in Sprint Planning sessions and help define clear deliverables for each sprint.
3. Document all project activities, including meeting notes, sprint backlogs, timelines, and client communications.
4. Use Jira (or other project management tools) to assign tasks, monitor workflows, and track sprint progress.
5. Ensure project milestones and deadlines are met by coordinating with developers, designers, and stakeholders.
6. Create and maintain detailed project reports, dashboards, and status updates.
7. Support in daily stand-ups, sprint reviews, and retrospective meetings.
8. Identify risks, blockers, and escalate them to the management team in time.
9. Contribute ideas to improve project planning, sprint execution, and documentation standards.                "
Product Management,"
                            URE Legal Advocates                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 /month","
                Internship Profile: Product Management Intern
Company: Young Thames LLP (youngthames.com)
Location: C-84, Sector 2, Noida (Sec 15 Metro Gate 3)
Duration: 6 months
Mode: On-site (Noida Office)
 
 
About Us
At Young Thames LLP, we are building solutions at the intersection of brand strategy, legal-tech, and AI-driven product innovation. Our projects include SaaS platforms, PR automation tools, and digital brand management products. We are looking for Product Management Interns who can bring creativity, structure, and market understanding to shape products for impact.
 
Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Product Research & Strategy
Conduct market and competitor research to identify opportunities.
Assist in defining product roadmaps, feature prioritization, and business cases.
Use ChatGPT & AI tools for product research, data analysis, and idea validation.
 
2. Product Design & Communication
Collaborate with UI/UX teams to design wireframes, prototypes, and user flows.
Prepare MS-PowerPoint presentations, product briefs, and pitch decks.
Ensure communication clarity across stakeholders with strong spoken English.
 
3. Product Marketing & Execution
Support go-to-market (GTM) strategy including positioning, messaging, and outreach.
Assist in designing campaigns and product launch collaterals.
Track and analyze user feedback, adoption metrics, and marketing performance.
 
Skills Required
1. Product Management Fundamentals
2. UI & UX Design Basics (Figma, Canva, or similar tools)
3. Product Marketing & Go-to-Market Strategy
4. ChatGPT / AI Tools for Product Research & Documentation
5. English Proficiency (Spoken)
6. MS PowerPoint & Presentation Skills
 
What You’ll Gain
Exposure to real product development cycles from ideation to launch.
Hands-on experience with SaaS, AI, and digital products.
Training in international product marketing & user experience practices.
Opportunity for a Pre-Placement Offer (PPO) as Product Associate.
                 "
Car Expert,"
                            Cars24 Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1.Assist customers visiting the outlet and provide detailed information about cars.
2. Understand customer needs and suggest suitable car options.
3. Drive car sales and achieve monthly sales targets.
4. Conduct and manage test drives for potential buyers.
5. Support in lead generation, follow-ups, and conversions.
6. Promote and cross-sell Value-Added Services (Insurance, Warranty, Loans, Buyback, etc.).
7. Maintain accurate records of customer interactions in CRM tools.
8. Ensure high-quality customer experience during walk-ins and sales interactions.
9. Coordinate with internal teams for car delivery, documentation, and after-sales support.
10. Ready to work on-site full-time (11 AM - 8 PM).                "
Car Expert,"
                            Cars24 Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Assist customers visiting the outlet and provide detailed information about cars.
2. Understand customer needs and suggest suitable car options.
3. Drive car sales and achieve monthly sales targets.
4. Conduct and manage test drives for potential buyers.
5. Support in lead generation, follow-ups, and conversions.
6. Promote and cross-sell Value-Added Services (Insurance, Warranty, Loans, Buyback, etc.).
7. Maintain accurate records of customer interactions in CRM tools.
8. Ensure high-quality customer experience during walk-ins and sales interactions.
9. Coordinate with internal teams for car delivery, documentation, and after-sales support.
10. Ready to work on-site full-time (11 AM - 8 PM).                "
Quant Developer,"
                            AlgoBulls                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                About the Role

We are looking for a Quantitative Developer Intern to join our team at AlgoBulls. This role sits at the intersection of software engineering, quantitative finance, and AI, contributing directly to the future of trading technology. You will play a pivotal role in enhancing our flagship product, Phoenix Copilot — an AI-powered assistant that helps traders design, test, and deploy quant strategies in plain English.
As a Quant Developer Intern, you will get hands-on experience with cutting-edge trading systems, working closely with our quant and engineering teams. This internship is designed as a pathway to a full-time role, where you may take on increasing ownership of trading infrastructure, strategy development, and AI-driven innovation.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:


1. Algo Strategy Implementation
- Convert research-driven trading ideas from analysts, clients, or quants into production-ready strategies.
- Optimize strategies for latency, slippage, and transaction costs.
- Validate robustness across diverse market scenarios.

2. Software & Systems Development
- Design and maintain scalable, high-performance trading infrastructure.
- Build reusable libraries, frameworks, and APIs to support quant research.
- Integrate seamlessly with brokers, exchanges, and market data providers.

3. Data Engineering & Management
- Develop pipelines for ingesting, cleaning, and managing large financial datasets.
- Ensure data integrity, accuracy, and low-latency access.
- Implement efficient storage and retrieval solutions for historical and real-time data.

4. Collaboration with Quant Team
- Partner with quants to convert models into deployable systems.
- Build tooling to accelerate backtesting, simulation, and validation.
- Bridge research insights with scalable engineering solutions.

5. Testing & Validation
- Develop rigorous testing frameworks for algo strategies before deployment.
- Conduct unit tests, regression tests, and scenario-based stress tests.
- Ensure seamless CI/CD integration with automated backtesting and paper-trading pipelines.
Validate performance consistency across historical, simulated, and live environments.

6. Performance & Optimization
- Profile and optimize systems for low latency and high throughput.
- Distribute workloads across compute clusters.
- Enhance execution algorithms to improve reliability and trading efficiency.

7. Risk & Reliability
- Implement risk controls, compliance checks, and monitoring systems.
- Develop fail-safes, alerting, and fallback mechanisms.
- Conduct stress testing and scenario analysis for strategy resilience.

8. Enhancing Phoenix Copilot (AI-Powered Quant Assistant)
- Collaborate with AI/ML engineers to strengthen Copilot’s ability to generate and refine quant strategies from natural language prompts.
- Translate AI-generated ideas into executable strategies using AlgoBulls’ proprietary pyalgotrading framework.
- Build validation and risk-screening pipelines for Copilot-generated strategies.
- Expand backtesting, simulation, and multi-asset class coverage.
- Enhance explainability features for better rationales, risk metrics, and performance insights.
- Optimize live deployment pipelines for real-world execution.

What You’ll Gain
- Hands-on experience at the frontier of AI-driven quant trading.
- Exposure to real-world trading systems, large-scale data, and distributed computing.
- Mentorship from experienced quants, engineers, and AI specialists.
- Opportunity to transition into a full-time Quant Developer role based on performance.                "
AI Agent Development,"
                            EshiaBIM                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 13,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1)Build and productionize LLM features: prompt design, tool use, evaluation, and safety/guardrails.
2)Implement RAG pipelines (chunking, embeddings, vector search, retrieval orchestration).
3)Develop agentic workflows (multi-step reasoning, tool calling, planners/executors).
4)Integrate top models & platforms: OpenAI, Google Gemini, AWS Bedrock, Llama 3, Mistral.
5)Prototype and benchmark GenAI components; automate offline/online evals (quality, cost, latency).
6)Read recent GenAI papers and propose pragmatic improvements; present findings to the team.
7)Collaborate with backend/front-end teams to ship APIs, microservices, and user-facing features.
8)Monitor in-prod metrics (observability, drift, hallucinations) and iterate quickly.                "
Full Stack Development - AI,"
                            Yardstick                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                1. Integrate AI frameworks into full-stack projects in collaboration with AI experts
2. Develop robust and scalable server-side logic, ensuring high performance and responsiveness
3. Manage full-lifecycle software development, preparing applications for production environments
4. Deploy and manage applications using cloud services like AWS, including EC2, Lambda, and DynamoDB
5. Engage in research to stay abreast of the latest AI techniques and models
6. Write clean, maintainable code for AI applications
7. Participate actively in team meetings and discussions
8. Maintain documentation for research findings and code changes                "
React Native Development,"
                            Nish E-Service OPC Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 1,001 /month","
                Are you a talented React Native developer looking to gain hands-on experience in the industry? Nish E-Service OPC Private Limited is seeking a dynamic React Native Development intern to join our team! As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and enhance your skills in a fast-paced environment.

Key responsibilities:
1. Develop and maintain mobile applications using React Native
2. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement new features
3. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure optimal performance
4. Conduct code reviews and provide feedback to improve code quality
5. Stay updated on the latest trends and technologies in React Native development
6. Assist in optimizing applications for maximum speed and scalability
7. Contribute to the overall success of the team by taking on additional tasks as needed

If you are passionate about React Native development and eager to learn, this internship is the perfect opportunity for you. Apply now and take the first step towards a rewarding career in mobile app development!                "
"Figma, NextJS, React Native And Firebase Development","
                            Bolesale Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Develop components for our applications
2. Work on Expo and React Native Bare workflow
3. Design and adapt UIs as per the needs
4. Use Firebase, Firestore, and Dynamic Links and connect them with the application
5. Build web apps using React                "
iOS App Development,"
                            Xneuronz AI                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 13,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement new features for our mobile applications.
2. Conduct thorough testing and debugging to ensure the quality and performance of the apps.
3. Stay up-to-date with the latest trends in iOS app development and implement best practices.
4. Assist in the optimization of app performance and user interface design.
5. Work closely with UX/UI designers to create seamless and intuitive user experiences.
6. Communicate effectively with team members to ensure project deadlines are met.
7. Contribute to the overall success of In60z AI through your creativity and problem-solving skills.

If you are a talented and driven individual with a passion for iOS app development, we want you to join our team and help us shape the future of artificial intelligence technology. Apply now and be a part of something truly extraordinary. As an iOS app development intern at in60z AI, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects that push the boundaries of artificial intelligence technology. You will be responsible for creating innovative mobile applications that utilize Xcode, REST API, iOS, Swift, and Objective-C to enhance the user experience.                "
Nature Educator,"
                            MIDORI                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Facilitate bird-watching walks, telescope-gazing sessions, and other guided nature experiences.
2. Coordinate with participants to ensure smooth flow of walks, workshops, and stargazing events.
3. Document participant experiences and reflections (via photos & videos).
4. Learn and manage basic equipment (e.g., telescope, binoculars, cameras) as part of facilitation.
5. Provide ad-hoc support for event preparation and execution.                "
Front End Development,"
                            Visys Cloud Technologies India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 13,000 /month","
                1. Build responsive and interactive web interfaces
2. Work with HTML, CSS, JavaScript, React/Angular
3. Collaborate with designers and backend developers
4. Debug, test, and optimize UI for speed & performance
5. Implement modern UI/UX best practices.                "
Mechanical Design Engineer,"
                            Saltech Design Labs Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Perform ideation, conceptualization, design and development of machines and systems
2. Design for manufacturing and draft parts, components and systems
3. Plan and procure stock materials and components
4. Machine and assess the quality of parts, components and sub-assemblies as per the design
5. Apply knowledge of GD&T and select materials while scheduling with vendors and handling logistics
6. Assemble, conduct trials and perform QC as per the designs
7. Record and analyze data                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Visys Cloud Technologies India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 13,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain web applications (frontend + backend)
2. Work with HTML, CSS, JavaScript, React/Angular, Node.js/Java/Python
3. Integrate APIs and manage databases (MySQL/MongoDB)
4. Collaborate with UI/UX, DevOps, and testing teams
5. Debug and optimize applications for performance                "
AWS DevOps Engineer,"
                            Visys Cloud Technologies India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 13,000 /month","
                1. Assist in building and managing CI/CD pipelines
2. Work with cloud platforms (AWS, Azure, GCP)
3. Automate deployments and monitor systems
4. Collaborate with development teams to ensure smooth releases                "
Testing & Assembling,"
                            Intugine Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Assemble devices and components as per defined processes and guidelines.
2. Perform functional testing of hardware/software to ensure proper working.
3. Identify and troubleshoot basic issues during assembly or testing.
4. Maintain quality standards and report defects or failures promptly.
5. Document testing results and maintain accurate records.
6. Handle tools, equipment, and testing instruments safely.
7. Collaborate with the operations/quality team to improve assembly and testing processes.
8. Ensure compliance with safety, ESD (Electrostatic Discharge), and workplace protocols.                "
AWS DevOps Engineer,"
                            URE Legal Advocates                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 /month","
                Job Title: Executive & DevOps Assistant
Location: C-84, Sector 2, Noida (Sec 15 Metro Gate 3)
Companies: URE Legal Advocates (urelegal.in -youngthmes.com)
 
About Us
At ytpr.in and urelegal.in, we are building future-ready LegalTech and PR-Tech solutions that combine legal expertise with cutting-edge technology. Our focus is on empowering clients with AI-driven insights, streamlined operations, and innovative SaaS infrastructure.
 
Role Summary
We seek a multifunctional professional who can combine executive/legal support with DevOps & AI-driven infrastructure management. This role supports the founder in day-to-day operations, legal research, partner reporting, and simultaneously ensures the technical backbone (applications, automation, AI, and hosting environments) runs seamlessly.
 
Key Responsibilities
I. Executive & Legal Support
Organize the founder’s calendar, meetings, and travel logistics.
Draft essential documents, manage confidential correspondence, and ensure timely follow-ups.
Record and draft Minutes of Meeting (MoM): Maintain accurate notes, circulate actionable items, and track follow-ups.
Oversee onboarding and orientation of new hires and interns. team engagement
Manage daily operations: timesheets, milestones, leave records, and performance tracking.
Partner & Client Update Management: Prepare structured progress reports and business updates.
 
III. Infrastructure & DevOps
Set up and manage Dockerized environments, Kubernetes clusters, and CI/CD pipelines.
Optimize deployments on VPS servers, AWS, GCP, or DigitalOcean.
Manage version control workflows with GitHub & GitLab.
IV. Application Hosting & Maintenance
Deploy and maintain Next.js (frontend), Node/Express (backend), and Electron (desktop apps).
Ensure scalability, uptime, and performance monitoring.
Automate recurring tasks with n8n and orchestration tools.
V. AI & Automation Integration
Build and deploy agentic AI pipelines for legal-tech and PR-tech applications.
Implement RAG (Retrieval-Augmented Generation) systems with embeddings and vector DBs.
Support integration of AI APIs into SaaS platforms.
VI. Security, Monitoring & Collaboration
Maintain server security, access control, and backup systems.
Monitor application and infra performance using Grafana, Prometheus.
 
Who You Are
Experienced: Background in executive/legal operations and/or DevOps & infra management.
Tech-Savvy: Skilled in Docker, Kubernetes, Next.js, Node/Express, Electron, GitHub/GitLab, AI APIs.
Organized & Reliable: Strong at managing confidential workflows and scalable infra.
Innovator: Excited to experiment with agentic AI and RAG-based AI systems.
Collaborator: Can work across legal, PR, and technical teams effectively.
 
Why Join Us?
Unique Exposure: Blend of law, PR, technology, and AI.
High Impact Role: Directly supports founder operations and builds technical backbone.
AI x LegalTech Innovation: Be part of a pioneering team at the intersection of law + AI infra.
                 "
Javascript Developer,"
                            Brain Quest                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain web applications using JavaScript.
2. Work with frameworks/libraries like React, Angular, or Vue.js.
3. Collaborate with designers and backend developers to deliver features.
4. Write clear, reusable, and well-documented code.
5. Troubleshoot and debug issues as they arise.                "
Interior Design,"
                            Duroflex Kitchens                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 40,000 /month","
                1. Welcome walk-in customers and provide a professional guided tour of the showroom, explaining different kitchen, wardrobe, and furniture displays.
2.Assist customers in selecting finishes, colors, and layouts from available catalogues and samples.
3.Prepare initial 2D drawings and 3D views for clients based on site requirements and discussions.
4.Visit client sites (as required) for measurements, inspections, and requirement gathering.                "
ArcGIS,"
                            Arbor Research India                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 22,500 /month","
                1. Develop maps using ArcGIS
2. Use KML and shapefiles, and data from third-party solutions to generate unique maps                "
E-Commerce Business Management,"
                            Talent Corner HR Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 lump sum","
                A. Website Content Management:

1. Maintain and update website content, such as product descriptions, blog articles, and other static pages.
2. Make content accurate, engaging, and search engine optimized (SEO).

B. E-Commerce Management:

1. Update product listings on the WooCommerce platform, including adding new items, updating current product details, and maintaining accurate prices and stock.
2. Optimize product listings for conversion, including crafting strong product descriptions, choosing high-quality images, and using relevant keywords.
3. Track website analytics and determine areas to improve from a user experience and sales standpoint.

C. Vendor Onboarding:

1. Get new vendors up onto the e-commerce platform, such as providing them with information and training for usage of the platform.
2. Help vendors develop and maintain their product listings.
3. Facilitate communication between vendors and the company.

D. Other Tasks:

1. Provide help with other tasks related to the e-commerce as needed.
2. Attend team meetings and add ideas to brainstorming sessions.                "
Product Management,"
                            Bosscoder Academy                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Respond to customer inquiries via email, chat, and calls in a timely and professional manner.
2. Assist in troubleshooting and providing accurate solutions to customer issues.
3. Document, track, and follow up on customer interactions and feedback.
4. Collaborate with internal teams (Sales, Product, Operations) to resolve issues effectively.                "
CAD Design,"
                            Gurutvaa Systems Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Engage in mechanical design
2. Prepare CAD model for systems
3. Coordinate with supplier for 3D printing the concept
4. Integrate the systems and validation

Only 2025 passed out candidate may apply                "
Tech Trainer,"
                            ENpower                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Teach block-based coding using visual programming. 
2. Conduct sessions on 3D design, Tinkercad, electronics, and simulations. 
3. Guide students in creating mobile apps using MIT App Inventor. 
4. Ensure hands-on and activity-based learning. 
5. Regularly visit assigned schools and maintain attendance/ feedback records. 
6. Inspire young minds and promote innovation through fun learning.                "
Vibe Coders,"
                            Stirring Minds                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Are you a talented Vibe Coder looking to kickstart your career in the tech industry? Stirring Minds is seeking a dynamic intern to join our team and bring their innovative ideas to life! As a Vibe Coders intern, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects in web development and artificial intelligence. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with our team of developers to design and implement Vibe Coding solutions for our clients.
2. Assist in the development of websites and applications using the latest technologies and frameworks.
3. Contribute to the design and implementation of AI algorithms to enhance user experience.
4. Participate in brainstorming sessions to generate new ideas and solutions for our clients.
5. Research emerging technologies and trends in Vibe Coding and AI to stay ahead of the curve.
6. Work closely with our senior developers to troubleshoot and debug code as needed.
7. Take on additional projects and tasks as assigned to support the overall goals of the company.

If you are passionate about Vibe Coding, web development, and artificial intelligence, and are eager to learn and grow in a fast-paced environment, we want to hear from you! Apply now to join our team at Stirring Minds and take your skills to the next level.                "
Blockchain Development,"
                            Get Now Solutions Pvt. Ltd.                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                We are seeking a Blockchain Developer Intern to work on blockchain analysis, cryptocurrency research, and hands-on development of Web3 applications. The internship will give you practical exposure to DeFi, blockchain wallets, smart contracts, and dApp development. You will collaborate with our engineering and research teams to build innovative wallet solutions and contribute to the future of decentralized finance.



1. Assist in the development and testing of blockchain wallets and related Web3 applications.
2. Research and analyze blockchain networks, cryptocurrencies, and DeFi platforms.
3. Support the integration of wallet solutions with dApps and smart contracts.
4. Contribute to enhancing blockchain security and optimizing decentralized applications.
5. Work with team members to brainstorm, propose, and implement new wallet features.
6. Assist in financial modeling and analysis for blockchain-based initiatives.                "
Salesforce Developer,"
                            The MetroMax Group                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Salesforce Development: Assist in the design, development, testing, and deployment of custom Salesforce solutions. Work with senior developers to implement new features or enhance the functionalities based on business requirements.
2. Collaboration: Collaborate with system analysts to understand the requirements. Work closely with the development team to ensure the timely delivery of high-quality solutions. Participate in team meetings and contribute ideas for process improvements.
3. Testing and Debugging: Conduct unit testing of developed solutions to ensure functionality meets specifications. Identify and troubleshoot issues, bugs, and performance bottlenecks in Salesforce applications.
4. Documentation: Document code, configurations, and development processes to ensure knowledge transfer and maintainability. Create and maintain technical documentation for Salesforce customizations.
5. Learning and Development: Stay informed about the latest Salesforce features, updates, and best practices. Actively participate in training sessions and seek opportunities for self-improvement.
6. Adherence to Best Practices: Follow coding and development best practices to ensure the scalability, security, and maintainability of Salesforce solutions. Adhere to organizational coding standards and guidelines.
7. Communication: Effectively communicate progress, challenges, and solutions to team members and stakeholders.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Zykoon Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Design and implement frontend UIs for agent-based task flows and orchestration
2. Build forms, dashboards, and config interfaces for dynamic task pipelines
3. Integrate with backend APIs handling agent logic and orchestration layers
4. Contribute to backend enhancements including database queries and APIs
5. Collaborate with product/AI engineers to refine agent task journeys and workflows
6. Write clean, reusable, modular code with a focus on scalability and maintainability                "
E‑Commerce App Developer (Shopify),"
                            Protega                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                We’re building AI‑powered post‑purchase protection for online merchants. Our apps let Shopify, Magento 2 and WooCommerce stores seamlessly offer product & shipping protection upsells in their storefronts, and manage claims via a unified dashboard. Join us and own real features used by live merchants.



A. Shopify App Development:

1. Scaffold and configure a Shopify CLI app (Node.js + Remix + Liquid).
2. Build and deploy Theme App Extension blocks and Liquid snippets for product, cart and post‑purchase upsells.
3. Implement and test webhook handlers (orders/create, carts/update) to sync protection plans.

B. Magento 2 Extension Work:

1. Create and configure Magento 2 modules with composer, CLI commands and XML layout updates.
2. Inject upsell widgets into product and cart templates using UI components and Knockout.js.
3. Write and test observers for order and shipment events.

C. WooCommerce Plugin Development:

1. Scaffold a WordPress plugin, register REST endpoints, and use action/filter hooks.
2. Develop Gutenberg blocks or shortcodes to add protection‑plan checkboxes on product and cart pages.
3. Integrate with WooCommerce webhook events (order.created, checkout.processed).

D. Full‑Stack Skills:

1. Build React components and manage state with Remix loaders and actions.
2. Work with Node.js/Express (or similar) to implement REST/GraphQL APIs.
3. Handle authentication flows (OAuth, App Proxies) and secure API calls.
4. Testing & Debugging
5. Write unit tests for JavaScript modules (Jest) and smoke‑test webhook flows.
6. Debug theme integrations across free & premium Shopify themes, Magento Luma/Blank, and popular WP themes.

E. Documentation & Collaboration:

1. Maintain clear README files, code comments and onboarding guides.
2. Use Git/GitHub for branching, pull requests and code reviews.

Must‑Have Skills:

1. JavaScript/TypeScript (ES6+), Node.js and React
2. Shopify: Liquid templating, Shopify CLI, Theme App Extensions, Ajax Cart API
3. PHP: Composer, Magento 2 module development, WooCommerce plugin hooks
4. APIs & Webhooks: designing, securing (HMAC), handling JSON payloads
5. Version Control: Git branching, merging, PR workflows
6. Familiarity with Remix or Next.js data‑loading conventions
7. Experience with Magento 2 UI components (Knockout.js)
8. Knowledge of WordPress Gutenberg block development
9. Basic DevOps: Docker, CI/CD pipelines, simple server deployment

What You’ll Gain:

1. Hands‑on ownership of app features across three major e‑commerce platforms
2. Real‑world impact: see your code live on merchant stores
3. Skill growth in modern full‑stack JavaScript, PHP ecosystems and e‑commerce integrations
4. Mentorship loop: feedback from our engineering team and autonomy to learn by doing
5. Certificate & recommendation upon successful internship completion                "
CAD Design,"
                            APEX ENGINEERING                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 22,000 /month","
                As a CAD Design intern , you will have the opportunity to work alongside our team of experienced engineers on a variety of projects. Your role will be crucial in creating detailed designs and models using software such as AutoCAD, SolidWorks, Catia, Autodesk 3ds Max, Autodesk Fusion 360, PTC Creo, ANSYS, and Autodesk Revit. Your knowledge of Engineering Surveying, Engineering Drawing, Assembly, and CAD software will be essential in helping us deliver high-quality engineering solutions to our clients. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Create accurate 2D and 3D models using a variety of CAD software.
2. Collaborate with engineers to develop and refine design concepts.
3. Conduct engineering surveys to gather data for design projects.
4. Assist in the creation of detailed engineering drawings for construction projects.
5. Perform assembly and testing of prototypes to ensure functionality.
6. Utilize ANSYS software to analyze and optimize designs for performance.
7. Contribute to the development of innovative design solutions using Autodesk Revit. 

If you are a motivated and detail-oriented individual with a passion for CAD design and engineering, we invite you to apply for this exciting internship opportunity . Join us in shaping the future of engineering innovation!                "
Onsite Laptop Service Engineer,"
                            SoftHorizon                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Visit client locations to provide on-site diagnosis and repair for laptops (hardware and software).
2. Install, configure, and troubleshoot operating systems (Windows, Linux) and standard applications
3. Perform hardware replacement, including screens, keyboards, batteries, motherboards, RAM, and hard drives/SSDs.
4. Handle issues related to booting, blue screen errors, OS crashes, and driver problems.
5. Conduct data backup and recovery as required.
6. Maintain records of services performed and parts used.
7. Communicate effectively with clients to explain issues and solutions.
8. Collaborate with the remote support team and escalate issues as needed.
9. Ensure timely completion of service calls and adherence to SLAs.                "
CAD Design,"
                            Advit Ventures                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                We are seeking a talented CAD Design intern to join our team at Advit Ventures! If you have a passion for design and a strong proficiency in AutoCAD, SolidWorks, and Google SketchUp, then this position is perfect for you. You will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain valuable hands-on experience in the world of CAD design.

You will get opportunity to work in cutting edge solar project design, and get a chance to build a career in the fast-growing Renewable Energy Industry.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with our design team to create 2D and 3D models using AutoCAD, SolidWorks, and Google SketchUp.
2. Assist in the development of technical drawings and blueprints for various projects.
3. Help in the design and modification of products and structures based on client specifications.
4. Participate in design reviews and provide feedback on improvements and enhancements.
5. Conduct research on new design trends and technologies to stay up-to-date with industry standards.
6. Support the team in preparing presentations and visual aids for client meetings and project proposals.
7. Take on additional tasks and projects as needed to contribute to the overall success of the company.

Technical Proficiency

1. Strong knowledge of AutoCAD, PVSyst, and MS Excel for solar design.
2. Familiarity with solar inverters, power cables, switchgear, transformers, and protection devices.
3. Experience in DC & AC side electrical layout and handling site constraints.
4. Knowledge of civil and structural aspects for rooftop and ground-mounted solar projects.

Analytical & Problem-Solving

1. Ability to perform load calculations, yield assessments, and energy simulations.
2. Skilled in troubleshooting installation and performance issues.
3. Strong understanding of solar project management processes.

Soft Skills

1. Excellent coordination, communication, and reporting skills.
2. Ability to work independently and in cross-functional teams.
3. Strong time management to ensure timely project delivery.

If you are a motivated and creative individual looking to expand your skills in CAD design, apply now to be part of our dynamic team at Advit Ventures!                "
Quality Control,"
                            NGL Fine-Chem Ltd.                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 14,000 /month","
                1. Instrument Analysis
2. Process Improvement
3. Document handling                "
DevOps,"
                            Pexaworks Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                At Pexaworks, we don’t just build software—we create scalable, secure, and efficient digital solutions. 
From AI-driven applications to cloud-native platforms, we ensure seamless deployment and infrastructure management. Now, we’re looking for a DevOps Intern to help us streamline development workflows, optimize cloud environments, and enhance system reliability.
If you’re eager to dive into cloud computing, automation, and CI/CD pipelines, keep reading.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. CI/CD Implementation – Assist in setting up and maintaining continuous integration and deployment pipelines.
2. Cloud Infrastructure Management – Work with DigitalOcean, AWS, or other cloud platforms to configure and optimize services.
3. Monitoring & Logging – Set up monitoring tools to track application performance and system health.
4. Automation & Scripting – Write scripts to automate repetitive tasks using Bash, Python, or Terraform.
5. Security & Scalability – Learn best practices for secure deployments and scalable infrastructure.

What We’re Looking For

1. Currently, pursuing (or recently completed) a degree in CS, IT, or a related field.
2. Basic understanding of Linux, networking, and cloud computing.
3. Familiarity with Docker, Kubernetes, or containerization concepts.
4. Exposure to CI/CD tools (GitHub Actions, Jenkins, GitLab CI/CD) is a plus.
5. Strong problem-solving skills and eagerness to learn new technologies.
6. A team player who can collaborate and communicate effectively.

Why You’ll Love It Here

1. Real Projects – No busywork—get hands-on experience in DevOps workflows.
2. Experienced Mentors – Work with professionals who will guide your learning journey.
3. Flexible & Remote-Friendly – Work at your convenience.
4. Career Growth – If you excel, this internship could be just the beginning.
5. Impact – Your work will contribute to efficient, high-performing infrastructure.                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            F Square Media                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 9,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Regularly checking and monitoring the mobile application for functionality and performance
2. Assisting with deploying the app on the Google Play Store and Apple App Store
3. Conducting bug testing and reporting issues for resolution                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            URBAN PGM                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                We are looking for a passionate Mobile App Development Intern to assist in building, testing, and deploying applications for Android and iOS platforms. This internship will give you hands-on experience in the complete app lifecycle — from development to deployment on the Google Play Store and Apple App Store.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in the design and development of mobile applications for Android and iOS.
2. Collaborate with the team on UI/UX implementation and feature development.
3. Work on API integrations, Firebase, and third-party SDKs.
4. Support in publishing apps on Play Store and App Store.
5. Debug, test, and optimize application performance.                "
Tech & Automation,"
                            Soulflower                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                Location: Marol Andheri
Working days: Mon to Sat, 10 am to 07 pm

We are looking for a proactive and tech-savvy intern to assist with automating processes across various departments. This role is perfect for someone eager to apply their technical skills in real-world scenarios and help drive efficiency through automation.



1. Analyze existing workflows in different departments to identify automation opportunities.
2. Develop strategies and look for a vendor to implement the same.
3. Collaborate with department heads to understand pain points and search for and present customized automation solutions.
4. Test, troubleshoot, and optimize automation systems to ensure smooth operation.
5. Document automation processes and train relevant staff for adoption.                "
Cyber Security,"
                            Emoolar Technology Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,100 - 5,700 /month","
                As a Cyber Security intern at Emoolar Technology Private Limited, you will have the opportunity to hone your skills in Ethical Hacking and Cybersecurity while working on exciting projects that directly impact our company's operations. You will work closely with our experienced team of cybersecurity professionals to protect our systems and data from potential threats.



1. Conduct penetration testing and vulnerability assessments to identify and address security risks.
2. Monitor and analyze network traffic to detect and respond to potential security incidents.
3. Assist in developing and implementing security policies and procedures to ensure compliance with industry standards.
4. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to integrate security best practices into our products and services.
5. Stay up-to-date on the latest cybersecurity trends and technologies to continuously enhance our security posture.
6. Participate in security incident response activities to mitigate and remediate security incidents.
7. Contribute to ongoing security awareness training and education initiatives for employees. 

If you are a passionate and driven individual with a strong interest in cybersecurity, this internship is the perfect opportunity for you to gain hands-on experience and make a real impact in a fast-paced and dynamic environment. Apply now and take the first step towards a rewarding career in cybersecurity with Emoolar Technology Private Limited.                "
Junior Mobile App Developer (React Native),"
                            SeleqtAI Solutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 20,000 /month","
                We are hiring a Hybrid Mobile App Developer skilled in React Native and TypeScript to build and maintain applications for both iOS and Android. Mainly, you have to coordinate with our senior developers & redevelop our existing mobile app, ensuring smooth performance, clean code, and scalability.



1. Design, develop, and maintain cross-platform mobile apps (iOS & Android) using React Native + TypeScript.
2. Build reusable components and ensure consistent UI/UX across devices.
3. Integrate backend APIs, handle state management, and optimize app performance.
4. Implement authentication, push notifications, in-app navigation, and secure storage.
5. Manage app deployment and updates on App Store and Google Play.
6. Collaborate with backend developers and the product team for feature rollouts.
7. Debug, test, and ensure stability across OS versions and screen sizes.
8. Write clean, modular, and maintainable code with proper documentation.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Swifey                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 18,000 - 23,000 /month","
                This is important for your success, here - Growth mindset and a can-do attitude — you enjoy solving tough problems. If you’re looking for a slow-paced 9-to-5 job, this won’t be the right fit. We’re building with urgency and ambition.

 

1. Build and ship end-to-end features using React, JavaScript/TypeScript, Node.js, Python, and SQL.
2. Design and maintain APIs, databases, and scalable front-end components.
3. Develop and refine critical flows: onboarding, transactions, and reporting.
4. Use data analysis and basic AI tools to improve product insights.
5. Collaborate closely with founders on product direction and technical architecture.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Memli                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 5,000 /month","
                1. Designing and developing responsive front-end UIs using React.js and Tailwind CSS
2. Building scalable back-end services using Node.js (Express/Fastify)
3. Working with Supabase (or Firebase) for authentication, real-time databases, and storage
4. Creating and integrating RESTful and GraphQL APIs
5. Writing clean, testable, and maintainable code
6. Collaborating with designers to implement user-centric features
7. Participating in code reviews, agile planning, and product brainstorming
8. Owning features end-to-end: from concept to production
9. Optimizing apps for performance and mobile responsiveness                "
Jewellery Designer,"
                            Dwarka Jewel                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Join Dwarka Jewel as a Jewellery Design Intern and embark on a creative journey within the dynamic world of design. This internship offers a unique opportunity to gain hands-on experience and contribute to the creation of exquisite jewellery pieces, blending artistry with technical precision. You will be working within the fashion and design space.



1. Assist in the design and development of new jewellery collections, from concept to prototype.
2. Create detailed designs using CAD software, ensuring accuracy and aesthetic appeal.
3. Utilise CorelDRAW for design refinement, Manual Designing, presentation, and creating design layouts.
4. Research current fashion trends and incorporate them into jewellery designs.
5. Collaborate with the design team to bring innovative ideas to life.                "
Robotics Engineer And Mentor,"
                            The Innovation Story                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Project Development: Design, prototype, and develop and code
2. Collaboration: Work closely with cross-functional teams to integrate mechanical designs/Coding solutions with other engineering disciplines, ensuring cohesive and effective project outcomes for national and international robotics competitions like VEX, FRC, FTC, WRO.
3. Technical Expertise: Apply extensive knowledge in mechanical engineering or Programming to solve complex problems, innovate new solutions, and optimize existing systems.
4. Mentorship: Train and mentor aspiring innovators, providing guidance and support to foster their growth and development in the field of robotics.                "
Electronics Engineering,"
                            Identium Tech Solutions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Assisting in system engineering and project-related tasks
2. Interacting with customers to understand requirements and provide support
3. Applying marketing skills to promote technical solutions and services                "
Software Development Engineering (Web),"
                            Apoorva Mishra                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 19,999 - 20,000 /month","
                We are looking for a talented Software Development Engineering (Web) intern to help build us the future of creator economy. We are building tools for creators to create and schedule content for their audiences using the power of AI.  If you are passionate about web development and have a solid understanding of React, Next.js, HTML, and MySQL, then we want to hear from you!

Key Responsibilities:
1. Design and develop web applications using React and Next.js.
2. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code to ensure optimal performance.
3. Work closely with the product team to implement user-friendly interfaces.
4. Assist in database design and optimization using MySQL.
5. Conduct testing to identify and fix bugs and improve application functionality.
6. Stay up-to-date on industry trends and best practices in web development including latest AI tools and coding agents.
7. Take initiative in learning new technologies and contributing innovative ideas to the team.

If you are a self-motivated individual with a passion for software development, then apply now to be a part of our dynamic team!

See here to learn more about the product that we are building - https://connect-early-access.lovable.app                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Scienext India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 13,000 /month","
                Are you a skilled Flutter developer looking to kickstart your career with hands-on experience? Look no further! Join Scienext India Private Limited as a Flutter Development Intern and work on cutting-edge projects in a fast-paced environment.

Key responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our development team to design and implement new features using Flutter framework.
2. Utilize REST API integration to create seamless communication between front-end and back-end systems.
3. Develop clean and efficient code in Dart language to ensure smooth performance across iOS and Android platforms.
4. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging any technical issues that may arise during the development process.
5. Stay up-to-date on the latest industry trends and technologies to enhance your skills and contribute innovative ideas to the team.
6. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve the overall quality of our software products.
7. Take ownership of your projects and demonstrate a strong commitment to delivering high-quality results within deadlines. 

If you are passionate about mobile app development and eager to learn and grow in a dynamic work environment, apply now for this exciting opportunity!                "
Java Development,"
                            ROUTINE REGIME PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                Are you a talented Java development intern looking to gain hands-on experience in a dynamic and fast-paced environment? Look no further than Routine Regime Private Limited! 

Key responsibilities:

1. Collaborate with the development team to design, develop, and implement Java-based applications
2. Utilize your knowledge of Java, JavaScript, Spring Boot, and MySQL to create efficient and scalable solutions
3. Participate in code reviews and provide valuable feedback to enhance code quality
4. Assist in troubleshooting and resolving technical issues in a timely manner
5. Contribute to the development of RESTful APIs and integrate third-party APIs when necessary
6. Work closely with stakeholders to gather requirements and ensure successful project delivery
7. Stay up-to-date on the latest technologies and trends in the Java development field to continuously improve your skills and knowledge

If you are passionate about software development and eager to learn and grow in a supportive and innovative environment, apply now to join our team at Routine Regime Private Limited!                "
AI Agent Development,"
                            Awwgment                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 /month","
                1. Research and experiment with Generative AI frameworks (LangChain, CrewAI, AutoGen, etc.).
2. Develop and implement AI-powered agents for automating tasks like code generation, testing, documentation, and troubleshooting.
3. Build backend services & APIs using Python (FastAPI) to integrate agent workflows.
4. Collaborate with the team to design and prototype end-to-end AI workflows 
5. Implement prompt engineering, fine-tuning, and retrieval-based techniques (RAG).
6. Document development steps, best practices, and learning outcomes.                "
Fashion Procurement & Sourcing,"
                            Niya Elitaire Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 7,000 lump sum","
                1. Researching and identifying vendors, fabrics, trims, and other materials suitable for the brand’s collections.
2. Assisting in sourcing natural fabrics and ensuring quality, cost-effectiveness, and timely availability.
3. Maintaining communication with suppliers, requesting samples, and following up on orders.
4. Comparing quotations and supporting basic negotiation for pricing and timelines.
5. Tracking and updating procurement records, samples, and purchase orders.
6. Supporting inventory checks for fabrics and raw materials.
7. Coordinating logistics for sourcing, including deliveries, pickups, or courier arrangements.
8. Assisting in documenting vendor databases and building long-term sourcing contacts.
9. Pitching ideas and providing input on fabric usage, trims, and styling suggestions when required.
10. Collaborating closely with the founder or team to align sourcing with brand vision and design needs.                "
Civil Engineering,"
                            Navjeevan Enterprise                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 12,000 /month","
                We are seeking a dynamic and motivated Civil Engineering intern to join our team at Navjeevan Enterprise. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain hands-on experience in the field of civil engineering. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in drafting and designing using AutoCAD software.
2. Conduct site visits and assist in surveying and data collection.
3. Analyze data and create reports using MS-Excel.
4. Collaborate with team members on project planning and execution.
5. Assist in project management tasks such as scheduling and budgeting.
6. Participate in meetings with clients and stakeholders.
7. Learn and apply industry best practices in civil engineering.

This is a fantastic opportunity for a driven individual to gain valuable experience and jumpstart their career in civil engineering. If you are passionate about the field and eager to learn, we want to hear from you! Apply now to join our team at Navjeevan Enterprise.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Zenochi                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 2,500 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in developing features using React.js (frontend) and Node.js (backend).
2. Contribute to writing clean, maintainable, and efficient code.
3. Work on DevOps tasks such as deployment, CI/CD pipelines, and server management (you’ll get hands-on learning here).
4. Help with debugging, testing, and ensuring smooth performance across the stack.
5. Participate in discussions on architecture, design, and implementation.
6. Use AI tools to boost productivity and speed up development.                "
Product Management,"
                            Accredian                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Define a content roadmap for developing a product management course to be launched by the company based on industry and customer requirements
2. Understand products and the value they provide to customers, in order to assist in the development of products
3. Manage the development of program-related material/content and make modifications by analyzing customer needs
4. Build frameworks to manage the backlog and recommend improvements to meet customer requirements
5. Assist in building and documenting the program-related solutions
6. Create high-quality content on product management and build brand authority
7. Plan and create content including PowerPoint, case study, etc.
8. Help drive product innovation
9. Apply learnings to building not only content but get first-hand experience in building products in-house as well

Requirements:

1. Preferred candidate: MBA pass out
2. 0-3 years of experience
3. Strong written and verbal communication skills
4. Ability to multitask
5. Passion to learn and grow                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Plutonic Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain mobile applications using the Flutter framework
2. Implement user interfaces consistent with design guidelines
3. Integrate Firebase for data storage and user authentication
4. Communicate with backend services using REST API
5. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define, design, and ship new features
6. Optimize application performance for maximum speed and scalability
7. Stay up-to-date with the latest trends and technologies in mobile development                "
Design Assistant,"
                            Studio Thinking Future                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Assisting in the development of design concepts and projects.
2. Participating in site visits and client meetings.
3. Preparing detailed drawings, layouts, and plans using software such as AutoCAD, SketchUp, VectorWorks.
4. Supporting the team in project presentations and documentation.
5. Conducting research on design trends, materials, and construction techniques.
6. Collaborating with the design team to ensure project deadlines are met.

Join us in creating beautiful and functional spaces that inspire!                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Highway Delite                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 18,000 - 22,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the development team to design and construct backend processes
2. Develop and deploy applications based on architectural plans and data flow diagrams (DFDs)
3. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code adhering to industry standards and coding conventions
4. Identify and resolve bugs through troubleshooting and debugging
5. Craft database queries for seamless integration with applications
6. Monitor and optimize backend applications and database performance
7. Document changes to applications and contribute to updating documentation
8. Demonstrate strong problem-solving skills and proficiency in algorithm development
9. Strive for excellence in producing high-quality code                "
Solar Technical,"
                            Alloy Charge                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                A. Solar Project Exposure
1. Assist in solar site surveys, system design, and layout planning.
2. Support site supervision and coordinating with installers and vendors.
3. Participate in installation, wiring, and commissioning activities.
4. Learn troubleshooting techniques using tools like a multimeter and a clamp meter.
5. Document project progress and assist in customer communication.

B. Electronics Design & Testing
1. Support the R&D team in testing solar charge controllers, inverters, and battery systems.
2. Assist in PCB assembly, wiring, and debugging circuits.
3. Perform data logging, system monitoring, and field-testing.
4. Contribute to small design improvements and prototype testing.

C. Learning & Development
1. Exposure to different solar installations
2. Learn about electrical safety and best practices in renewable energy systems.
3. Get trained in both field execution and electronics R&D.                "
Social Media Marketing,"
                            Recytronics Foundation                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                We are looking for enthusiastic Social Media / Digital Marketing Interns who are eager to learn and contribute to building our brand presence online. This internship will give you hands-on experience in managing campaigns, content creation, and digital marketing strategies in the fast-growing e-waste recycling industry. 

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Assisting in developing and executing social media strategies
2. Creating, scheduling, and publishing engaging posts, reels, and stories across platforms 
3. Supporting in running online campaigns and ads to increase brand visibility
4. Researching industry trends, competitor activities, and audience preferences
5. Tracking and reporting on social media metrics and performance
6. Engaging with online communities and responding to comments/messages
7. Supporting the marketing team with other digital activities (SEO, email marketing, content creation)                "
Legal Research – Fintech & Digital Assets Regulation,"
                            YB One Strategic Solutions Pvt Ltd                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                We are seeking a detail-oriented law student to assist in comprehensive legal and regulatory research on emerging areas at the intersection of financial technology, digital assets, and Indian securities law. This is a remote, unpaid legal research internship focused exclusively on analyzing Indian statutes, regulatory frameworks, and judicial precedents related to blockchain-based financial innovations. The intern will support the founding team by conducting in-depth legal research on cryptocurrency regulations, tokenized assets, and investor protection laws under Indian jurisprudence.



A. Researching Indian securities & crypto regulations:

1. Studying SEBI guidelines, the Finance Act 2022/2023 (crypto taxation provisions), RBI circulars, and other regulatory pronouncements relevant to digital asset platforms and investment structures.

B. Analyzing applicable legal frameworks:
1. Examining how Indian laws, including the Companies Act, 2013; Securities Contracts (Regulation) Act, 1956 (SCRA); Foreign Exchange Management Act (FEMA); and Prevention of Money Laundering Act (PMLA), apply to blockchain-based ownership and smart contracts.

C. Summarizing legal precedents & regulatory trends:
1. Tracking key court decisions, parliamentary committee reports, and government statements (e.g., RBI's stance on crypto, taxation policies) that shape the legal environment for digital assets in India.

D. Evaluating international legal models:
1. Conducting comparative legal research on how foreign jurisdictions regulate tokenized real estate and digital securities.
2. Assessing the feasibility of adapting such models within the Indian legal system.

E. Supporting development of compliance guidelines:
1. Assisting in identifying legal requirements for investors' onboarding, including KYC/AML obligations under PMLA.
2. Reviewing eligibility criteria (accredited vs. retail investors) under SEBI regulations.

F. Maintaining organized research documentation:
1. Compiling findings into structured summaries, legal memos, or reports using Google Docs/Notion for internal use by legal and strategy teams.

G. Monitoring ongoing fintech & regulatory developments:
1. Staying updated on policy changes from SEBI, MeitY, the Ministry of Finance, and industry bodies (e.g., NASSCOM, Web3 Foundation India) concerning digital assets and fintech innovation.

H. Collaborating with founders:
1. Presenting research insights during weekly discussions.
2. Helping formulate questions for consultations with external legal advisors.                "
Artisanal,"
                            Fashionable Nari                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Work on handcrafting wax diyas in line with approved designs.
2. Support scaling the production process while maintaining artistic quality.
3. Ensure consistency, durability, and quality control in every piece produced.
4. Maintain a record of material usage, production time, and outputs.                "
Robotics,"
                            The Innovation Story                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,500 - 8,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Contributing technical expertise to the design, prototyping, and testing of robotics kits and systems.
2. Supporting National Robotics League (NRL) preparation, including robot building, testing, and competition readiness.
3. Assisting in boot camp delivery, ensuring students gain hands-on exposure to robotics concepts.
4. Documenting technical processes, testing results, and best practices for kit usage.
5. Collaborating with the TIS technical team to troubleshoot and optimize hardware/software systems.
6. Providing mentorship support during sessions, bringing real-world insights to the classroom.                "
E-Commerce Listing,"
                            Adnation360                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                We’re looking for 2 motivated interns to join our fast-growing eCommerce team. This is your chance to gain hands-on experience in Shopify, marketplace listings, product visuals, and video editing.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Create and manage Shopify stores & marketplace listings (Amazon, eBay,Flipkart,Meesho etc.)
2. Optimize product titles, descriptions, tags, and pricing for SEO & conversions
3. Edit product images (background removal, polishing, resizing)
4. Edit short-form videos for listings, ads, and social media (add captions, transitions, highlights)
5. Assist with landing pages, email automation, and basic workflows (bonus)

Who You Are:

1. Self-starter, detail-oriented, and eager to learn
2. Comfortable juggling multiple tasks and tools
3. Good eye for design and aesthetics
4. Strong communication and reliability

Tools You’ll Use / Learn:

1. Shopify, Amazon/eBay dashboards and other marketplaces
2. Canva / Photoshop, CapCut / Premiere Pro / Canva Video
3. WordPress / Landing page builders (bonus)
4. Google Sheets / basic analytics

Position Details:

1. Remote | Start ASAP
2. Part-time or full-time based on performance
3. Stipend + performance-based incentives
4. Opportunity to grow in eCommerce and digital marketing

How to Apply:

Send us to: 
1. Short intro video/message on why you’re a great fit
2. Examples of Shopify listings, product images, or videos you’ve created
3. Tools you’re confident with
4. Expected monthly stipend


Shopify & Marketplace Listings:
1. Create and manage Shopify stores and eCommerce marketplace listings.
2. Write optimized product titles, descriptions, tags, and pricing for SEO & conversions.
3. Organize collections, menus, and apps for smooth navigation.
4. Edit product images (background removal, polishing, resizing).
5. Ensure images are visually appealing and conversion-friendly.
6. Edit short-form product videos for listings, ads, and social media.
7. Add captions, transitions, product highlights, and branding elements.
8. Tools: CapCut, Canva Video, Premiere Pro, or similar.
9. Assist with landing page creation on WordPress / ClickFunnels / Webflow.
10. Learn email automation, lead generation workflows, and basic eCommerce analytics.

We’re looking for interns who want to grow with us, not just work for us. Let’s build, scale, and succeed together!\                "
"React Native, NextJS And Firebase Development","
                            Wecofy                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Developing components for our applications and web applications
2. Using React, Node, and Next.js to build amazing websites, web apps, and mobile applications
3. Working with the entire Firebase suite                "
Student Engagement,"
                            Bookmark Projects Trust (DoScience)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                1. Manage and engage with student groups.
2. Conduct demonstrations of various science models, primarily focusing on basic exploration of physics concepts.
3. Coordinate VR astronomy shows and guide students through the immersive experience.                "
"React Native, NextJS And Firebase Development","
                            We Code For You                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Developing components for our applications and web applications
2. Working on using Node.js to make a server interact with the front end
3. Designing and adapting UIs as per the needs
4. Working with the entire Firebase suite
5. Using React and React Native to build amazing websites, web apps and mobile applications                "
3D Artist,"
                            ComXR                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Create 3D models in Blender for AR, VR, and rendering projects.
2. Assist the team with scene setup, asset optimization, and renders.
3. Support senior artists in animation, lighting, and texturing tasks.
4. Learn and adapt to new workflows, tools, and project requirements.
5. Collaborate with designers and developers on project deliverables.                "
Founders Office,"
                            Arkham Literacy Initiative Foundation                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Overview:

A group of social, immersive media-tech and internet companies and non-profit Edtech organizations working at the intersection of Gen Ai and Agentic Ai, Unreal Engine, Holographics, Spatial and 3D, AR/XR, BCI, HCI, Web 3.0 & Blockchain, P2P, distributed networks and social internet. We have both Non-Profit and For-profit divisions.

You will be selected for either one of these tracks: Founder's office (Business)/ Founder's office(Tech) 

Founder's office(Tech) 

 

1.  Build full-stack apps from existing codebases using Typescript, Supabase, React, and APIs, or
2. Build Spatial apps with Unreal Engine 5 and assets/ templates + Plugins
3. Manage the tech infrastructure of the company and maintain documentation

Founder's office(Business) 

 

1.  Create content (posts, reels, and text) for the company's official handles 
2. Perform competitor analysis, monitor reach, and apply industry best practices
3. Manage a team of campus ambassadors, reach out to various influencers to bring them on our social platform
4. Assist in building the company's digital presence and brand image
5. Assist in running non-profit initiatives 

Candidates will be receiving 1000 ESOPS, LOR, LOI, and certificates                "
Engineering Analyst,"
                            Energy Alternatives India                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Conduct techno-commercial feasibility studies across key climate tech sectors (solar, EVs, batteries, green hydrogen, biofuels)
2. Support due diligence of emerging technologies and innovations
3. Understand fundamentals of concepts, processes, and engineering solutions
4. Assist in preparing detailed project reports, technical presentations, and analyses
5. Interact with senior management from leading Indian and global firms
6. Work under the guidance of senior consulting team members on client projects
7. Support strategy consulting and market research teams in:
Technical and engineering analyses of market needs
Market potential evaluation
8. Devising optimal product/solution development strategies for clients                "
Business Development (Sales),"
                            Hiringjet                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 18,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Identifying, developing, and closing new business opportunities in IT SaaS recruitment solutions.
2. Building and maintaining strong client relationships to ensure long-term partnerships.
3. Conducting competitor analysis and providing feedback to the R&D and product team.
4. Managing the end-to-end B2B sales cycle from prospecting to deal closure.
5. Collaborating with internal teams to enhance client satisfaction and product adoption.                "
Electrical Engineering,"
                            Omras Renewable Energy                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 /month","
                1. Work on the solar project installation site
2. Undertake cable laying and connection works
3. Conduct testing for electrical connections                "
Full Stack Developer (MERN Stack With Edge.js Mandatory),"
                            Ungrezi                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 /month","
                1. Design, develop, and maintain a monolith architecture web application.
2. Build dynamic server-side rendered views using Edge.js templates.
3. Develop backend APIs and business logic with Node.js and Express.js.
4. Work with MongoDB for data modeling, queries, and optimization.
5. Implement authentication, authorization, and security best practices.
6. Ensure responsive UI/UX and smooth integration of front-end with backend.
7. Optimize the application for speed, scalability, and maintainability.
8. Collaborate with product and design teams for feature implementation.
9. Write clean, modular, and testable code with proper documentation.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Sheikh Media                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 35,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain websites using a variety of programming languages and tools
2. Implement UI & UX design principles to create visually appealing and user-friendly websites
3. Conduct UX research to improve the overall user experience and functionality of websites
4. Utilize CMS platforms like WordPress to manage and update website content
5. Optimize websites for search engines to improve visibility and drive traffic
6. Collaborate with clients to understand their needs and provide excellent customer service
7. Create engaging and informative content to attract and retain users on websites                "
Mobile App Developer (React Native+TypeScript),"
                            Ungrezi                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 /month","
                Job Description:
We are hiring a Hybrid Mobile App Developer skilled in React Native and TypeScript to build and maintain applications for both iOS and Android. The role covers two apps: one for clinics and one for users, ensuring smooth performance, clean code, and scalability.



1. Design, develop, and maintain cross-platform mobile apps (iOS & Android) using React Native + TypeScript.
2. Build reusable components and ensure consistent UI/UX across devices.
3. Integrate backend APIs, handle state management, and optimize app performance.
4. Implement authentication, push notifications, in-app navigation, and secure storage.
5. Manage app deployment and updates on App Store and Google Play.
6. Collaborate with backend developers and the product team for feature rollouts.
7. Debug, test, and ensure stability across OS versions and screen sizes.
8. Write clean, modular, and maintainable code with proper documentation.                "
Intern Design Consultant,"
                            7Rater (Melbourne, Australia)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 /month","
                1. Assessing plans and drawings
2. Coordinating with team members
3. Designing and editing drawings and modeling as instructed by the project leader
4. Creating individual project report
5. Completing the learning modules as instructed (part of your on-the-job learning on specific software for assessment and modeling, usually first month)                "
Full Stack Developer,"
                            Indika AI Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 10,000 /month","
                As a Full Stack Developer Intern, you will:

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Contribute to the development of AI-based platforms such as annotation tools and related solutions.
2. Support the technical operations required for ongoing projects.
3. Write clean, scalable, and efficient code across frontend and backend.
4. Collaborate with the leadership team and project managers to implement new features.
5. Troubleshoot, debug, and upgrade systems when required.
6. Adapt to fast-paced requirements in a startup environment. 

It is mandatory to have good communication skills to be able to understand the client's requirements and provide a custom setup for the project requirements.                "
Laravel Expert,"
                            Medicalbook                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 /month","
                1. Making a dashboard in Laravel, PHP, ajax, jQuery, and MySQL
2. Working on the website design with Bootstrap
3. Working with a quick understanding of problem explanation
4. PHP frameworks CodeIgniter or Symfony knowledge is a Plus                "
Electronics Engineering,"
                            1accord                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Assist in designing and prototyping electronic circuits for new product development
2. Assist in setting up test environments and conducting performance testing and validation
3. Document test results and provide feedback to the development team for further refinement                "
Quality Analyst,"
                            Dashtoon                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                We are looking for a QC Intern - Dubbing Video Content to assist in reviewing and ensuring the quality of dubbed video content. This role is ideal for candidates passionate about video production, dubbing, and content localization. The intern will gain hands-on experience in audio-video QC, dubbing accuracy checks, and industry-standard content evaluation.



1. Assist in reviewing dubbed video content for lip-sync accuracy, dialogue timing, and pronunciation consistency.
2. Identify audio issues such as distortions, background noise, and sync mismatches.
3. Ensure the translated script and dialogues match the tone and intent of the original content.
4. Document errors, inconsistencies, and quality concerns for necessary revisions.

Requirements:

1. Fluency in Tamil/Telugu (Mandatory)
2. 0-6 months of experience in video/audio QC, dubbing, or content localization (freshers with relevant skills may apply).
3. Passion for video production, dubbing, and content quality control.
4. Basic understanding of audio/video synchronization and dubbing processes.
5. Strong attention to detail and willingness to learn.                "
Architecture,"
                            Excelus FoodBev Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 - 25,001 /month","
                1. Design factory layout
2. Execute tasks on site
3. Select materials and contractors                "
Software Engineering (React Native),"
                            Better                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain mobile applications using React Native and TypeScript.
2. Ensure cross-platform compatibility and smooth functionality.
3. Work with APIs to integrate backend services into the app.
4. Identify and fix performance issues.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            StoreShoppy Online Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Building responsive React UIs (components, hooks) with clean, reusable   Tailwind/CSS and basic accessibility.
2. Implementing RESTful APIs in Node.js/Express, including routing, request validation, and error handling.
3. Designing MongoDB schemas & Mongoose models; writing queries, indexes, and aggregations for performance.
4. Integrating frontend with backend APIs (Axios/Fetch), handling auth flows (JWT, refresh tokens), and role-based access.
5. Managing state (Context/Redux) and client-side routing (React Router).
6. Writing secure code: input validation, rate limiting, CORS, environment variables, and secrets management.
7. Implementing common features: user signup/login, email/OTP flows, file/image uploads (e.g., Cloudinary), pagination, and search.
8. Adding real-time features where needed (Socket.IO) and basic webhooks/integrations with third-party services.
9. Testing endpoints with Postman.
10. Using Git/GitHub for version control: branching, PRs, code reviews, and issue tracking.
11. Setting up basic CI/CD and deploying apps to Vercel/Netlify (frontend) and Render/Ubuntu server (backend).                "
Digital Marketing,"
                            Pimjo                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                At Pimjo, we’re building next-generation SaaS and AI products for developers. We’re hiring a Digital Marketing Intern (SEO & Content) to drive our growth through link building, SEO execution, and technical content marketing. This is a hands-on, execution-focused role where you’ll work directly on live SaaS products, support technical content distribution, and gain real-world experience in scaling digital products.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

A. Link Building & Outreach:
1. Identifying and shortlisting relevant websites, blogs, and communities for SaaS & developer tool backlinks.
2. Executing outreach campaigns (emails, follow-ups) using predefined templates.
3. Tracking and maintaining backlinks in organized outreach sheets.

B. Technical Content Support:
1. Assisting in formatting and publishing technical blog posts, product updates, and documentation.
2. Optimizing content for SEO (keywords, meta tags, headings, and internal linking).
3. Researching industry topics (AI, SaaS, developer tools) to support new content ideas.

C. SEO Execution:
1. Performing on-page checks for Pimjo products.
2. Conducting competitor analysis for backlinks, keywords, and content gaps.
3. Monitoring rankings, impressions, and backlink progress weekly.

D. SaaS Growth Marketing Tasks:
1. Researching SaaS directories, forums, and communities for listing Pimjo products.
2. Supporting distribution of technical content across relevant platforms.
3. Assisting in early GTM campaigns (social shares, content promotion, newsletters).

E. Data & Reporting:
1. Maintaining organized trackers for outreach, content, and SEO deliverables.
2. Preparing simple weekly reports on link building, content updates, and SEO KPIs.
3. Sharing insights and blockers during team check-ins.                "
Site Engineering (Civil),"
                            Shreeji Enterprise                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 19,000 /month","
                We are seeking a motivated and detail-oriented Civil Engineering Intern to support our team on various redevelopment projects. The ideal candidate will have a strong foundation in core civil engineering principles, a keen interest in the practical aspects of construction, and the digital skills necessary to thrive in a modern engineering environment. This internship offers a hands-on opportunity to apply academic knowledge to real-world challenges in estimation, planning, and project coordination.



1. Estimation & Costing: Assist in the preparation of preliminary cost estimates, quantity take-offs (BOQ), and material schedules for redevelopment projects.
2. Project Planning: Support the project team in developing project schedules, monitoring progress, and updating project plans using relevant software tools.
3. Technical Communication: Prepare clear and concise reports, presentations, and daily progress updates. Liaise with team members and other stakeholders under the guidance of senior engineers.
4. FSH Calculations: Apply knowledge to calculate FSH (Floor Space Index/Housing) as per local regulations, a critical component for redevelopment project feasibility and planning.
5. Utilize essential civil engineering software (e.g., AutoCAD, MS Project, Primavera, or similar) for drafting and planning.
6. Leverage Microsoft Excel for data analysis, creating trackers, and performing complex calculations.
7. Digital Marketing Support: Contribute to the company's online presence by assisting with content creation for social media, blog posts, and website updates related to our projects and company expertise.                "
Junior Developer,"
                            Rally Portal LLC (Dubai, United Arab Emirates)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Work with APIs (WhatsApp, Google, etc.) to build and integrate features.
2. Manage and interact with databases (preferably PostgreSQL).
3. Collaborate with the dev team to test and implement new features.
4. Research and learn new tools/technologies as needed (no fear of learning!).
5. Assist in debugging, documentation, and improving workflows.                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            Afferent Wearable Tech                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Support design and development of patented product solutions for bulk cooking applications
2. Assist in testing and validation of mechanical components and assemblies
3. Collaborate with vendors for development and sourcing of manufacturing components
4. Help in cost analysis and optimization for product manufacturing
5. Engage directly with customers to gather feedback and assist in resolving technical queries
6. Exposure to cross-functional tasks essential to product commercialization                "
Course Creator (App Development),"
                            SelfCode Academy                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 40,000 lump sum","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Record clear, well-paced video lessons using a laptop/desktop screen share with on-camera presence.
2. Follow the provided curriculum and scripts, ensuring all topics and subtopics are covered in detail.
3. Demonstrate real-world coding workflows using required platforms.
4. Maintain high audio and video quality for a professional learning experience.                "
Proofreading,"
                            Milestone Localization                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Checking project files to ensure they meet specifications before delivery
2. Preparing pre-delivery checklists and reports for each project
3. Using industry-specific QA and review tools to evaluate files
4. Analyzing and assessing individual projects for quality and compliance
5. Reviewing deliverables to ensure they meet established quality guidelines and standards
6. Proofreading and editing content through both manual and tool-based reviews
7. Coordinating with internal teams to resolve quality issues
8. Performing linguistic (English) and non-linguistic (all languages) quality checks
9. Identifying and flagging errors, generating quality reports, and ensuring accuracy across all deliverables                "
Content Writing & SEO (AI-Assisted Blogging),"
                            Thoughtsverse                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 1,200 lump sum","
                1. Conduct keyword research to identify trending and relevant topics.
2. Generate high-quality blog articles using AI tools.
3. Edit and refine AI-generated content to ensure originality and readability.
4. Optimize articles for SEO (search engine optimization).
5. Upload and format blog posts on WordPress.
6. Add images, tags, categories, and internal/external links to enhance posts.
7. Stay updated with blogging and digital content trends.                "
Software Testing,"
                            Ravi Ranjan                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Assist in planning, designing, and executing test cases
2. Report bugs and work closely with developers to track and resolve issues
3. Perform manual and automated testing for web/mobile applications
4. Learn and apply QA tools and techniques in a real-world environment
5. Help maintain test documentation and ensure software quality standards                "
Game Designer,"
                            BlackHole Infiverse LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 13,000 /month","
                1. Assist in designing and developing game mechanics, levels, and user interfaces
2. Create and review game design documents, including game design notes and level design documents
3. Participate in playtesting and gather feedback from players to refine game design
4. Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including programming and art teams, to ensure seamless integration of game design elements
5. Stay up-to-date with industry trends and advancements in game design                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Vrutti Technologies Pvt. Ltd.                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,001 - 8,003 /month","
                Company Description

Vrutti Technologies is a leading Software Development and Services company, offering a broad range of services including Application Development, Database Management, Software Development, Mobile Application Development, Desktop Application Development, IT Outsourcing, and processing services. With expertise in IoT software, Deep and Machine Learning, Industry 4.0, and Computer Vision, Vrutti Technologies caters to various business sectors, providing innovative and effective technological solutions.

Role Description
This is a full-time, on-site role located in Surat for a MERN Stack Intern + SDE1. The role involves developing and maintaining web applications using the MERN stack (MySQL, Express.js, React.js, Node.js). The intern will be expected to write clean, scalable code, troubleshoot and debug applications, collaborate with other team members, and stay updated with emerging technologies and industry trends. Additional responsibilities include database management, performance optimisation, and ensuring adherence to secure coding practices.

Location Requirement
Candidates must be based within a 40 km radius of Surat, Gujarat.
This is a strictly on-site role; remote applications will not be considered.

Qualifications
Proficiency in MySQL, Express.js, React.js, and Node.js (MERN Stack)
Solid understanding of JavaScript, HTML, and CSS
Experience with database management and backend development
Familiarity with version control systems like Git
Strong problem-solving skills and attention to detail
Ability to work collaboratively in a team environment
Good communication skills and the ability to learn and adapt to new technologies
A degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, or a related field is preferred

Preferred Knowledge (Good to Have)
Nest.js for scalable backend development
Next.js and Nuxt.js for server-side rendering and full-stack applications
Socket.IO for real-time communication and event-driven applications                "
Robotics,"
                            TinyBots                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Conducting experiential learning sessions and demonstrations
2. Developing products & services for our Robotics & STEM learning programs, focusing on projects based on microcontrollers, drones, IOT, AI, sensors, actuators, breadboard circuits, etc.
3. Building detailed manuals for the finalized projects, ensuring clarity and effectiveness in conveying instructions.
4. Assisting in documenting processes, test results, and design changes throughout the development phase.
5. Contributing to the establishment of safety protocols and standards in alignment with industry best practices.
6. Staying informed about industry trends and advancements in robotics and electronics to integrate relevant knowledge into our curriculum.
7. Maintaining a clean and organized workspace to facilitate efficient project operations.
8. Adhering to instructions, displaying a quick learning ability, and adapting to changing project needs.                "
Site Engineering (Civil),"
                            Voxela Space Factory Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Assist in daily supervision of construction sites.
2. Monitor work progress and ensure quality standards are met.
3. Coordinate effectively with laborers, vendors, and other stakeholders.                "
PHP / Laravel Developer,"
                            Shipper4u                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,001 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Assisting in Software Development: Support the team in developing, testing, and maintaining web and mobile applications related to logistics operations.
2. Data Handling & Analysis: Work with shipment, inventory, and delivery data to generate insights, reports, and optimize processes.
3. Technical Support & Troubleshooting: Help resolve minor bugs, assist in system monitoring, and support the tech team in day-to-day operations.                "
Flutter Developer (Mobile App Development),"
                            Akshat Gupta                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Develop cross-platform mobile applications using Flutter (Android + iOS)
2. Integrate backend APIs (user authentication, video upload/playback, profiles, etc.)
3. Work with Firebase for authentication, database, and notifications
4. Build clean, responsive, and user-friendly UI/UX
5. Collaborate with designers & backend developers for feature implementation
6. Debug, test, and improve app performance
7. Contribute creative ideas to improve app features and user experience                "
Software Development,"
                            URE Legal Advocates                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 /month","
                1. Build and customize applications using Electron.js (screen capturing, icons, UI enhancements).
2. Create EXE/MSI files for Windows and DMG files for macOS.
3. Publish applications on Microsoft Store and Apple App Store.
4. Validate and test builds against existing applications.
5. Implement auto-update, code signing, and compliance standards for distributed apps.
6. Document the build, packaging, and publishing process.                "
Android App Development,"
                            Pixelkube Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Develop an Android app wrapper for an existing HTML5 UI.
2. Ensure the app’s security, stability, and performance.
3. Implement auto-start functionality on device boot.                "
.NET Development,"
                            Pixelkube Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                1. Develop and test back-end APIs for a booking application 
2. Integrate with third-party systems using API
3. Ensure security and scalability of the solution                "
Front End Development,"
                            SigmaMind Research Labs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 20,000 /month","
                As a Front End Development intern at SigmaMind Research Labs, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects using next-generation technologies. We are looking for a talented individual who is proficient in Next.js, SQL, Git, Redux, Node.js, React, and REST API. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with the development team to create user-friendly interfaces for our web applications
2. Implement front-end features using React and Next.js to enhance user experience
3. Work with SQL databases to retrieve and manipulate data for the application
4. Utilize Redux for state management in complex web applications
5. Contribute to the overall architecture and design of the front-end components
6. Integrate with REST APIs to fetch data and communicate with backend services
7. Use Node.js for server-side rendering and optimizing the performance of web applications

If you are passionate about front-end development and eager to gain real-world experience in a dynamic environment, apply now to join our team at SigmaMind Research Labs.                "
Python Algo Developer,"
                            Money Making Trading Courses                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Develop and code 3–4 trading strategies in Python based on our inputs and instructions.
2. Backtest and optimize strategies on past market data (check performance, risk, and profitability).
3. Automate strategies by integrating with broker APIs like Zerodha, Upstox, or Interactive Brokers.
4. Provide clear documentation and a short training on how to use/customize the strategies.
5. Write clean, modular, and well-documented Python code for easy future use.                "
Live Project & Site Visit (Chennai),"
                            Inspacco                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Preparing and submitting daily reports to the Reporting Manager.
2. Managing vendors and ensuring smooth coordination.
3. Supervising sites and overseeing project execution.
4. Gaining practical exposure through active involvement in live projects.                "
Designer/Flutter + Node.js Developer/Next.js Developer,"
                            Deep Nucleus                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 /month","
                1. Designer:
Create wireframes, mockups, and prototypes.
Work with the dev team to ensure UI/UX consistency.

2. Flutter + Node.js Developer:
Build mobile apps in Flutter.
Develop scalable APIs and backend services in Node.js.
Integrate with databases and third-party APIs.

3. Next.js Developer:
Develop responsive web apps using Next.js.
Optimize apps for performance and SEO.
Collaborate with backend developers for API integration.                "
Chromium IOS & Objective-C Development,"
                            Arakoo                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                1. Develop our Chromium based browsers for iOS using Objective C & Rust
2. Troubleshoot and resolve issues related to Chromium and other areas of our software stack
3. Stay up-to-date with the latest developments in Chromium and C++, and apply this knowledge to our products                "
Data Labelling,"
                            Radic Advertising Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Data Annotation & Labelling: Carefully labelling and annotating image and text datasets (such as ad creatives, headlines, CTAs, layouts) following predefined guidelines.
2. Data Cleaning & Preparation: Organising, cleaning, and structuring data using Python scripts or spreadsheets to make it ready for AI model training.
3. Quality Assurance: Reviewing labelled data to ensure consistency, accuracy, and alignment with project requirements.
4. Assist in AI Workflow: Collaborating with the AI team to prepare training datasets and understand how your labelled data impacts model performance.
5. Documentation & Reporting: Maintaining clear records of labelling progress, reporting edge cases, and suggesting improvements to the annotation process.
6. Experiment Support (Optional): Assisting in basic model testing or running small scripts under the guidance of the AI team.
7. Cross-Functional Collaboration: Working closely with designers and product managers to refine annotation standards and understand creative requirements.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Coderstudio                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 3,000 /month","
                1. Assisting in mobile and web application development using Flutter, PHP, or Python.
2. Writing clean, modular, and well-documented code.
3. Participating in daily stand-ups and team discussions.
4. Debugging issues and suggesting improvements.
5. Collaborating with designers and developers to implement features.
6. Learning and applying industry-standard development practices.
7. Testing applications for functionality, performance, and usability.
8. Updating project progress and maintaining proper documentation.                "
Environmental Sciences,"
                            Biofilm Engineers Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,500 /month","
                1. Monitor ETP plant operations and troubleshoot issues
2. Ensure quality during the collection, storage, and delivery of wastewater samples to accredited labs
3. Follow SOPs to monitor the pilot wastewater treatment process
4. Draft reports and create technical drawings
5. Conduct field water quality analysis                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Energy Alternatives India                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain high-quality web applications using PHP and the CodeIgniter 4 framework
2. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to design, implement, and test new features
3. Optimize application performance and ensure scalability and security
4. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure seamless functionality
5. Deploy and manage end-to-end project hosting, including cPanel or AWS                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Udaghosh Social Welfare Society                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,500 - 4,000 /month","
                Are you a passionate Full Stack Development intern looking to make a difference? Join Udaghosh Social Welfare Society and help us create impactful solutions using your expertise in PHP, MySQL, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Python, MongoDB, AngularJS, Node.js, and React. As part of our team, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and contribute to our mission of driving positive change in society.

1. Collaborate with a team of developers to design and implement new features for our platform
2. Write clean, efficient, and well-documented code to ensure the scalability and maintainability of our applications
3. Conduct thorough testing and debugging to identify and resolve any issues in the codebase
4. Stay up-to-date on the latest industry trends and technologies to continuously improve our development processes
5. Assist in the optimization of our applications for maximum speed and performance
6. Work closely with cross-functional teams to integrate front-end and back-end components
7. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to enhance the overall quality of our projects

If you are a motivated individual with a strong passion for technology and social impact, we want to hear from you! Apply now and be a part of our dynamic team at Udaghosh Social Welfare Society.                "
Bakery Manager,"
                            Anisa Chawla                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 14,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about the world of baking and looking to gain hands-on experience in managing a successful bakery operation? Le Four is seeking a dynamic 'Bakery Manager Intern' to join our team!

As a bakery manager intern, you will have the opportunity to learn and develop skills in operations, coordination, culinary arts, sales, procurement, and social media marketing. You will work closely with our team to ensure the smooth operation of our bakery while also contributing to the growth and success of our business.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Assisting in overseeing day-to-day bakery operations, including inventory management, scheduling, and customer service.
2. Coordinating with vendors and suppliers to ensure proper procurement of ingredients and supplies.
3. Collaborating with our culinary team to develop and execute new and innovative bakery products.
4. Driving sales through effective merchandising, pricing strategies, and promotional activities.
5. Managing social media marketing efforts to build brand awareness and engage with customers online.
6. Analyzing sales data and trends to make informed decisions on product offerings and pricing.
7. Assisting in training and supervising bakery staff to maintain high standards of quality and service.

If you are a motivated and enthusiastic individual with a passion for the bakery industry, we want to hear from you! Join us at Le Four and take the first step towards a rewarding career in bakery management.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Offiql Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                We are looking for a talented Flutter Development intern to join our team at Offiql Technologies Private Limited. If you have a strong understanding of Flutter, REST API, Dart, iOS, Android, Firebase, and Cloud Firestore, then we want to hear from you! As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain valuable hands-on experience in the field.

Key responsibilities:
1. Develop and maintain Flutter applications for both iOS and Android platforms
2. Implement REST API integration to fetch and display data in the app
3. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code in Dart programming language
4. Collaborate with the design and product teams to create a seamless user experience
5. Utilize Firebase and Cloud Firestore for real-time database management and authentication
6. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure smooth functioning of the applications
7. Stay updated on the latest industry trends and technologies to continuously improve your skills and knowledge. 

If you are passionate about mobile development and eager to learn, then this is the perfect opportunity for you to kickstart your career in Flutter development. Apply now and embark on an exciting journey with us!                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Yasham Software Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 /month","
                We are looking for a creative and skilled WordPress Intern to join our team. You will assist in developing and maintaining WordPress websites, focusing on creating event site listings, customizing themes, and selecting the right plugins.

 

1. Develop and maintain WordPress websites
2. Customize themes and plugins based on project needs
3. Integrate event listing features with search and registration options
4. Optimize website performance and troubleshoot issues
5. Collaborate with other team members for a seamless user experience                "
Product Design,"
                            Techlanz Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Contribute to brainstorming sessions to generate innovative ideas for new products and features.
2. Develop and communicate design concepts through high-quality sketches, illustrations, and storyboards.
3. Build detailed and accurate 3D models for product concepts and design iterations using Blender and other CAD software.
4. Create photorealistic 3D renderings and visualizations for design reviews, presentations, and marketing materials.
5. Assist in the creation of physical mockups and prototypes to evaluate form, ergonomics, and usability.
6. Apply principles of ergonomic design to ensure products are comfortable, intuitive, and user-friendly.
7. Support the senior design team in conducting user research and usability testing to validate design concepts.
8. Explore and document Color, Material, and Finish (CMF) options that align with product styling and brand identity.
9. Collaborate with engineers to understand technical constraints and ensure design feasibility.
10. Refine product styling and form details based on constructive feedback from team leads.
11. Prepare and maintain design documentation and specification sheets for development handoff.
12. Conduct competitive analysis and research on industry trends to inform design strategy.
13. Assist in preparing compelling presentations to communicate design intent to internal stakeholders.                "
DSA Mentor | CipherSchools,"
                            CipherSchools                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 60,000 - 80,000 /month","
                1. Conduct interactive in-person sessions to teach competitive programming concepts and problem-solving strategies.
2. Design and deliver lectures on algorithms, data structures, and coding techniques relevant to competitive programming.
3. Create and manage coding challenges and mock contests to prepare students for real-world competitions.
4. Provide personalized feedback and guidance to students to enhance their coding skills and efficiency.
5. Mentor students on how to approach coding problems, optimize solutions, and improve their time management during contests.
6. Stay updated with the latest trends in competitive programming and incorporate best practices into the curriculum.
7. Evaluate student progress through regular assessments and provide constructive feedback.
8. Collaborate with other mentors to develop a structured, up-to-date curriculum.                "
Interior Designer - Residential,"
                            House Of Designs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Visiting client sites and understanding their requirements, providing inputs and suggestions to their queries and concerns.
2. Communicating effectively with the client, vendors, and team to address the client's needs.
3. Preparing mood board presentations for clients for better understanding.
4. Suggesting laminates and finishes to clients once the design is finalized.
5. Creating quotes for clients to ensure all the checkpoints have been followed.
6. Communicating with clients regarding products and services.
7. Preparing a production diagram once the design is finalized.                "
Robotics Engineer,"
                            Technoculture Research                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                Internship Title: Robotics Engineer Intern

Location: Bangalore (On-Office)

Internship Type: Full-Time

Duration: 6 Months

About Us:
 We are a stealth Humanoid Robotics Startup, a subsidiary of Technoculture, building a bipedal human-scale humanoid robot. As part of this pioneering team, you will be working at the forefront of robotics, contributing to the early prototypes of the upper body, dexterous hand, and lower body systems.

Internship Description:
 As a Robotics Engineer Intern, you will work on the programming and development of low-level SDKs for our humanoid platform and contribute to training various AI models in simulation. You will be exposed to cutting-edge robotics tools, simulation environments, and real-world system programming challenges.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Programming and developing low-level SDKs for humanoid robotic platforms using Rust and Python
2. Conducting model training in simulation environments such as Isaac Sim and Mujoco
3. Writing highly multithreaded code for efficient system performance
4. Implementing and working with CAN communication protocols, Zenoh, Protobuf, Arrow, and related technologies
5. Collaborating with the AI and robotics teams to integrate software with hardware systems
6. Testing and debugging robotics systems in Linux-based environments

Required Skills (You should have some of these):
1. Low-level programming in C/C++/Rust is useful
2. PyTorch knowledge is useful
3. Strong Python knowledge is useful
4. Hands-on experience with any Linux-based OS

Personal Attributes:
1. Passion for robotics and emerging technologies
2. Ability to work in a fast-paced, research-driven environment
3. Strong problem-solving skills and curiosity to learn                "
Electrical Engineering,"
                            Al Mabrouk Marine Services L.L.C (Dubai, United Arab Emirates)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 25,000 /month","
                1. Assist in troubleshooting and maintenance of marine electrical systems: Switchboards, power distribution, generator controls, emergency systems.
2. Support in servicing, calibration, and configuration of automation systems:
PLCs, HMI, SCADA, Engine Monitoring Systems (EMS), Alarm Monitoring Systems (AMS).
3. Learn to interpret electrical schematics, PLC logic, and system layouts.
4. Participate in inspections, fault diagnostics, and reporting.
5. Collaborate with senior engineers on electrical retrofits, upgrades, and commissioning projects.
6. Prepare service and training documentation as part of the learning process.

ELECTRICAL ENGINEER – TRAINEE / INTERN
Location: India (Training) → Potential Placement in UAE/Oman
Department: Marine Electrical & Automation Services
Reports To: Operations Manager / Project Manager

INTERNSHIP / TRAINING PROGRAM
Location: Training will be conducted in India.
Allowance/Stipend: Provided during training.
Progression: After successful training and performance review, candidates may be offered permanent employment in Dubai, Oman, or other international projects.

BENEFITS (Upon Full-Time Employment)

1. Competitive salary (based on qualifications and performance).
2. Training and mentorship from industry experts.
3. Career progression into marine automation engineering.
4. Health insurance, life insurance, and annual leave benefits (as per UAE labor law).

Soft Skills:

1. Strong willingness to learn and grow in the marine industry.
2. Clear communication and team collaboration.
3. Adaptability to a challenging work environment.                "
Product Management,"
                            Build Fast With AI                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                Are you a strategic thinker with a passion for AI product development and innovation? Build Fast with AI is seeking a talented product management intern to join our team!  As a key member of our product development department, you will play a crucial role in helping shape our GenAI educational products, improve user experience, and drive product growth.



1. Gather and analyze user feedback to identify improvement opportunities for our courses and workshops
2. Collaborate with technical teams to translate user needs into product features and enhancements
3. Help create product roadmaps and prioritize feature development
4. Conduct competitive analysis and market research within the AI education space
5. Support the creation of product documentation, user guides, and feature specifications                "
Full Stack AI Engineer,"
                            DigiPlus IT                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:
 
1. Build & Ship Features: Design, build, and maintain full-stack features in Node and Next.js (including UI, server components, and protected API routes) that integrate complex LLM and retrieval systems.
2. Implement RAG Pipelines: Develop and own entire Retrieval-Augmented Generation (RAG) pipelines: from text ingestion, chunking, and embedding to vector storage, retrieval, and response synthesis.
3. Orchestrate AI Workflows: Utilize frameworks like LangGraph, LangChain or LlamaIndex to orchestrate sophisticated retrieval flows, tool usage, and multi-agent systems.
4. Optimize Database Performance: Design and optimize data models and queries in MongoDB to ensure low latency and support high concurrency.
5. Implement Caching Strategies: Integrate and manage caching layers using Redis (or equivalent) for embeddings, search results, and critical session data to enhance performance.
6. Focus on Performance & Cost: Work on improving the observability, performance (latency, batching), and cost-efficiency of our AI services through prompt engineering and infrastructure tweaks.
7. Collaborate on System Design: Contribute to system design discussions for scaling our applications, suggesting improvements for load-balancing, horizontal scaling, and fault tolerance.
8. Uphold Engineering Excellence: Write clean, maintainable code, comprehensive tests, and clear documentation. You will also set up reproducible local/dev environments and present demos of your work.                "
Software Testing,"
                            SIRPI Products & Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 14,999 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Perform various testing activities, including functional, regression, and user acceptance testing.
2. Clearly document test cases, identify bugs, and track their resolution.
3. Participate and handle/interact in client meetings, understanding requirements and feedback.
4. Communicate project status updates effectively to the management.
5. Collaborate closely with development and product teams                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Emoolar Technology Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 5,500 /month","
                As a Full Stack Development intern at Emoolar Technology Private Limited, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain hands-on experience in the tech industry. We are looking for someone who is proficient in HTML, CSS, and JavaScript, and is eager to learn and grow in a fast-paced environment.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement new features for our web applications.
2. Assist in troubleshooting and resolving technical issues on our platforms.
3. Optimize web applications for maximum speed and scalability.
4. Work on front-end and back-end development tasks to enhance user experience.
5. Conduct research and stay up-to-date on the latest technologies and trends in the field.
6. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve code quality.
7. Support the team in testing and debugging software to ensure seamless functionality.

If you are a motivated and talented individual looking to kickstart your career in full stack development, apply now and join our dynamic team at Emoolar Technology Private Limited.                "
Subject Matter Expert - Vivado Software,"
                            Learn & Care                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 25,000 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy individual with expertise in Vivado Software? Learn & Care is seeking a dynamic Subject Matter Expert intern to join our team! 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with the development team to enhance existing Vivado software applications.
2. Provide technical support and training to internal staff on Vivado software usage.
3. Conduct research and stay updated on the latest trends and advancements in Vivado technology.
4. Assist in troubleshooting and resolving software issues as they arise.
5. Develop and implement innovative solutions to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of Vivado software.
6. Participate in team meetings and contribute ideas to drive continuous improvement.
7. Support the development of educational materials and resources for Vivado software training programs.

If you are passionate about Vivado software and eager to gain valuable hands-on experience in a fast-paced environment, apply now to become a vital part of our team!                "
Front End Development,"
                            Basti Ki Pathshala Foundation                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Are you a talented Front End Development intern looking to make a difference in the world? Join us at Basti Ki Pathshala Foundation, a non-profit organization dedicated to providing quality education to underprivileged children in rural India. As a Front End Development intern, you will have the opportunity to showcase your skills in HTML, JavaScript, and CSS while contributing to our mission of empowering young minds. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with the design team to create visually appealing and user-friendly web interfaces.
2. Implement responsive design principles to ensure seamless user experience across devices.
3. Optimize website performance through code optimization and troubleshooting.
4. Participate in brainstorming sessions to generate innovative ideas for web development projects.
5. Conduct thorough testing to identify and fix any bugs or issues in the code.
6. Stay updated on the latest trends and best practices in front end development.
7. Assist in maintaining and updating existing websites to ensure they are always up-to-date and functional. 

If you are passionate about using your technical skills for a good cause, apply now and be a part of our team at Basti Ki Pathshala Foundation!                "
AI For Climate Tech,"
                            Energy Alternatives India                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about leveraging artificial intelligence to revolutionize sustainability, climate action, and decarbonization efforts? Climate tech refers to a range of solutions, innovations, and technologies used to combat climate change and global warming. AI and Climate Tech are two industries that are likely to completely disrupt the way we live, work, and grow. The potential of AI is already well-known, and so are select domains within climate tech - solar power, electric vehicles, to name two. But the climate tech spectrum is far wider, and growing wider, with the addition of a number of emerging domains. The world of climate tech has a potential as high as that of AI, or even higher, to make a dramatic difference to our world. Interestingly, these two high-impact sectors have a number of intersections, thus resulting in the fast-growing AI for Climate Tech domain. At EAI, a leading climate tech consulting firm, we are keen to leverage our expertise to provide consulting and research support to Indian and international clients in this exciting intersection of AI for climate tech. To support our efforts, we are looking for a couple of interns who have the intellectual ability and passion to contribute to this exciting, high-impact domain.

Do you have a strong background or interest in one or more of the following: AI, neural networks, machine learning, renewable energy, energy storage, energy efficiency, biotech, electric mobility, low-carbon agriculture, ESG? If so, we have the perfect opportunity for you as an AI for Climate Tech Intern at Energy Alternatives India!



1. Learn about AI algorithms & frameworks that are currently used in diverse climate tech domains.
2. Undertake research into the various applications of AI in biotech that are commercialized or are close to commercialization
3. Evaluate prominent companies in India and globally that are providing critical AI & ML solutions for diverse climate solutions & decarbonization domains
4. Deep dive into specific AI applications for renewable energy, energy efficiency, energy storage (batteries specifically), electric mobility, carbon capture, storage & utilization, solutions for hard-to-decarbonize industries.
5. Evaluate AI-based solutions that can make a significant difference to sustainability, clean energy, and climate tech
5. Conduct research and analyses to identify new opportunities for businesses in this exciting sector.
6. Stay up-to-date on the latest advancements in AI and climate tech to contribute innovative ideas.

If you are ready to make a significant impact for the use of AI in the climate tech industry and gain hands-on experience in learning about cutting-edge technologies and concepts, apply now for this exciting internship opportunity at Energy Alternatives India                "
Software Engineer,"
                            Giddly.com                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 50,000 /month","
                1. Full-stack software engineering: front-end, backend, AI/ML
2. Design/implement quality product features
3. Quality improvement and production engineering support                "
Embedded Software Development,"
                            Gray Mobility                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Develop software components for electric vehicles, including Battery Management. 
2. Systems (BMS), Vehicle Control Units (VCU), charging systems, and motor controllers.
3. Test and validate software components using Model-in-the-Loop (MIL), Software-in-the-Loop (SIL), and Hardware-in-the-Loop (HIL) methodologies.
4. Perform static code analysis to ensure software quality, compliance, and robustness.
5. Create and maintain design documentation, reports, and technical presentations.
6. Research emerging technologies, materials, and methodologies relevant to EV software development.
7. Oversee the product lifecycle, from prototype development to production, ensuring seamless transitions and providing post-production support.                "
Embedded Hardware Design,"
                            Gray Mobility                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Assist in the design and development of hardware components for electric vehicles, including BMS, VCU, ADAS, charging systems, and motor controllers
2. Hardware testing and validation processes to ensure compliance with safety standards and performance requirements
3. Help in the integration and troubleshooting of hardware subsystems within electric vehicle platforms
4. Contribute to design documentation, reports, and presentations
5. Conduct research on new technologies, materials, and design methodologies related to EV hardware development
6. Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including software, mechanical, and electrical engineers
7. Assist with prototype assembly, board bringup, testing, and evaluation of EV hardware                "
Android App Development Mentor,"
                            Tutedude                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                As an Android App Development Mentor intern at Tutedude, you will have the opportunity to work with a dynamic team and gain hands-on experience in developing cutting-edge mobile applications using Kotlin. Your role will involve guiding and mentoring students in mastering Android app development skills, providing support and feedback on projects, and assisting in curriculum development to ensure a comprehensive learning experience. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Mentor students in Kotlin programming language and Android app development best practices
2. Guide students through the development process, from ideation to deployment on the Google Play Store
3. Provide constructive feedback on code quality, UI/UX design, and overall project execution
4. Collaborate with the curriculum team to enhance and update learning materials based on industry trends
5. Conduct workshops and training sessions to enhance students' technical skills and knowledge
6. Stay up-to-date with the latest Android development technologies and tools
7. Assist in organizing hackathons, coding challenges, and other events to promote student engagement and creativity

Join us at Tutedude and unleash your potential as a mentor and developer in the exciting world of Android app development.                "
ReactJS Development,"
                            Wakandabooks Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Build & Maintain – Develop responsive web pages and reusable React.js components from UI/UX designs.
2. Debug & Integrate – Fix issues, optimize performance, and connect frontend with backend APIs.
3. Collaborate & Learn – Work with mentors, follow coding standards, and participate in daily team discussions.                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Practice Buzz                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Develop, customize, and maintain WordPress websites, themes, and plugins.
2. Troubleshoot and fix WordPress-related issues, including performance optimization.
3. Write clean, well-documented, and efficient PHP code.
4. Collaborate with designers and other developers to implement website features.
5. Ensure website security, responsiveness, and cross-browser compatibility.
6. Optimize websites for  technical SEO and speed performance.
7. Stay updated with the latest WordPress trends, updates, and best practices.                "
Python Development,"
                            Think Act Rise Foundation                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Utilize Chat GPT and OpenAI API for content generation and automation.
2. Perform web scraping using Selenium, BeautifulSoup, or other libraries.
3. Assist in Python scripting for automation and data processing.
4. Assist in Python scripting for automation and data processing.
5. Use N8N for automation.                "
Python Development,"
                            EvoNexis                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                Are you a Python wiz with a passion for web development and machine learning? Join us at EvoNexis as a Python Development intern! Work alongside our talented team to create cutting-edge solutions that drive our business forward. Your HTML, CSS, Python, Django, Machine Learning, REST API, and Flask skills will be put to the test in this fast-paced environment.

1. Collaborate with senior developers to design and implement web applications using Python and Django.
2. Develop REST APIs to integrate with various systems and databases.
3. Utilize machine learning algorithms to optimize application performance and user experience.
4. Work on front-end development using HTML and CSS for a seamless user interface.
5. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging code to ensure smooth functionality.
6. Research and stay up-to-date on the latest technologies and trends in the industry.
7. Contribute to team meetings and brainstorming sessions to provide innovative solutions to complex problems.

Don't miss this opportunity to kickstart your career in Python development with EvoNexis! Apply now and take your skills to the next level.                "
Web Development,"
                            EvoNexis                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                As a Web Development intern at EvoNexis, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects and gain valuable hands-on experience in the field. We are looking for a talented individual who is proficient in PHP, MySQL, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, jQuery, WordPress, Bootstrap, Node.js, and React.

Key responsibilities:
1. Assist in the development and maintenance of company websites and web applications.
2. Collaborate with the team to design and implement new features and functionality.
3. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure optimal performance and user experience.
4. Stay up-to-date with industry trends and best practices to enhance skills.
5. Contribute to the planning and execution of web development projects.
6. Provide support and assistance to team members as needed.
7. Demonstrate creativity and innovation in problem-solving and project execution.

If you are passionate about web development and eager to learn and grow in a dynamic environment, apply now to join our team at EvoNexis!                "
Online Teaching (Full Stack),"
                            CodingZen                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Conducting live online classes as per the given pedagogy and curriculum for students of the age range 10-16 years for full stack
2. Working on content development, improvement including notes, flashcards, question banks, and online LMS
3. Making the classes engaging, interactive, and personalized as per the student learning process                "
Content Writing (Research Associate In Computer Sciecne),"
                            Megaminds IT Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Researching the article and writing research articles like Scopus Indexed, SCI, and IEEE conference papers for computer science related 
2. Proofreading research content related to computer science
3. Building algorithms for research papers
4. Evaluating research content in computer science                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Sankar Group                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 3,001 /month","
                We are seeking a talented Flutter Development intern to join our team at Sankar Group. If you are passionate about Flutter, REST API, Dart, iOS, Android, Firebase, and Cloud Firestore, this is the perfect opportunity for you to gain hands-on experience and showcase your skills. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and collaborate with our experienced developers.

Key Responsibilities:
1. Develop and maintain mobile applications using Flutter for iOS and Android platforms.
2. Implement REST API integration to enhance app functionality and user experience.
3. Utilize Dart programming language to write clean and efficient code for app development.
4. Work with Firebase and Cloud Firestore for data storage, authentication, and backend services.
5. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to ensure seamless integration of features and functionalities.
6. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging issues to improve app performance and user satisfaction.
7. Stay updated on the latest trends and technologies in mobile app development to contribute innovative ideas to the team. 

If you are eager to learn and grow in a dynamic environment, apply now to kickstart your career in Flutter development with Sankar Group!                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Infits                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                As a Flutter Development intern at Infits, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge mobile app projects and gain valuable hands-on experience in the world of Flutter development. Your expertise in Flutter, Dart, Firebase, REST API, Android, iOS, and Cloud Firestore will be crucial in helping us deliver high-quality mobile applications to our clients. 

1. Collaborate with our team of developers to design and implement new features for mobile apps
2. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code using Flutter and Dart
3. Integrate Firebase services and REST APIs to enhance app functionality
4. Test and debug mobile apps to ensure they meet performance and quality standards
5. Work closely with designers to implement UI/UX designs for a seamless user experience
6. Stay up-to-date on the latest trends and technologies in mobile app development
7. Assist in troubleshooting and resolving technical issues as they arise 

If you are a passionate and driven individual looking to kickstart your career in mobile app development, this is the perfect opportunity for you. Join us at Infits and be part of a dynamic team that is dedicated to creating innovative and impactful mobile solutions. Apply now and take the first step towards a successful career in Flutter development.                "
Web Development,"
                            OmniSoft Consulting                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 /month","
                1. Working on creating interactive websites
2. Working on staying plugged into emerging technologies/industry trends and applying them to operations/activities
3. Working on other miscellaneous tasks (e.g. Word, PowerPoint, Basic Video Editing etc.)

Requirements:

1. Willingness to learn new technologies
2. Knowledge of HTML, CSS, and JavaScript (basic requirement)

Note:

1. We believe one can always learn, so don't get disheartened by seeing all the desired skills, you can still be selected if you are willing to learn
2. Graduates in any discipline with relevant knowledge/experience in website development are welcome to apply
3. Freshers are welcome to apply.
4. Based on your performance, a full-time job may be offered to you                "
Front End Development,"
                            Emoolar Technology Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 5,000 /month","
                As a Front End Development intern at Emoolar Technology Private Limited, you will have the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technologies and contribute to exciting projects. Your role will involve collaborating with our team to create visually stunning and user-friendly websites and web applications. 



1. Develop responsive and interactive front end interfaces using HTML, CSS, and Tailwind CSS.
2. Utilize Next.js to build fast and scalable web applications.
3. Integrate APIs to enhance the functionality of our web projects.
4. Implement Search Engine Optimization (SEO) best practices to improve website visibility.
5. Ensure designs are optimized for various devices and screen sizes through responsive design techniques.
6. Create engaging animations to enhance user experience and site aesthetics.
7. Collaborate with the team to brainstorm and implement innovative solutions to technical challenges. 

If you are a passionate and driven individual with a strong understanding of front end development technologies, we encourage you to apply for this internship and take your skills to the next level at Emoolar Technology Private Limited.                "
Web Development,"
                            Tapovan Impex Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. • Design, build, and edit website layouts, pages, and content.
2.  • Customize templates, add new sections, and ensure responsive design across devices.
3.  • Optimize pages for speed, SEO, and accessibility.
4.  • Upload and format images, videos, and written content.
5.  • Troubleshoot and fix layout or functionality issues on the hosting platform.
6.  • Collaborate with marketing and content teams to ensure brand consistency.
7.  • Keep the website updated with new features, plug-ins, and security patches.                "
Problem Setter – Data Structures & Algorithms,"
                            CipherSchools                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                We are looking for passionate programmers who love solving problems and want to contribute to the learning journey of thousands of students. As a Problem Setter Intern, you will



1. Design original and engaging coding problems in Data Structures and Algorithms (easy, medium, and hard).
2. Write clean test cases to validate correctness and edge cases.
3. Provide detailed editorial/solution explanations for each problem (in C++/Java/Python).
4. Review, debug, and test existing problems for quality assurance.                "
AI Agent Automation For Content Generation,"
                            Refratherm International Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 11,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. research, design, and deploy AI agent systems, build workflow automations, and run cross-platform outreach (WhatsApp, LinkedIn, email). 
2. pick up any tool (Shopify, React, Make.com, n8n, etc.), integrate AI for automation, and relentlessly troubleshoot until working solutions are built. 
3. Experiment with agents, content automation, and image generators in production-ready pipelines.
The goal is to automate creation of high-quality content (blogs, landing pages, product pages, visuals) so our website becomes searchable and optimized for AI tools like ChatGPT, Gemini, and other emerging bots. This role blends technical automation with content strategy—automating research, generation, and publishing so the site continuously grows as an AI-discoverable knowledge base.                "
Embedded Systems,"
                            YuDash Systems Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 11,000 - 16,000 /month","
                1. Working ESP32/Arduino/display/peripherals using Arduino
2. Working on  ARM processor/STM32/Linux.
3. Working on basic circuit connection for trials                "
Web Development,"
                            BMARKT TECAMAT PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Job Title: Web Developer Intern
 Company Name: India IPO
 Location: Netaji Subhash Place (NSP), Delhi
 Internship Duration: 3 Months
 Stipend: ₹10,000 – ₹15,000 per month
 Working Days: Monday to Saturday
 Shift Timings: 9:30 AM – 6:30 PM

About the Internship
India IPO is looking for passionate and motivated Web Developer Interns who want to gain hands-on experience in website development and real-time projects. This internship will help you enhance your technical skills and prepare you for professional opportunities in the IT industry.



1. Assist in designing, coding, and modifying websites.
2. Work on front-end and back-end development tasks.
3. Collaborate with the team to implement new features.
4. Optimize websites for performance and responsiveness.
5. Debug and troubleshoot issues in existing projects.
6. Stay updated with emerging technologies and industry trends.

Skills Required

1. Basic knowledge of HTML, CSS, JavaScript.
2. Understanding of PHP, Python, or Node.js (added advantage).
3. Familiarity with React / Angular / Vue.js is a plus.
4. Basic knowledge of databases (MySQL/MongoDB).
5. Strong problem-solving and teamwork skills.

Who Can Apply
Students or freshers with a background in Computer Science, IT, or related fields.

Candidates available for a 3-month full-time internship at NSP, Delhi.
Experience candidate can also apply 
Willing to work Monday to Saturday in-office                "
Java Development,"
                            EvoNexis                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                As a Java Development Intern at EvoNexis, you will have the opportunity to work with a dynamic team of professionals in a fast-paced and collaborative environment. Your knowledge of Java, MySQL, JSP, J2EE, Hibernate ORM, and Spring MVC will be put to the test as you assist in the development and maintenance of our cutting-edge software solutions. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Assist in the design, development, and implementation of new software features and enhancements using Java technologies.
2. Collaborate with senior developers to troubleshoot and resolve technical issues in existing applications.
3. Write clean, efficient, and well-documented code to ensure the scalability and maintainability of our software products.
4. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve overall code quality.
5. Conduct thorough testing to identify and fix bugs before deployment to production environments.
6. Stay up-to-date on the latest trends and best practices in Java development to continuously improve your skills.
7. Contribute to team meetings and brainstorming sessions to generate innovative ideas for future projects. 

Join us at EvoNexis and gain valuable hands-on experience that will propel your career in Java development to new heights.                "
Video Editing/Making,"
                            BestIAm Consulting International Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                We are looking for a creative and detail-oriented video editor intern to join our team. The candidate will be responsible for editing, producing, and optimizing video content for BestIAm’s social media platforms, including YouTube, Instagram, LinkedIn, and Facebook. The role requires both technical expertise and creative storytelling to communicate our brand message on sustainability, reuse, and recycling effectively.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Searching clips, images online, and/or raw footage from the team depending on the content and context.
2. Editing raw footage into engaging, high-quality videos for YouTube, Instagram, LinkedIn, and other platforms.
3. Creating short-form content (reels, stories, shorts) and long-form videos aligned with BestIAm’s brand message.
4. Adding intros, outros, captions, subtitles (Hindi & English), graphics, animations, and transitions.
5. Ensuring videos are optimized for different platforms (e.g., aspect ratios: 16:9, 9:16, 1:1 or as required).
6. Collaborating with the content and marketing team to align videos with campaign goals and storytelling formats.
7. Incorporating feedback from the creative team and delivering final outputs on time.
8. Maintaining consistency in tone, style, and branding across all creatives.
9. Researching social media trends and suggesting creative video ideas to boost engagement.
10. Managing and organizing video files, projects, and archives efficiently.
11. Ensuring sound clarity, background music, and overall quality meet professional standards.                "
Data Science AI&ML Python Research,"
                            Megaminds IT Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Write reusable, testable, and efficient code
2. Design and implementation of low-latency, high-availability, and performant applications.
3. Integrate user-facing elements developed by front-end developers with server-side logic.
4. Implement security and data protection.
5. Integrate data storage solutions.
6. Work on performance tuning, improvement, balancing, usability, and automation.
7. Work collaboratively with the design team to understand end-user requirements to provide technical solutions and for the implementation of new software features.                "
Front End Development,"
                            Stacks (Techaboard Digi Solutions Private Limited)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                We are an AI product lab, building at the intersection of AI, personalization, and the browser. Over the last 2 years, we've shipped multiple products, including: Stacks - an intelligent workspace to calm internet noise, Converse. so - a calls-first CRM for Indian SMBs Rize. so - a creator playground for starting small and staying consistent
Our philosophy: Build fast, validate real problems, and turn bold ideas into products people actually use. As a Front End Development intern at Better Stacks, you will have the opportunity to work and build engaging interfaces with JavaScript, ReactJS, and Node.js. 

  

1. Collaborate with the design team to implement user-friendly interfaces
2. Develop and maintain code for various web applications, including dashboard, landing page, and Chrome extensions
3. Optimize applications for maximum speed and scalability
4. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure smooth functionality
5. Stay up-to-date with industry trends and best practices in front-end development
6. Assist in testing and quality assurance processes
7. Contribute innovative ideas to improve user experience and overall product quality 

If you are passionate about front-end development, have an eye for design, and are eager to enhance your skills in a fast-paced environment, this internship is perfect for you.                "
Technical Writer,"
                            DTALES Tech                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 /month","
                Do you have a passion for transforming complex technical information into clear, concise, and engaging content? Are you excited to work in a fast-paced environment alongside a talented team of technical writers and subject matter experts? If so, we want to hear from you.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Develop comprehensive technical documentation: Creating user manuals, online help systems, tutorials, and other technical documentation for a variety of software and hardware products.
2. Collaborate with subject matter experts: Working closely with engineers, developers, and other technical stakeholders to gather information, understand product features, and ensure accuracy and completeness of documentation.
3. Contribute to the development of documentation processes: Participating in process improvement initiatives and contributing to the development of best practices within the team.
4. Stay updated on industry trends: Staying abreast of emerging technologies and industry best practices in technical documentation.                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            Cosy Toys                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 13,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Developing and maintaining the mobile application for Android and iOS
2. Designing UI/UX for a kid-friendly and parent-friendly interface
3. Integrating the application with toy hardware via Bluetooth/Wi-Fi and cloud APIs
4. Implementing AI features such as voice interaction, chat, and content integration
5. Building a parental dashboard with usage monitoring and content controls
6. Assisting in testing toy–application interactions and fixing bugs
7. Collaborating with hardware and AI teams to ensure smooth integration
8. Documenting features, processes, and updates for future reference                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            ABMR TradeX                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. As a mechanical engineering intern at ABMR TradeX, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects and gain hands-on experience in a dynamic and fast-paced environment. 
2. Your knowledge of CAD software, including Autodesk Fusion 360, SolidWorks, and Catia will be put to the test as you collaborate with our team of engineers to design and develop innovative solutions. 
3. Your proficiency in MS-Excel will come in handy as you analyze data and create detailed reports to support your designs. 
4. With experience in 3D printing and ANSYS, you will be able to bring your ideas to life and test their performance using simulation software. 
5. Your skills in CNC machining and AutoCAD will be essential as you work on prototyping and manufacturing processes. 
6. In addition, your ability to sketch and communicate your ideas effectively will be crucial in presenting your designs to stakeholders. 

Join us at ABMR TradeX and take the first step towards a successful career in mechanical engineering. Apply now and be part of a team that is shaping the future of technology.                "
Interior Design,"
                            Milieu Design House                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                A. Design Support:
1. Assisting in preparing mood boards and design presentations.
2. Researching materials, finishes, and furniture options within project budgets.
3. Supporting drafting layouts and drawings on AutoCAD/SketchUp.

B. Site Work:
1. Accompanying senior designers on site visits for measurements and supervision.
2. Documenting site progress with photos, notes, and updates.
3. Coordinating with contractors/vendors for deliveries and installations.

C. Vendor & Material Coordination:
1. Sourcing samples of fabrics, finishes, and materials from local markets/showrooms.
2. Maintaining an organized material library (catalogs, samples, swatches).
3. Following up with vendors on quotations and timelines.

D. Project Documentation:
1. Preparing project files (BOQs, quotations, checklists, and schedules).
2. Updating and maintaining drawings, revisions, and site records.

E. Client Interaction Support:
1. Assisting in setting up presentations/meetings with clients.
2. Taking notes during client discussions for team reference.

F. Office & Team Assistance:
1. Helping in preparing 3D visualizations or render touch-ups (if skilled).
2. Supporting social media/documentation of ongoing projects.
3. Organizing office documents, samples, and reference materials.

G. Learning & Development:
1. Shadowing seniors to learn design processes and project management.
2. Gaining exposure to Mumbai’s vendor network, pricing trends, and sourcing hubs.                "
Supply Chain Management (SCM),"
                            Thakral Innovations Private Limited (Nespresso Division)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Monitoring logistics, warehouse, and inventory operations.
2. Analyzing supply chain data and performance.
3. Identifying and resolving any supply chain issues.
4. Ensuring adherence to all relevant guidelines, regulations, and standards.
5. Optimizing processes to improve efficiency and reduce costs.
6. Collaborating and having knowledge of purchase orders (PO).                "
Python Development,"
                            Regime Tax Solutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 14,999 - 20,000 /month","
                Are you a Python enthusiast looking to kickstart your career in software development? Regime Tax Solutions Private Limited is seeking a talented Python Development intern to join our dynamic team! 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

New Feature Development

1. Translate product requirements into clean, efficient Python code using Fast API, Flask or Django.
2. Design RESTful APIs and async background workers using Celery or native async.
3. Model relational schemas in MySQL, PostgreSQL (primary) with SQL Alchemy, Alembic, or Django ORM as appropriate.
4. Embed logging, metrics, and tracing from day one; enforce secure-by-default coding practices.

Platform Evolution & Code Quality

1. Refactor monolith or tightly coupled code into modular microservices.
2. Adopt clean architecture principles for separation of concerns and testability.
3. Promote best practices—immutability, type hints, PEP8, and well-structured exception handling.

Testing & Quality Assurance 

1. Maintain unit and integration tests using unit test, uni test, and coverage.py.
2. Use tools like tox, Test containers, and mocks for environment-agnostic testing.
3. Help back-fill critical tests for existing services and coach team-mates in TDD/BDD techniques.

Production Tractability

1. Configure structured logging (struct, loguru) and tracing with OpenTelemetry.
2. Participate in incident response and blameless post-mortems; continuously improve run-books.                "
Service Coordinator,"
                            Bhoomi Process Management Pvt Ltd                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 25,000 /month","
                Both fresher and 1-year-experienced candidates can apply. The candidates from both the instrumentation and electrical fields can apply.
 


1.  Customer support:
A.  Greet and assist customers (in person, phone, or email).
B.  Record service requests, complaints, and feedback.
  
2.    Documentation & reporting:
A. Maintain service logs, job cards, and checklists.
B. Update customer service records in ERP/CRM/software.

3.  Coordination:
A. Assist service engineers with tools, spares, and materials.
B. Ensure timely dispatch and tracking of service-related items.

4. Administrative tasks:
A. Prepare quotations, invoices, and service-related documents.
B. Maintain files, service agreements, and calibration certificates.

5.  Follow-up & feedback:
A. Confirm job completion with customers.
B. Collect customer feedback and escalate unresolved issues.
C. Ensure high customer satisfaction and repeat business.                "
Associate – Software Consulting & Solutions,"
                            Elovient Software Solutions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                1. Support the team in scoping and documenting software requirements, workflows, and solution briefs.
2. Research industries, clients, and emerging technologies to assist in project planning and product roadmaps.
3. Prepare presentations, proposals, and reports to support client discussions and business development.
4. Design and edit business communication material, decks, and creatives using tools like PowerPoint, Google Slides, or Canva.
5. Collaborate with designers using Figma to review wireframes, prototypes, and UI/UX mockups, ensuring alignment with business needs.
6. Collaborate with product managers, designers, and developers on ongoing initiatives, ensuring smooth communication and timely follow-up.
7. Participate in client calls, capture key action items, and support delivery teams with follow-through.
8. Assist in maintaining internal documentation, project updates, and knowledge bases.                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            OneAccord                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Work on CAD design
2. Work on manufacturing & operations management
3. Work on client interaction                "
Front End Development,"
                            Letstream Ventures Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Develop, test, and maintain dynamic front-end applications using Vue
2. Collaborate with the design and backend teams to create seamless user interfaces and enhance user experience
3. Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code while adhering to best practices
4. Debug and troubleshoot existing code to enhance functionality and performance
5. Optimise applications for speed and scalability
6. Work on integrating RESTful APIs and third-party services with Vue applications
7. Stay updated with the latest trends and advancements in Vue and front-end development                "
.NET Development,"
                            COEPD (Center Of Excellence For Professional Development)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Application Development: Design, develop, test, and deploy applications using the .NET framework (C#, ASP.NET, .NET Core).
2. Web Development: Work with ASP.NET MVC and .NET Core to build robust web applications.
3. Coding & Implementation: Write clean, scalable, and reusable code while adhering to coding standards and best practices.
4. Requirement Analysis: Understand client and business requirements to deliver optimal solutions.
5. Solution Building: Develop web, desktop, mobile, or cloud-based applications based on project needs.                "
Data Analytics- Internship,"
                            Brooke Hospital For Animals (India)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                BI wants to empower the differently abled/people with disabilities, who have an interest in social work and animal welfare. So here is the opportunity to Intern with us!

 

1.  Helping with ongoing team projects
2. Learning industry tools and software
3. Creating presentations, spreadsheets, or documents
4. Brainstorming ideas during team meetings                "
Email Auditor,"
                            Om Shree Siddhivinayak Foundation                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Key responsibilities:

1. Review and audit internal and external email communications for compliance, tone, branding, grammar, and accuracy.
2. Identify risks or violations in email communications and escalate issues as necessary.
3. Provide actionable feedback and suggestions to improve email quality, effectiveness, and clarity.
4. Collaborate with teams across compliance, marketing, customer service, and IT to standardize email practices.
5. Maintain documentation and audit logs of reviewed communications.
6. Assist in training teams on best practices for professional and compliant email communication.

We are seeking a detail-oriented and analytical Email Auditor to join our compliance and quality assurance team. The Email Auditor will be responsible for reviewing and analyzing outbound and inbound email communications to ensure adherence to company policies, regulatory standards, and brand guidelines. This role plays a critical part in maintaining communication integrity, identifying gaps in compliance, and improving email performance across the organization.                "
Python Development (Next.js),"
                            Freelance Trainings                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                We are looking for a dynamic Python Development intern to join our team at Freelance Training Company. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain hands-on experience in Python, Django, REST API and Next.js

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with our development team to design and implement new features for our training platform
2. Develop and maintain REST API services to support our web applications
3. Write efficient and scalable code using best practices
4. Communicate effectively with team members and stakeholders to ensure project success
5. Utilize self-learning skills to stay up-to-date with the latest technologies and trends in software development
6. Identify and resolve any bugs or issues through effective debugging techniques

If you are a motivated individual with strong interpersonal skills and a passion for learning, we want to hear from you! Join us in revolutionizing the way people learn through our innovative training solutions. Apply now to kickstart your career in Python development!                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Fallon Studio                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 5,000 /month","
                1. Debug existing code and eliminate technical bottlenecks.
2. Improve and optimize our current tech stack for scalability and stability.
3. Modify and enhance existing features based on user experience.
4. Build new functionalities with clean, production-ready code.
5. Collaborate with the founding team to make the product robust and market-ready.
6. Suggest and implement best practices for performance, security, and maintainability.
7. Ability to host on AWS and optimize code without issues.                "
Biomedical,"
                            Value Kare Healthtech LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Conduct data analysis of Biomedical equipment's performance to identify trends and insights that will drive decision-making and improve patient outcomes.
2. Create visually appealing presentations and reports using MS-PowerPoint and Canva to communicate complex data effectively.
3. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to develop and implement innovative solutions for healthcare challenges in asset management and maintenance.
4. Assist in the development and execution of the biomedical equipment budget.
5. Utilize Power BI to visualize key performance indicators and track metrics for equipment performance success.
6. Support the implementation and optimization of electronic health record systems and telehealth platforms.
7. Stay current on industry trends and advancements in Hospital technology to contribute fresh ideas and perspectives to the team.                "
Software Testing,"
                            OyeLabs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Work on testing current products and identifying deficiencies.
2. Suggest solutions to identified product problems.
3. Investigate product quality to make improvements to achieve better customer satisfaction.
4. Plan, create, and manage the overall quality planning strategy.
5. Collaborate with the product development team to ensure consistent project execution.
6. Identify quality assurance process bottlenecks and suggest actions for improvement.
7. Oversee continuous improvement projects.
8. Collect quality data.
9. Identify key KPIs for product quality.
10. Prepare and present reports and metrics to senior management.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Tinydata Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 55,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities 
Frontend Development:

Develop and maintain user-friendly web applications using React, Vite, React Native or other modern frameworks.

Implement responsive UI/UX designs for seamless user experience.

Optimize frontend performance and troubleshoot issues.


Backend Development:

Build and manage backend services using Node.js and related technologies.

Develop RESTful APIs and integrate third-party services.

Ensure database efficiency using MongoDB, PostgreSQL, or MySQL.


General Responsibilities:

Participate in daily scrum meetings and provide development updates.

Collaborate with designers, developers, and stakeholders to deliver high-quality solutions.

Debug, test, and deploy applications.

Stay updated with the latest web technologies and industry trends.                "
Project Technician,"
                            Healthtech Pivot Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Implementation in hospitals.
2. Conduct requirement gathering, installation coordination, and go-live support.
3. Work closely with hospital CSSD and OT staff to ensure operational readiness.
4. Carry out barcode etching on surgical instruments.
5. O​perate laser marking machines (training will be provided if required).
6. Training & Service Support - Offer post-implementation service support and resolve operational issues.
7. Inventory Management - Maintain proper stock records and usage logs.
8. Prepare and maintain all project-related documentation.
9. Submit implementation reports, progress updates, and feedback.
10. Perform any other responsibilities assigned by the management from time to time.
11. Willingness to travel globally and work in hospital environments                "
Web Development,"
                            Archivision Design & Construction Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                As a Web Development intern at Archivision Design & Construction Services, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain hands-on experience in the field. Your responsibilities will include:

1. Collaborating with the team to design and develop visually appealing websites using HTML, CSS, and JavaScript
2. Implementing WordPress themes and customizing websites to meet client needs
3. Utilizing Search Engine Optimization (SEO) techniques to improve website visibility and rankings
4. Creating engaging graphic designs using Adobe Photoshop for various digital platforms
5. Incorporating Artificial Intelligence technology to enhance user experience and streamline processes
6. Assisting in website maintenance and troubleshooting technical issues as they arise
7. Staying up-to-date on industry trends and best practices to continuously improve web development skills

Join us at Archivision Design & Construction Services and expand your knowledge and skills in web development while contributing to innovative projects in the design and construction industry.                "
Founder Office,"
                            Daalchini Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 13,000 - 18,000 /month","
                1. Analyze large datasets, generate dashboards, and prepare performance reports.
2. Automate manual processes using Google Sheets, scripts, and AI tools to improve efficiency.
3. Provide analytical and operational support for special projects across teams.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Partex.AI                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                1. Assist in the design and development of user-friendly interfaces using React and HTML/CSS.
2. Implement backend functionalities and APIs using Node.js and Python.
3. Collaborate with team members to troubleshoot and resolve technical issues.
4. Conduct thorough testing and debugging to ensure high-quality code.
5. Research and stay updated on the latest trends in full-stack development.
6. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve overall performance.
7. Contribute to the continuous improvement of our products through innovative solutions and creative problem-solving.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Pexaworks Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                Note: This position is strictly for freshers or recent graduates (0–1 year experience). Experienced candidates will not be considered.

Calling all code warriors, UI dreamers, and API builders!

At Pexaworks, we don’t just write code—we engineer digital transformations. From AI-powered platforms to high-performance web and mobile apps, we bring ambitious ideas to life with clean code and solid architecture.

We’re now looking for a Full Stack Developer Intern who’s ready to work across the stack—from crafting sleek frontends in Next.js to building reliable backend services in Node.js. If you love solving problems, building modern apps, and collaborating with a passionate tech team—read on.

What You’ll Be Doing

1. Frontend Development – Build dynamic, responsive user interfaces using Next.js and React.
2. API Development – Design and develop RESTful APIs using Node.js, Express.js, or similar frameworks.
3. Database Integration – Work with PostgreSQL, model schemas, and write efficient queries.
4. Code Optimization – Write clean, maintainable, and scalable code on both frontend and backend.
5. Collaboration – Work closely with designers, PMs, and other developers on real client and internal projects.
6. Debugging & Troubleshooting – Squash bugs and enhance performance on both ends of the stack.
7. Continuous Learning – Stay current with full stack trends and contribute fresh thinking.
What We’re Looking For

1. Currently, pursuing or recently completed a degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a related field.
2. Hands-on experience or projects with JavaScript/TypeScript, React, and Node.js.
3. Understanding of frontend concepts like component-based architecture, state management, and responsive design.
4. Familiarity with backend frameworks (Express.js preferred), REST APIs, and database management.
5. Comfortable with Git, basic DevOps (optional), and collaborative workflows.
6. Strong problem-solving skills and a proactive mindset.

Why You’ll Love It Here

1. Live Projects – Your code won’t sit in a sandbox—it’ll go live and serve real users.
2. Mentorship – Learn from full-time engineers who support your growth and guide your code.
3. Flexible & Remote-Friendly – Output over hours—we respect your productivity rhythm.
4. Growth Path – High-performing interns often become core team members.
5. Tangible Impact – Be part of building products that create real-world value.                "
Python Developer,"
                            Ergode IT Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Develop, test, and maintain Python-based applications and automation solutions.
2. Implement RPA (Robotic Process Automation) for process optimization.
3. Build and maintain web automation frameworks using Selenium.
4. Perform data preprocessing and data cleaning for analysis and reporting.
5. Design and integrate API creation and consumption for system communication.
6. Develop Tkinter-based UI applications for internal tools and process automation.
7. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to understand business requirements and deliver effective solutions.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            International Institute Of Data Science & Technology                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                A. Mobile App Development:
1. Assisting in building and maintaining cross-platform mobile applications using Flutter.
2. Writing clean, maintainable, and efficient code.
3. Implementing UI/UX designs into functional applications.

B. Feature Implementation:
1. Developing new app features as per requirements.
2. Integrating APIs, third-party libraries, and backend services.
3. Debugging, testing, and improving application performance.

C. Collaboration:
1. Working closely with the development team to design, develop, and deploy mobile solutions.
2. Coordinating with designers to create user-friendly interfaces.

D. Code Quality & Documentation:
1. Ensuring proper documentation of code and development processes.
2. Participating in code reviews and suggesting improvements.

E. Research & Innovation:
1. Keeping up to date with the latest Flutter/Dart updates and mobile development trends.
2. Suggesting innovative ideas to enhance app functionality and user experience.                "
Cyber Security,"
                            Prime Infoserv LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Conduct web application security audits to identify vulnerabilities and risks.
2. Perform mobile application audits, ensuring compliance with security standards.
3. Carry out network audits to evaluate infrastructure security and detect potential threats.
4. Execute secure code reviews to ensure adherence to best practices and eliminate security flaws.                "
Web Development,"
                            Pushpa Arts Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Writing product descriptions
2. Writing content for the website
3. Working on SEO-based content
4. Handling Social Media Profiles                "
3D Artist,"
                            Imaginate Software Labs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                The selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Working with a solid foundation in modeling, texturing, and rendering, etc.
2. Working closely with the design (content team) on 3D models/characters.                "
Softwear Development Engineering (WordPress),"
                            Inditech Technology Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Work on coding and development in PHP, MySQL, and Custom coding on WordPress 
2. Work on front-end implementation within responsive HTML templates
3. Work on rapid development by generating modular code in GitHub COPILOT and ChatGPT                "
Software Testing,"
                            Vortexweb.ae                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 16,000 /month","
                As a QA Intern, you will be responsible for end-to-end testing of client portals, CRMs, and custom applications during all project phases — development, staging, UAT, and go-live. You will perform detailed checks, raise bug reports, validate fixes, and ensure every module works seamlessly before handover. Additionally, you will assist in reproducing and testing issues reported by clients after delivery.

Key Responsibilities
🔹 Project Phase Testing
Perform functional, regression, and integration testing for entire CRM setups.
Test all apps, modules, and custom workflows during development and staging.
Execute UAT (User Acceptance Testing) checklists with clients before delivery.
Validate data accuracy after migrations and integrations.
🔹 Quality Control & Reporting
Document detailed test cases and maintain structured test reports.
Log bugs/issues with clear steps, screenshots, and expected vs actual results.
Track reported issues until resolution and verify fixes from the development team.
Ensure adherence to client requirements and project scope.
🔹 Client Support Testing
Reproduce issues reported by clients post-delivery.
Conduct root-cause analysis with developers to identify errors.
Validate hotfixes and patches before applying to production.

Requirements
Pursuing/completed Bachelor’s in Computer Science, IT, or related field.
Understanding of software testing principles (manual testing, UAT, regression).
Familiarity with bug tracking/project management tools (Jira, Trello, ClickUp).
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Attention to detail and ability to think from a client/end-user perspective.
(Optional) Basic knowledge of automation testing tools.

What You’ll Gain
Hands-on experience testing enterprise CRM platforms and SaaS apps.
Exposure to real-world client projects and UAT environments.
Training in structured bug reporting and project lifecycle QA.
Opportunity to work closely with developers, project managers, and client-facing teams.
Internship Certificate, Letter of Recommendation (LOR), and PPO (Pre-Placement Offer) opportunity.                "
Site Engineering - Interior Design,"
                            Dzyine Interiors                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Conduct site visits
2. Work on the Moodboard & SketchUp designing
3. Support in BOQ making                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            IndianAppGuy Tech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Work with the team to design and develop new features for our AI-powered presentation tool.
2. Build responsive user interfaces using React.js, Next.js, and Tailwind CSS.
3. Develop and maintain backend APIs and services using Node.js + Supabase.
4. Integrate AI SDKs/APIs (like OpenAI, Vercel AI SDK) into the product.
5. Deploy and test features on Vercel to ensure smooth performance.
6. Collaborate with designers and product managers to improve UI/UX.
7. Debug, troubleshoot, and optimize applications for scalability and speed.
8. Document your work and share learnings with the team.                "
Embedded Systems,"
                            Meteoros Automation                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 4,200 /month","
                1. Design, develop, and test smart sensors and other IoT devices, and troubleshoot firmware for sensor modules.
2. Participate in the development and integration of IoT platforms for data collection and device management.
3. Collaborate with the engineering team to prototype and validate sensor designs in real-world environments.
4. Contribute to documentation, including technical specifications and user manuals.
5. Assist in researching and selecting appropriate sensors and microcontrollers for various applications.
6. Support in the testing and debugging of hardware and software components.                "
Product Management,"
                            Shivank Goel                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Conducting market and user research and performing competitive analysis to understand the current landscape.
2. Developing solutions/strategies to address the defined problem.
3. Iterating on solutions and speaking with users to gather feedback and improve.
4. Collaborating with designers to get the solution implemented.                "
Field Survey Executive,"
                            Pooja Consulation Company                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                We are hiring field survey executives to support a citywide waste-management initiative in Manesar.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Conducting door-to-door surveys of all waste-generating units (residential, commercial, and institutional).
2. Recording accurate data using your own smartphone and the company’s mobile app.
3. Installing RFID tags on every unit surveyed and ensuring proper documentation.
4. Submitting daily progress reports to the project supervisor.                "
Civil Engineering,"
                            Sealinkers Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Calculating Steel plate dimensions
2. Calculations for fabricating anchors
3. Making drawings of AutoCAD or other designing software programs
4. Physical inspection of product                "
PCB & Embedded Systems,"
                            PSYC Aerospace And Defence Industries Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                PCB Design & Development
1. Design and optimize single, double, and multilayer PCBs using Altium, KiCad, Eagle, or OrCAD.
2. Handle schematic capture, component selection, layout, and routing for aerospace/defence-grade projects.
3. Generate Gerber files, BOMs, and assembly documents for fabrication.

Embedded Systems & Microcontrollers
1. Work with Arduino, STM32, and other microcontrollers for prototyping and testing.
2. Develop and debug basic firmware for sensor interfacing, control loops, and communication protocols (UART, I2C, SPI, CAN).
3. Integrate sensors, actuators, and wireless modules with embedded systems.

Prototyping & Hands-On Work
1. Perform soldering (through-hole & SMD), assembly, and board bring-up.
2. Build and test breadboard and perfboard circuits before PCB finalization.
3. Conduct hardware debugging with multimeters, oscilloscopes, and logic analyzers.

Testing & Validation 
1. Carry out functional and performance testing of PCBs and embedded systems.
2. Ensure reliability under thermal, vibration, and EMI/EMC conditions (aerospace standards).
3. Document test results and suggest design improvements.

Documentation & Compliance
1. Maintain detailed design notes, wiring diagrams, and test logs.
2. Follow IPC and aerospace-grade standards for PCB and electronics design.

Independent Work
1. Be prepared to work independently on assigned tasks with minimal supervision.
2. Stay proactive in researching new tools, components, and methods to improve designs.
3. Since this is a startup environment, interns are expected to be self-driven, proactive, and resourceful in solving problems.
4. Collaborate with the team only when required, but primarily handle individual project responsibilities end-to-end.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Imarticus Learning Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 25,000 /month","
                1. Work with the larger Imarticus Learning Tech Team to build new projects
2. Ideate, Build, Deploy, and Stabilize large-scale Technology projects at Imarticus Learning
3. Innovate path-breaking solutions to tough Technology problems at Imarticus Learning                "
Field Sales,"
                            Soltec                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 - 60,000 /month","
                1. Gain in-depth knowledge of the company’s products and offerings.
2. Learn and apply core marketing skills in real-world scenarios.
3. Understand and analyze market requirements and trends.
4. Develop effective communication skills for client and team interactions.
5. Acquire hands-on industry experience to build a strong professional foundation.                "
AI Agent Development,"
                            Stareout Games                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Build AI agents using n8n that create game ideas automatically. Work with prompts and tools to generate detailed game concepts with images.
2. Study how successful mobile games make money. Break down their economies and find patterns in how they earn revenue.
3. Help create tools that analyze game economies. Build products that can automatically check what works and what doesn't in games.
4. Set up automated workflows for game research. Make processes that can analyze multiple games quickly without manual work.
5. Research gaming trends and document findings. Keep track of what's working in the market and create reports on game economy patterns.                "
Next.js Developer,"
                            Infoware                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Translate designs and wireframes into high-quality code using ReactJS and Next.js
2. Develop user interface components and ensure a responsive UI across devices
3. Build reusable components and front-end libraries for future use
4. Optimize components for maximum performance across a wide range of web-capable devices and browsers
5. Implement Redux-Saga and consume Redux APIs for state management
6. Work on creating and maintaining TypeScript frontend interfaces                "
Quality Control Coordinator,"
                            Raja Rani Lifestyle                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 13,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Act as the main point of contact for our vendors in India.
2. Conduct regular quality checks of raw materials and finished products to ensure they meet our company standards.
3. Monitor stock levels of materials and finished products, providing insights to the team for inventory management.
4. Collaborate with vendors to reorder materials as necessary to maintain production flow
5. Scout new suppliers and vendors to get the best match for the requirements of the product

Employees will be taken good care through the working period & will be considered for future hiring to work with us in the international market.                "
IOT & Cloud Computing,"
                            Megaminds IT Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 8,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities:

1. Assist in the design and implementation of IoT solutions using AWS IoT Core
2. Conduct research on emerging IoT and Cloud Computing trends to inform project development
3. Develop and maintain cloud-based applications using AWS services
4. Analyze data collected from IoT devices to identify patterns and insights
5. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to ensure successful project delivery
6. Assist in troubleshooting and resolving technical issues related to IoT and Cloud Computing
7. Stay up-to-date on the latest advancements in IoT and Cloud Computing technologies                "
Cybersecurity And Network Security Research,"
                            Megaminds IT Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 8,000 /month","
                The cybersecurity and network security research Intern will engage in research and practical implementation of secure and efficient networking solutions. The role involves working on projects focused on network design, security protocols, and performance analysis in both traditional and modern networking environments, including wireless and ad hoc networks. Interns will gain hands-on experience with advanced tools, simulation platforms, and emerging technologies in cybersecurity and networking.



1. Network design and security implementation:
a. Design and deploy secure network architectures using VLANs, ACLs, and firewalls (e.g., iptables).
b. Implement secure communication protocols such as WPA3, TLS, and PKI to enhance data security.

2. Simulation and performance analysis:
a. Simulate networking scenarios with tools like NS-3, OMNeT++, and Mininet.
b. Analyze network performance metrics, including QoS, congestion control, and dynamic load balancing.

3. Research and Development in Wireless and Ad Hoc Networks:
a. Investigate energy-efficient routing protocols and clustering techniques in wireless sensor networks (WSNs).
b. Study the impact of node density, mobility models, and latency in wireless ad hoc networks like VANETs.

4. Cybersecurity practices and solutions:
a. Develop and evaluate intrusion detection (IDS) and prevention systems (IPS) using tools like Snort.
b. Implement secure file transfer mechanisms and end-to-end encryption for email systems.

5. Evaluation of emerging cybersecurity threats:
a. Research mitigation strategies for DDoS and man-in-the-middle attacks.
b. Assess the effectiveness of data loss prevention (DLP) tools in corporate environments.                "
Digital Marketing,"
                            IP Brigade                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Conduct keyword research and optimize website content for search engines and 
assist in tracking and analyzing SEO performance.
2. Create and schedule email campaigns | Maintain and grow subscriber lists | Track performance metrics (open rates, CTR, conversions)
3. Update and manage WordPress website content
4. Assist in designing creatives, graphics, and visuals for campaigns | Contribute ideas for innovative and impactful digital campaigns
5. Handling Social Media Handles                "
Generative AI Machine Learning,"
                            Arakoo                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 /month","
                1. Using Qlora (https://github.com/artidoro/qlora) and Axolotl (https://github.com/OpenAccess-AI-Collective/axolotl) for finetuning Llama2 models. 
2. Using VLLM, prompt engineering, and FastAPI.                "
AI Product Engineering,"
                            NeuRazor                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Build and refine interactive web interfaces with a clean, modern design.
2. Work on backend integrations for user data, scoring, and reporting.
3. Implement authentication, timers, and input handling (text/voice).
4. Test, debug, and deploy features in a live environment.
5. Work with technologies like React, Firebase/Supabase, and API integrations.
6. Explore integration of AI-based services for analysis and scoring.                "
Backend Developer (Night Shift Only),"
                            Big Internet E-commerce Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 10,001 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement backend solutions for our e-commerce platform.
2. Write efficient, scalable, and maintainable code using best practices.
3. Work on integrating third-party APIs and services to enhance the functionality of our platform.
4. Develop and maintain databases to ensure data integrity and performance.
5. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to team members.
6. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure a seamless user experience.
7. Stay up-to-date with the latest technologies and trends in backend development to continuously improve our platform.                "
AI Agent Development (Only Night Shift),"
                            Big Internet E-commerce Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 10,001 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement AI agents for optimizing customer interactions.
2. Utilize AWS services to deploy and manage AI solutions for improved efficiency.
3. Work on LangChain and LLMOps to enhance the functionality and performance of AI agents.
4. Develop and maintain APIs for seamless integration of AI capabilities into existing systems.
5. Use NestJS for backend development to support AI agent functionalities.
6. Write clean and efficient code in JavaScript to ensure the smooth operation of AI agents.
7. Monitor and troubleshoot AI agents during night shifts to ensure uninterrupted services for customers.                "
React Native Development,"
                            Educase India                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,500 /month","
                We are thrilled to offer an exciting opportunity for a React Native Development intern at Educase India. If you have a strong understanding of React Native and JavaScript, this position is perfect for you! As an intern, you will work closely with our experienced team to develop cutting-edge mobile applications for our educational platform. Your responsibilities will include:

1. Collaborating with the development team to design and implement new features for our mobile applications
2. Writing clean, maintainable code and conducting code reviews to ensure high quality
3. Troubleshooting and debugging issues to optimize app performance
4. Participating in team meetings to brainstorm ideas and share updates on project progress
5. Keeping up-to-date with the latest technologies and trends in mobile development
6. Assisting in testing and deploying applications to the App Store and Google Play Store
7. Contributing to the overall success of our mobile development projects with your innovative ideas and passion for learning. 

Join us at Educase India and gain valuable hands-on experience in React Native development while making a meaningful impact in the education sector!                "
PHP Development,"
                            International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Are you a PHP Development whiz looking to gain real-world experience in a dynamic and innovative environment? Look no further! Join us at the International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research as a PHP Development Intern and take your skills to the next level. 

Key Responsibilities: 
1. Work closely with senior developers to create and maintain web applications using PHP, MySQL, HTML, JavaScript, and AJAX.
2. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging code to ensure optimal performance and functionality.
3. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to design and implement new features and enhancements.
4. Conduct thorough testing and quality assurance of all applications before deployment.
5. Stay up-to-date on the latest technologies and best practices in PHP development.
6. Participate in team meetings and discussions to contribute fresh ideas and insights.
7. Take initiative on projects and show a strong willingness to learn and grow in a fast-paced environment. 

If you are passionate about PHP development and eager to make a meaningful impact, apply now and kickstart your career with us!                "
WordPress Development,"
                            International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Are you a WordPress whiz with a passion for leveraging SEO to drive traffic and enhance user experience? Join us at the International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research as a WordPress Development intern! In this role, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects that will elevate our online presence and help us reach a global audience. 

Key responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our team to design and implement WordPress websites that are visually appealing and user-friendly.
2. Optimize website content for SEO to improve search engine rankings and increase organic traffic.
3. Conduct keyword research and analysis to identify opportunities for content optimization.
4. Monitor and report on website performance using Google Analytics and other SEO tools.
5. Stay up-to-date on the latest trends and best practices in WordPress development and SEO.
6. Assist with troubleshooting and resolving any technical issues that may arise.
7. Contribute creative ideas to enhance our online presence and engage with our audience effectively. 

If you are a self-motivated individual with a strong understanding of WordPress and SEO principles, we want to hear from you! Apply now and take your skills to the next level with us.                "
Software Development,"
                            Zarle Infotech                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Zarle Infotech is a fast-growing IT services company helping startups, professionals, and brands build websites, apps, automation tools, and AI-driven platforms. We focus on solving real problems with clean code, creativity, and user-first thinking.

Role
 We’re looking for a Software Developer Intern to work on real client projects from day one. This is not a “fix bugs and fetch coffee” role—you’ll collaborate directly with developers and designers, write production-ready code, and learn through mentorship. Strong performers may be offered a full-time role after the internship.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with senior developers/designers on live projects
Build and maintain frontend and/or backend code
Debug, test, and optimize for performance
Contribute to code reviews and technical discussions
Continuously learn new tools and frameworks

Skills Required
JavaScript, React.js, Next.js, React Native
Tailwind CSS
Node.js, REST APIs (basics)
Git/GitHub
Database fundamentals (Firebase preferred)
Who Should Apply
Available to work in-office, full-time, for 3 months
Passionate about software development and problem-solving
Curious, self-driven, and open to feedback
Comfortable working in a fast-paced startup environment

📍 Location: Zarle Infotech, M-008B, Mamura, Sector 66, Noida, Uttar Pradesh 201309
 🕒 Duration: 3 months | Full-time, in-office                "
Front End Development,"
                            HUBX Commercial Ventures                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Implement responsive UI components using React.js and Next.js
2. Create wireframes, smart templates, storyboards, user flows, prototypes, process flows, and high-fidelity mock-ups to effectively communicate design ideas
3. Assist in integrating RESTful APIs and third-party services
4. Deliver across the entire app life cycle- concept, design, build, deploy, test and support
5. Experience with Tailwind CSS for building responsive designs
6. Write well-designed, testable, efficient code by using best software development practices
7. Develop and manage several databases and reporting tools
8. Work on understanding and creating a simple and user-friendly interface                "
iOS App Development,"
                            Digital Patron                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 35,000 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy individual with a passion for iOS app development? Digital Patron is seeking a motivated iOS App Development intern to join our dynamic team! As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technologies such as Swift, Xcode, and REST API to create innovative digital solutions for our clients. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with our development team to design and implement new features for our iOS applications.
2. Conduct thorough testing and debugging to ensure the functionality and performance of the apps meet our high standards.
3. Assist in the integration of REST API services to enhance the user experience and app functionality.
4. Stay up-to-date on the latest trends and best practices in iOS app development to contribute fresh ideas to our projects.
5. Work closely with designers and product managers to bring concepts to life and deliver high-quality user interfaces.
6. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve code quality and maintainability.
7. Contribute to the overall success of our projects by actively engaging in team meetings and brainstorming sessions.

If you are eager to gain hands-on experience in iOS app development and make a meaningful impact in a fast-paced environment, apply now to join Digital Patron as our iOS App Development intern!                "
Automation & Agent Builder (n8n / Make.com),"
                            BIIT                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 60,000 /month","
                1. Design and build automations using platforms like n8n, Make.com, and Zapier
2. Connect APIs and webhooks to trigger workflows across tools and services
3. Create agent-style flows that perform tasks based on user input or system events
4. Test and debug automation scenarios to ensure reliability and accuracy
5. Document workflows with clear instructions and diagrams for future reference
6. Collaborate with team members to identify repetitive tasks that can be automated
7. Maintain and update existing automations as tools or requirements evolve
8. Explore new tools and suggest improvements to current automation stack
9. Ensure data integrity and security across automated processes
10. Report progress and share learnings during weekly check-ins                "
Environmental Sciences,"
                            Global Green Envirosystems                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 3,500 /month","
                1. Helping guide with the effective writing of articles for the media
2. Supporting in development of course contents
3. Researching specific topics - related to policy, engineering, and sustainability                "
Web Development,"
                            NayePankh Foundation                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Are you a talented web developer looking to make a difference? Join us at NayePankh Foundation as a Web Development intern! We are a non-profit organization dedicated to empowering underprivileged communities through education and support.

Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our team to design and develop user-friendly websites using JavaScript, HTML, and CSS.
2. Implement responsive design principles to ensure our site looks great on all devices.
3. Optimize website performance for fast loading speeds and efficient navigation.
4. Troubleshoot and debug any issues that arise during website development.
5. Assist with website maintenance and updates as needed.
6. Stay up-to-date on emerging web development trends and technologies.
7. Contribute innovative ideas to enhance our online presence and reach more individuals in need.

If you are passionate about using your web development skills for a meaningful cause, apply now to join our team and help us create a brighter future for all!                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Brihat Infotech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 5,000 /month","
                We are looking for a talented Full Stack Development intern to join our team at Brihat Infotech Private Limited. If you have a strong knowledge of Node.js, React, Next.js, React Native, Express.js, MongoDB, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and Tailwind CSS, we want to hear from you!

Key responsibilities:
1. Develop and maintain web applications using the latest technologies.
2. Collaborate with the team to design and implement new features.
3. Optimize applications for maximum speed and scalability.
4. Implement security and data protection measures.
5. Troubleshoot and debug applications to ensure optimal performance.
6. Stay updated on emerging technologies and trends in the industry.
7. Assist in testing and deploying applications to production environments.

If you are passionate about Full Stack Development and eager to learn and grow in a dynamic environment, apply now for this exciting opportunity!                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Taskraft.agency                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                We are looking for a passionate and detail-oriented WordPress web development intern to join our team. This internship will give you hands-on experience in developing, customizing, and managing WordPress websites, along with exposure to real client projects.



1. Assist in designing, developing, and maintaining WordPress websites.
2. Customize themes, templates, and plugins to meet project requirements.
3. Support in creating responsive and SEO-friendly web pages.
4. Troubleshoot issues, perform website testing, and ensure smooth functionality.
5. Collaborate with designers and developers on new features and improvements.
6. Assist in content updates, security checks, and website optimization.

Requirements                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            VigiSafeMed                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 13,000 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy individual looking to gain real-world experience in mobile app development? VigiSafeMed is seeking a mobile app development intern to join our dynamic team. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects and collaborate with our talented team of developers. You will be responsible for creating innovative mobile applications that enhance the user experience and drive engagement. 



1. Assist in designing and developing mobile applications (Android/iOS or cross-platform frameworks such as React Native/Flutter).
2. Integrate AI/ML models into mobile applications to enable intelligent features (e.g., recommendations, predictions, automation).
3. Preprocess and analyze datasets to train and fine-tune ML models.
4. Work with APIs, cloud platforms (AWS, GCP, Azure), and backend services to support app functionalities.
5. Collaborate with senior developers, product managers, and UI/UX teams to deliver scalable, efficient solutions.
6. Participate in code reviews, testing, debugging, and performance optimization.
7. Document development processes, code, and workflows.

If you are passionate about mobile app development and eager to learn in a fast-paced environment, apply now to join VigiSafeMed and take your skills to the next level!

Pursuing or recently completed a Bachelor’s/Master’s degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, Data Science, or related field.
Strong understanding of mobile development (Android with Kotlin/Java, iOS with Swift, or cross-platform with Flutter/React Native).
Proficiency in Python and popular ML libraries/frameworks (TensorFlow, PyTorch, Scikit-learn).
Familiarity with RESTful APIs, JSON, and cloud deployment.                "
Software Development,"
                            Gridmetry Gmbh (Munich, Germany)                        ",Work From Home,€ 300 - 400 /month,"
                1. Build and maintain fast, scalable server-side applications 
2. Design robust APIs and data models with PostgreSQL as your go-to database
3. Dockerize everything—because reproducible environments matter
4. Help us deploy, monitor, and scale services in the cloud (we use AWS)
5. Debug, test, and optimize back-end systems for performance and reliability
6. Stay sharp on modern back-end tools, patterns, and trends—and bring your ideas to the table                "
E-Commerce Web Development (Shopify),"
                            Nivara Diamonds Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                1. Customize and enhance our Shopify store with interactive features and advanced functionalities.
2. Work on theme customization using Liquid, HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
3. Add and manage product listings with accurate details and optimized presentation.
4. Implement dynamic functionalities on the website through advanced coding, like a dynamic product filter and, search bar.
5. Integrate and configure Shopify apps as per requirements.
6. Work on strategies to increase website views, visibility, and organic traffic.
7. Optimize the website for speed, performance, and responsiveness across devices.
8. Work on checkout and cart customization to improve user experience.
9. Integrate third-party tools & apps.
10. Collaborate with the marketing team to execute design and functionality updates.
11. Ensure mobile responsiveness across all devices.
12. Troubleshoot and resolve technical issues on the Shopify platform.                "
Digital Marketing,"
                            DJRS Hospitality                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Assisting in planning and executing digital marketing campaigns across multiple channels (Google, Facebook, Instagram, LinkedIn, etc.).
2. Supporting in managing social media accounts – creating posts, stories, and engagement activities.
3. Conducting keyword research and assisting in SEO activities (on-page/off-page optimization).
4. Helping with content creation for blogs, email campaigns, and marketing collaterals.
5. Monitoring and reporting on campaign performance using analytics tools.
6. Researching industry trends, competitors, and customer insights.
7. Coordinating with internal teams to ensure timely delivery of marketing tasks.
8. Designing graphics.                "
AI Agent Development,"
                            WhizJuniors                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Selected candidate's day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Develop and integrate AI agents and automation tools.
2. Build and manage backend APIs using Fast API.
3. Work on frontend-backend connectivity, routing, and API integrations.
4. Collaborate on creating end-to-end AI-powered applications.
5. Ensure smooth deployment and integration of AI tools.
6. Debug, test, and optimize code for performance and scalability.                "
Software Development - Mern Stack,"
                            Amber Flux Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,999 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Working on the development of MERN stack applications, database, backend applications, APIs (REST APIs) for application-to-application integration testing
2. Working on the preparation of test scripts, API calls, testing for ideal and exceptions uses
3. Working on web scraping
4. Working on data management 
5. Working on Azure/AWS deployment                "
WordPress Development,"
                            BeingLoop                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                Are you a WordPress whiz looking to kickstart your career in web development? BeingLoop is seeking a talented WordPress Development intern to join our dynamic team. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects, collaborate with experienced developers, and gain valuable hands-on experience in the world of WordPress development. 

Key responsibilities:
1. Assist in building and maintaining WordPress websites for our clients.
2. Customize themes and plugins to meet specific project requirements.
3. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure optimal performance of websites.
4. Collaborate with the design team to implement creative solutions.
5. Stay up-to-date with the latest WordPress trends and best practices.
6. Help optimize websites for speed, SEO, and user experience.
7. Provide support and training to clients on WordPress usage.

If you are passionate about WordPress and eager to learn, this internship opportunity is perfect for you. Join us at BeingLoop and take the first step towards a successful career in WordPress development!                "
Computational Fluid Dynamics,"
                            Chakr Innovation                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                1. We are looking for an enthusiastic CFD intern who is passionate about learning and contributing to the research work and ongoing projects carried out at Chakr Innovation Pvt. Ltd. 
2. You will be part of a team that strives to continuously improve its core product and is committed to bringing in innovative products to make a sustainable and clean planet.                "
Digital Marketing,"
                            FlexiFunnels                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Handle automated Zoom webinar funnels 
2. Assist in digital marketing communication scheduling
3. Conduct market research and create valuable knowledge resources
4. Assist in customer segmentation, data analysis, and report preparation
5. Support marketing automation tools and systems implementation
6. Create and Optimize Landing Pages                "
Field Sales,"
                            Hope Engineering Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Generating leads
2. Conducting industrial visits to Pithampur, Ujjain, Dewas, and Sanwer Road areas.
2. Conducting sales visits.
3. Converting orders.                "
IoT/Automobile Software,"
                            Devanture Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 14,000 /month","
                About the Opportunity:

1. You will learn about IoT devices and the Automotive industry
2. You will be surrounded by the Latest Technologies and information.
3. This will place you at the right edge to secure jobs in the related field of IoT/Automotive industry

Key Responsibilities:

1. Candidate should proactively handle and learn regarding Programming/Linux command line/SDLC, Computer networks, and Software Testing as per requirement.
2. Candidate should be able to handle daily tasks required for software/hardware preparation of IoT devices (Which will include hardware assembly, software installations/software testing, etc.)
3. Candidate should be able to learn and adapt quickly.

Requirements:

1. Linux command line (intermediate)
2. Computer Networks (intermediate)
3. C++/C Python any programming language (Intermediate)
4. DSA (Intermediate)
5. Automotive/IoT (Beginner)
6. Web Technologies such as NodeJS, Angular, (Beginner/Intermediate)
7. If you are well-versed in any of the above technologies, you are considered for the internship, but be prepared to dive into the remaining technologies as well.                "
Virtual AI Internship Opportunity: Safer Cities Challenge,"
                            Multiverz                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 /month","
                Join a groundbreaking initiative to revolutionize urban safety across South Africa and beyond! As an intern, if your solution is selected, you'll be part of a founding team working to address South Africa's critical security challenges, where crime costs the economy R700 billion annually (10% of GDP).

Four Tracks of Solution Available (Choose 1):

1. TechGuard Digital Solutions Intern
Focus: AI-powered crime prevention and digital security systems
Develop AI tools for crime prediction and pattern analysis
Design mobile applications for community safety
Work on IoT sensor networks and secure command centers
Create solutions that function in low-connectivity environments

2. DeviceShield Hardware Innovation Intern
Focus: Affordable, robust security hardware design patrol drones and autonomous security robots
Develop solar/battery-powered security devices
Create sensor systems for fire, gas, and intrusion detection
Build hardware solutions for harsh South African environments

3. CommunityWatch Social Innovation Intern
Focus: Community engagement and social impact programs
Design culturally sensitive community safety programs
Develop multilingual mobile safety applications
Create neighborhood alert networks and community watch platforms
Build trust-based security solutions with local communities

4. SecureBiz Strategy & Business Development Intern
Focus: Sustainable business models and strategic partnerships
Develop affordable pricing models and flexible payment systems
Create partnerships with insurance companies and law enforcement
Design evidence management and data protection solutions
Build scalable business frameworks for social impact                "
WordPress Development,"
                            OBLYTECH INDIA PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,500 /month","
                1. Assist in developing, customizing, and maintaining WordPress sites.
2. Troubleshoot website issues and optimize performance.
3. Update and manage website content.
4. Collaborate with the team on design and functionality improvements.
5. Participate in brainstorming sessions to propose innovative solutions.                "
AI/ML Dev,"
                            Trinity Packaging Co. Pvt. Ltd.                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities may include:

1. Writing Python scripts to ingest and process structured data (CSV, Excel, JSON).
2. Experimenting with AI/LLM APIs and local models to generate insights from data.
3. Integrating model outputs into simple formats (text, JSON, PDF) for downstream use.
4. Collaborating with the team to test and evaluate different AI models for quality and reliability.
5. Assisting in containerization or local deployment of Python scripts and models using Docker.
6. Maintaining clear code documentation and notes for reproducibility and knowledge sharing.
7. Learning to troubleshoot and optimize AI model usage for performance and efficiency.                "
Product Marketing,"
                            Centre For Computational  Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Managing and growing the product's online presence across LinkedIn, YouTube, and other relevant platforms.
2. Creating, scheduling, and monitoring engaging content for social media platforms.
3. Coordinating and promoting webinars; managing invites, tech setup, and post-event analytics.
4. Supporting content marketing and lead generation activities.
5. Creating content such as blogs, newsletters, product videos, and case studies.
6. Designing feature graphics and visuals required for marketing content using tools like Canva.
7. Assisting in developing and executing digital marketing campaigns.
8. Analyzing marketing data and generating performance reports using tools like Google Analytics.
9. Working closely with the product team to ensure accurate and effective communication of product features and benefits.
10. Collaborating with the sales team to align marketing campaigns with sales goals and customer needs.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Rotasu Fin                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                We are seeking a talented Full Stack Development intern to join our team at Rotasu Fin! This is a great opportunity to gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced fintech environment. If you are proficient in React, Next.js, and Golang, we want to hear from you!

Key responsibilities:

1. Collaborate with our development team to design and implement new features for our financial platform.
2. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code using best practices.
3. Perform code reviews and provide constructive feedback to peers.
4. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure smooth functionality of our applications.
5. Work closely with designers and product managers to bring ideas to life.
6. Stay up to date with the latest technologies and trends in the industry.
7. Take ownership of projects and contribute to the overall success of the team.

If you are passionate about software development and eager to learn, apply now to kickstart your career with Rotasu Fin!                "
Quality Assurance,"
                            Pexaworks Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Test Planning & Execution – Create and execute test cases to identify bugs and ensure software quality.
2. Bug Tracking & Reporting – Log issues, document test results, and work with developers to resolve them.
3. Functional & Regression Testing – Ensure new features work as expected and don’t break existing functionality.
4. User Experience Testing – Think like an end user and provide feedback on usability.
5. Collaboration & Process Improvement – Work with developers, designers, and product managers to enhance testing workflows.                "
Website & Social Media Content (Squarespace + Canva/Instagram),"
                            Yalavarthi Granites And Furniture (P) Ltd                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 - 45,000 /month","
                1. Assist in the development and maintenance of the company website using Squarespace.
2. Create engaging and visually appealing content for social media platforms, particularly Instagram.
3. Collaborate with the marketing team to develop content calendars and strategies.
4. Monitor and analyze social media metrics to optimize performance.
5. Design graphics and visuals for website and social media posts using Canva.
6. Stay up-to-date on industry trends and best practices for web design and social media marketing.
7. Contribute fresh ideas and creativity to enhance our online branding and reach.                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            Hungy Inc                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Developing new features for Hungy’s mobile app using React Native and supporting technologies.
2. Collaborating with the core engineering team to debug, test, and optimize the app for performance across Android and iOS.
3. Contributing to UI/UX improvements and ensuring a seamless user experience for food organizations.                "
QA Testing,"
                            Meru Technosoft Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,500 - 5,000 /month","
                1. Execute automated test cases for web and mobile applications.
2. Build and maintain automation scripts using frameworks like Selenium, Playwright, or Cypress.
3. Perform functional, regression, and integration testing.
4. Use bug-tracking tools to document and report defects clearly.
5. Collaborate with developers to verify fixes and improve product quality.
6. Assist in creating and maintaining test documentation and reports.                "
Product Experience Specialist,"
                            EmergentLabs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 50,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Deliver Exceptional Support: Resolve user issues with efficiency, empathy, and clarity.
2. Debug & Resolve (Engineers): Dive deep on technical issues and implement fixes when needed.
3. Curate Insights: Spot patterns in feedback and share actionable insights.
4. Improve Docs & Automation: Keep documentation fresh and help refine support automation.
5. Be the Voice of the Customer: Make sure user feedback drives product direction.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Gagan Puri                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                We are looking for passionate intern developers (full stack) to join our journey and upgrade the Woogyy app.

 

1. Upgrading the existing Woogyy app with new features, bug fixes, and UI/UX improvements.
2. Integrating AI chatbot, AI diet planner, payment gateway, and other upcoming features.
3. Collaborating directly with the founder for development and deployment.

If you are someone who loves building scalable apps, experimenting with new tech, and want to be part of something truly unique, then this is for you!                "
Backend Development,"
                            Shiplee                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 4,000 /month","
                1. Debug, optimize, and enhance current applications.
2. Ensure smooth operation of internal dashboards and seller-facing features.
3. Build New APIs with Node.js & Python
4. Design and implement RESTful APIs for external sellers to integrate Shiplee.ai services.
5. Develop internal APIs for operational dashboards, reporting, and automation.
6. Ensure APIs follow best practices: authentication, validation, rate-limiting, logging, and versioning.
7. Work with MySQL or other databases for new API endpoints.
8. Design new tables and optimize queries for high performance.
9. Integrate APIs with the existing PHP backend where required.
10. Write unit tests and perform API testing to ensure reliability.
11. Debug and fix issues in both legacy and new systems.
12. Maintain clear API documentation for internal and external use.
13. Collaborate with frontend, operations, and product teams for requirements and feature rollout.
14. Suggest improvements in workflow, API design, and backend architecture.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            SwaggerUnit                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Mobile App Development: Collaborate with the development team to build and maintain Flutter-based mobile applications for iOS and Android platforms.
2. API Integration: Implement and integrate RESTful APIs to fetch and display data in the mobile app.
3. Code Reusability: Write clean, efficient, and reusable code following best practices and coding standards.
4. Collaborate with Team: Work closely with senior developers, designers, and project managers to meet project goals and deadlines.
5. Bug Fixing and Optimization: Debug, troubleshoot, and optimize mobile applications for performance and user experience.
6. Learning and Development: Stay updated on the latest trends in Flutter and mobile development and apply this knowledge to improve your work.

Benefits:

1. Real-World Experience: Work on actual client projects, gaining practical knowledge and hands-on experience.
2. Mentorship: Learn from experienced developers and work closely with senior team members.
3. Exposure to Industry Best Practices: Gain insight into the latest development practices, tools, and methodologies.
4. Flexible Work Environment: Enjoy the flexibility of working remotely while contributing to impactful projects.                "
Web Development,"
                            CYPWNG Software Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include designing and developing websites using WordPress themes, plugins, and customizations.                "
QA Testing,"
                            Weframe Tech                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                As a QA Testing intern at Weframe Tech, you will have the opportunity to hone your skills in manual testing and quality assurance/control. You will work closely with our experienced QA team to ensure the quality of our products and contribute to the overall success of our projects.

Key responsibilities:
1. Conduct thorough testing of software applications to identify bugs and issues
2. Create and execute test cases and test plans
3. Collaborate with developers to resolve issues and improve product quality
4. Document and track defects using bug tracking tools
5. Participate in regular meetings to discuss project progress and testing strategies
6. Assist in regression testing to ensure product stability
7. Provide feedback and suggestions for process improvement

This internship will provide you with valuable hands-on experience in the field of QA testing, and the opportunity to make a real impact on our products. Join us at Weframe Tech and take the next step in your career!                "
Flutter Development,"
                            ANO SEO Tool                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 /month","
                We are looking for a talented Flutter Development intern to join our team at ANO SEO company. If you are passionate about Flutter, REST API, Dart, iOS, Android, Firebase, and Cloud Firestore, then this is the perfect opportunity for you to gain hands-on experience and grow your skills in a dynamic work environment.

Key Responsibilities:

1. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement new features for our app.
2. Write clean, reusable, and efficient code in Flutter using Dart programming language.
3. Integrate REST APIs and Firebase services to enhance app functionality and performance.
4. Work closely with our design team to ensure a seamless user experience across all platforms.
5. Test and debug the app on various devices to ensure optimal performance and compatibility.
6. Stay updated on the latest Flutter and mobile app development trends to contribute innovative ideas to the team.
7. Assist in the maintenance and optimization of Cloud Firestore database to improve app speed and reliability.

If you are eager to learn, collaborate with a talented team, and make a real impact in the world of mobile app development, then we want to hear from you! Apply now for this exciting opportunity to kickstart your career as a Flutter Development intern at ANO SEO company.                "
Web Development,"
                            Pure Cosmeceuticals Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 13,500 /month","
                We are looking for a dynamic Web Development intern to join our team at Pure Cosmeceuticals Private Limited! If you are passionate about WordPress and HTML, this is the perfect opportunity for you to gain valuable hands-on experience in the field of web development.

Key responsibilities:
1. Assist in the development and maintenance of our company website using WordPress and HTML.
2. Work closely with the design team to implement new features and enhance user experience.
3. Optimize website performance and ensure compatibility across different browsers and devices.
4. Troubleshoot and resolve any technical issues that may arise on the website.
5. Stay updated on the latest web development trends and technologies to suggest improvements.
6. Collaborate with the marketing team to create landing pages and online campaigns.
7. Provide support for any other web development tasks as needed.

If you are a creative and driven individual looking to kickstart your career in web development, apply now and be a part of our innovative team at Pure Cosmeceuticals!                "
Backend Development,"
                            Megaplex Prime                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                We are looking for a skilled Backend Developer with strong experience in Node.js, Express.js, and MongoDB, and a working knowledge of React for full-stack collaboration. The ideal candidate should also be comfortable with deployment and cloud services, particularly using AWS and Vercel. You will be responsible for building and maintaining scalable server-side logic, integrating front-end elements, and ensuring the performance and reliability of backend systems.
Key Responsibilities:
1. Design, build, and maintain server-side logic using Node.js and Express.js
2. Manage and optimize MongoDB databases for performance and reliability
3. Collaborate with frontend developers to integrate user-facing elements built with React
4. Create and maintain RESTful APIs and backend services
5. Ensure security, data protection, and performance of applications
6. Handle application deployment and infrastructure management on AWS and Vercel
7. Troubleshoot, debug, and upgrade existing systems                "
No-Code Developer,"
                            Caarya                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 18,000 /month","
                1. Design, build, and test applications using Bubble, Retool, or similar platforms.
2. Develop forms, dashboards, and workflow automation for live projects.
3. Integrate APIs and third-party tools for enhanced functionality.
4. Collaborate with product and design teams to deliver user-friendly solutions.
5. Troubleshoot issues and optimize the performance of low-code applications.                "
DevOps,"
                            WEXA AI                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with team members to automate and streamline the deployment process using CI/CD pipelines
2. Assist in monitoring and maintaining our cloud infrastructure on AWS and Azure
3. Work on troubleshooting and resolving technical issues across different environments
4. Gain hands-on experience with Docker and Kubernetes for containerization and orchestration
5. Contribute to the development and implementation of best practices for version control using Git
6. Participate in cross-functional team meetings to ensure seamless integration of code changes
7. Learn and grow as a DevOps professional while making a real impact on our innovative AI projects.                "
Apprentice - Technology Associate,"
                            ETS India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 18,000 /month","
                ETS engages apprentices under the National Apprenticeship Training Scheme (NATS) in compliance with the Apprenticeship Act. The goal is to provide practical training, foster skill development, and ensure compliance with the Apprenticeship Act, thereby enhancing employability and contributing to the organization's workforce development goals.

We are looking for a self-motivated and curious technology apprentice to join our team. This entry-level role is designed for individuals eager to gain practical experience in the tech industry while working toward a professional qualification or completing formal training. As a technology apprentice, you'll work alongside experienced IT professionals and contribute to real-world projects. You’ll learn foundational skills in software development, systems support, data analytics, or cybersecurity, depending on your assigned team.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Assisting in the development, testing, and maintenance of software applications or systems.
2. Providing technical support and troubleshooting hardware/software issues under supervision.
3. Participating in team meetings, agile ceremonies, and training sessions.
4. Documenting technical processes and assisting with system documentation and user guides.
5. Collaborating with cross-functional teams to deliver technology solutions.
6. Adhering to ethical standards and complying with the laws and regulations applicable to your job function.                "
Asp.net Development,"
                            COEPD (Center Of Excellence For Professional Development)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Assisting in the design, development, and maintenance of applications using the .NET framework.
2. Supporting the team in coding, debugging, and testing software applications.
3. Collaborating with senior developers and project managers to understand project requirements.
4. Learning and applying C#, ASP.NET, MVC, and SQL Server in real-world projects.
5. Participating in code reviews and following best practices for clean, maintainable code.                "
Front End Development,"
                            Nexotech Solutions (Alappuzha, India)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with our team of developers to design and implement user-friendly interfaces
2. Utilize Next.js, React, and Vue.js to create responsive web applications
3. Write clean, efficient code using HTML, CSS, and JavaScript
4. Conduct thorough testing and debugging to ensure optimal performance
5. Stay up-to-date on industry trends and best practices in front-end development
6. Assist in the optimization of web applications for speed and scalability
7. Contribute to the overall success of Nexotech Solutions through your creativity and technical expertise.                "
Construction Site Engineering,"
                            Badiyani Constructions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 13,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Managing on-site supervision of various construction activities.
2. Estimating quantities and performing rate analysis.
3. Forecasting material requirements based on project needs.
4. Reading engineering and construction drawings and communicating critical details to foremen and technicians.
5. Preparing material approval requests.
6. Creating material inspection reports.
7. Ensuring quality control and monitoring work as per relevant IS codes and approved method statements.
8. Preparing daily labor reports.
9. Compiling daily progress reports.
10. Assisting with client-side reporting and coordination.
11. Preparing measurement sheets and obtaining client signoff.                "
Python Development,"
                            Nexotech Solutions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with our development team to design and implement new features and functionalities using Python and Django.
2. Write efficient, reusable, and maintainable code that meets industry standards.
3. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging issues to ensure the smooth operation of our applications.
4. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve code quality.
5. Work on optimizing application performance and scalability.
6. Stay updated on the latest trends and best practices in Python development.
7. Contribute to the overall success of our projects by actively participating in team meetings and brainstorming sessions.                "
Web Engineering (Frontend),"
                            Caarya                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Develop responsive landing pages and dashboards using HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and React/Next.js.
2. Collaborate with the design team to bring wireframes and mockups to life.
3. Optimize website performance and ensure cross-browser compatibility.
4. Implement clean, reusable, and maintainable code.
5. Troubleshoot and debug issues in real-time projects.
6. Stay updated with the latest trends in frontend technologies.                "
Web Development,"
                            Edusaint                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 4,000 /month","
                As a Web Development intern at Edusaint, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects using your skills in Python, Flask, Node.js, HTML, CSS, jQuery, and MySQL. You will collaborate with our experienced team to develop and enhance our educational platform, making a meaningful impact on students worldwide. 

1. Develop and maintain web applications using Python, Flask, and Node.js
2. Design and implement user-friendly interfaces with HTML and CSS
3. Utilize jQuery for dynamic content and interactivity
4. Create and optimize databases with MySQL
5. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure smooth functionality
6. Stay up-to-date with the latest web development trends and technologies
7. Collaborate with team members to brainstorm and implement innovative solutions 

If you are a motivated and passionate individual looking to gain hands-on experience in web development, this internship is the perfect opportunity for you to expand your skills and contribute to a meaningful cause. Apply now and join our dynamic team at Edusaint!                "
Web Development,"
                            Hungy Inc                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Collaborating with the team to design and implement new features for the Hungy web app.
2. Debugging and resolving issues that arise in real-time usage.
3. Iterating quickly on development tasks to support rapid testing and product improvements.
4. Working with the founders to refine UI/UX and ensure scalability.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            ProAnalyser                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,500 - 11,000 /month","
                1. Assist in developing and maintaining web applications (frontend + backend).
2. Write clean, scalable, and efficient code under the guidance of senior developers.
3. Work with RESTful APIs and integrate backend services with frontend components.
4. Contribute to database design, development, and optimization.
5. Collaborate with team members to troubleshoot, debug, and improve features.
6. Participate in code reviews, knowledge-sharing sessions, and team discussions.
7. Research and learn new technologies to contribute innovative ideas.                "
UI/UX - Frontend Developer,"
                            Dodger Labs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 5,000 /month","
                As a UI/UX - frontend developer intern at Dodger Labs, you will have the opportunity to work on client projects and gain hands-on experience in the tech industry. You will collaborate with our team to create innovative user interfaces and enhance user experience. If you are passionate about UI/UX design and have proficiency in Figma and Next.js, this is the perfect opportunity for you to hone your skills and make a meaningful impact.



1. Collaborate with design and development teams to create user-friendly interfaces.
2. Implement designs using the Next.js framework to build responsive web applications.
3. Conduct user research and testing to gather feedback for iterative improvements.
4. Optimize website performance and ensure cross-browser compatibility.
5. Contribute ideas and solutions to enhance user engagement and satisfaction.

We prefer college undergrad students and recently graduated freshers.                "
Furniture And Lighting Designer,"
                            Studio Aravali                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Working on existing product range
2. Creating new designs for the upcoming collection 
3. Co-ordinating with craftsmen                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Web3Task                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,500 - 11,000 /month","
                1. Assist in the development and maintenance of user-facing features using HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
2. Collaborate with designers and back-end developers to implement responsive and interactive web interfaces.
3. Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code under the guidance of senior developers.
4. Participate in code reviews and contribute to improving coding standards and practices.
5. Troubleshoot and debug front-end issues to ensure optimal performance across different browsers and devices.
6. Optimize web pages for maximum speed and scalability.
7. Convert UI/UX design wireframes into functioning web pages.
8. Stay updated with the latest front-end technologies, trends, and best practices.
9. Test and ensure cross-browser compatibility and responsiveness.
10. Document the development process, architecture, and standard components.
11. Assist in integrating APIs and other third-party services into web applications.
12. Network debugging, how browsers parse and execute code.
13. React Profiler, Lighthouse, or front-end performance audits.
14. Deployment basics - Vercel, Netlify, or custom CI/CD pipelines for front-end.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            CharterHouse                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Work on developing the company's Internal CRM
2. Work on making RESTful APIs using Fast API
3. Be involved in product development and the roadmap of the project                "
Design – Hospitality Equipment & Omakase Project,"
                            HAKS                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Research and experiment with front panel materials (Corian, quartz, engineered stone, metals, laminates, etc.)
2. Work on aesthetic detailing to align the counter with premium hospitality standards
3. Assist in creating design mock-ups/renderings for client presentations
4. Collaborate with the production team to ensure design feasibility & functionality
5. Explore innovative finishes & textures to differentiate the product line
6. Contribute creative ideas for brand positioning through design                "
Angular Development,"
                            Jogaz Info Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain web applications using modern front-end technologies like HTML, CSS, and JavaScript (ES6+).
2. Work with popular front-end frameworks such as Angular to create responsive, dynamic, and scalable user interfaces.
3. Implement UI components that are user-friendly, efficient, and optimized for performance across various devices and browsers.
4. Work with version control systems (e.g., Git) to manage the codebase and collaborate within a development team.                "
Interior Design,"
                            Prathana Design Studio                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Creating HIGH QUALITY 3D renders.
2. Work on space planning, layouts and elevations.
3. Assist in meetings, site visits, and maintaining project documentation.
4. Monitor ongoing projects, ensuring designs are implemented as planned.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Digital Guruji                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Create tools for our platform with external API integrations.
2. Collaborate with the team to manage, optimize, and customize multiple web applications.
3. Develop and maintain both frontend and backend features.                "
Construction Site Engineering,"
                            Praphul Misra                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 40,000 - 47,000 /month","
                As a site manager intern, you will have the opportunity to gain hands-on experience in the interior renovation sector while working with a dynamic and innovative team. Your proficiency in MS Excel, strong interpersonal skills, fluent English writing ability, knowledge of construction management, and understanding of interior design will be valuable assets in this role.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Working with two key teams – Design and General Contractor – as a representative of the client, assisting in project planning, scheduling, and coordination to ensure timely completion of the project.
2. Conducting daily on-site inspections and recording to-do checklists for the day to ensure tasks are performed on budget, on quality, and on time.
3. Collaborating with design/architect, general contractor, and possible specialists in structural engineering, lighting engineering, home automation, etc., to resolve any design or construction issues that may arise.
4. Utilizing MS Excel to track project timelines, expenses, create reports, and analyze data (especially quotations) to support decision-making processes.
5. Communicating effectively with team members, client, and vendors to ensure clear and concise project updates and status reports.
6. Assisting in the procurement of materials and equipment, as well as the coordination of deliveries to the construction site.
7. Contributing to the development of innovative design solutions and interior finishes that enhance the overall aesthetic appeal of the project.

Join us and gain valuable experience that will set you on the path to a successful career in construction management.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            AGOMUC PROGRAM PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 /month","
                We are seeking a passionate and skilled Flutter Development intern to join our team at AGOMUC PROGRAM PRIVATE LIMITED. If you have experience with Flutter, Dart, REST API, Cloud Firestore, Firebase, Android, iOS, Firebase Cloud Messaging, and Google Cloud Platform (GCP), we want to hear from you!

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with our development team to design and implement new features using Flutter.
2. Develop and maintain RESTful APIs to interact with our backend systems.
3. Utilize Cloud Firestore and Firebase to store and manage data efficiently.
4. Build and optimize applications for both Android and iOS platforms.
5. Implement Firebase Cloud Messaging for real-time notifications.
6. Integrate with Google Cloud Platform (GCP) for scalable solutions.
7. Stay up-to-date on the latest Flutter and Dart trends to continuously improve our applications. 

If you are eager to learn, innovate, and contribute to exciting projects, apply now for this internship opportunity!                "
Product Management,"
                            DeepThought CultureTech Ventures Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Conduct market research, interact with prospects and document the market requirements
2. Interact with the subject matter experts and document the product vision
3. Leverage AI tools for wireframing and UI design
4. Coordinate with cross-functional teams to drive smooth execution of the project
5. Communicate with users, achieve usage for the tools built and drive feedback to the development team                "
Front Desk Executive,"
                            Omansh Gautam                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,500 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Guide new parents and visitors with admission or inquiry processes.
2. Greet parents, visitors, and students with a polite and welcoming attitude.
3. Assist in maintaining the visitor logbook and student attendance records.
4. Learn and practice handling school management software (attendance, fees, etc.).                "
Software Development,"
                            Optima Learn                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement new features for our learning platform
2. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code using best practices
3. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging issues to ensure optimal performance
4. Contribute to the overall architecture and design of our software products
5. Stay up-to-date on the latest trends and technologies in software development
6. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to team members
7. Take ownership of your work and strive for continuous improvement in your skills and knowledge.                "
Embedded Systems,"
                            Lazy Idli Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 22,000 /month","
                1. Discuss product requirements and specifications with seniors.
2. Work on the day-to-day design, development, and implementation.
3. Work on project planning and estimation.
4. Interact with interdisciplinary teams to deliver the same.                "
Python Mentor,"
                            Mikado Solutions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 11,000 /month","
                1. Record video lectures/tutorials on Python topics
2. Prepare assignments, quizzes, and projects aligned with course outcomes.
3. Assist in structuring syllabus & curriculum for different modules.
4. Ensure end-to-end course delivery, from content creation to student handholding.
5. Collaborate with the training team to maintain quality and engagement in learning materials.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Roxiler Systems                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 15,001 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain full-stack applications using ReactJS and NodeJS (ExpressJS/NestJS).
2. Implement REST APIs and integrate frontend and backend systems seamlessly.
3. Work with databases such as PostgreSQL or MySQL for data management and queries.
4. Write clean, scalable, and well-documented JavaScript/TypeScript code.
5. Use Git for version control and manage code repositories efficiently.
6. Collaborate with team members to understand requirements and participate in code reviews.
7. Work on personal, college, or live projects aligned with the current tech stack.

Good to have skills:

1. Experience with cloud platforms like AWS, GCP, or DigitalOcean.
2. Familiarity with CI/CD pipelines, Docker, or testing frameworks.
3. Basic understanding of Python, Django, or AI/ML concepts.

Notes:
This is a hands-on technical role designed for candidates passionate about full-stack development. A strong foundation in core technologies is expected. You will be contributing to real-world projects from day one.                "
Web Development,"
                            The Affordable Organic Store                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy individual with a passion for web development and sustainability? Join The Affordable Organic Store team as a Web Development intern and take your skills to the next level! 

1. Collaborate with the design and marketing teams to create visually appealing and user-friendly website features.
2. Assist in the development and implementation of new website functionalities and enhancements.
3. Perform regular website maintenance to ensure optimal performance and functionality.
4. Troubleshoot and resolve any website issues in a timely manner.
5. Conduct research on industry trends and best practices to incorporate into website development.
6. Assist in the optimization of website for SEO to drive organic traffic.
7. Participate in team meetings and brainstorming sessions to contribute ideas for website improvements.

If you are eager to learn, grow, and make a real impact in the world of e-commerce and sustainability, apply now to become our Web Development intern!                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Madquick Digital Agency                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Develop complex pass generators.
2. Contribute to end-to-end software development processes and implementation.
3. Build and optimize robust pass generators with high accuracy and performance.                "
Web Development Mentor,"
                            Mikado Solutions                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,000 - 11,000 /month","
                1. Record video lectures/tutorials on Web development topics
2. Prepare assignments, quizzes, and projects aligned with course outcomes.
3. Assist in structuring syllabus & curriculum for different modules.
4. Ensure end-to-end course delivery
5. Collaborate with the training team to maintain quality and engagement in learning materials.                "
Full Stack Developer (Shopify App Development),"
                            Shiplee                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 5,000 /month","
                1. Develop and integrate a Shopify embedded app for COD and checkout flows.
2. Build backend APIs (PHP/Laravel or Node.js) for order processing, tracking, and analytics.
3. Work with Shopify Admin API and Storefront API.
4. Implement frontend components in React/Next.js with Shopify Polaris.
5. Handle webhook integration for order creation, updates, and cancellations.
6. Collaborate with our core team on design, testing, and scaling.                "
Support Desk Specialist,"
                            Voiro Technologies Pvt Ltd.                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 22,000 /month","
                1. Meet and coordinate with internal and external stakeholders to enable product success
2. Manage ticket query system and ensure a comprehensive database of queries and resolutions is kept up to date
3. Provide necessary support relating to the product, usage, reports, or queries.
4. Communicate with customers regarding tickets, events, and maintenance
5. Escalate and track to closure items that require assistance from other teams/ members.
6. Analyse client requirements/ issues; Confer with the Product and Customer Success team regarding new requests and critical issues
7. Provide training to the users regarding any specific areas as required
8. Monitor product health and ensure system operation according to the specifications
9. Bring in continuous improvement in SLA and customer satisfaction levels
10. Strict adherence to processes                "
Tech,"
                            STARTUP SQUAD PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,500 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Design and build low-code applications and automation workflows using tools like      PowerApps, Zapier, etc.
2. Integrate AI tools and APIs to optimize business processes and workflows.
3. Develop and implement workflow solutions for real-world business problems.
4. Collaborate with the team to troubleshoot, test, and optimize applications.
5. Contribute to real projects with exposure to industry-standard technologies.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            TheCodeWork                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 35,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain mobile applications using Flutter.
2. Collaborate with the team to design, build, and ship features.
3. Write clean, maintainable, and efficient code.
4. Debug, test, and optimize application performance.
5. Stay updated with the latest Flutter and mobile development trends.                "
Product Interface Developer,"
                            Dofin Tech Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 11,000 - 15,000 /month","
                We are seeking a talented Front-End Developer to build and optimize web and mobile applications. The ideal candidate must have expertise in HTML, CSS, React, and React Native, with a strong sense of UX/UI design principles. You will collaborate with backend developers and designers to create seamless, responsive, and engaging user experiences across platforms.



1. Develop and maintain responsive web applications using React, HTML, and CSS.
2. Build and optimize mobile applications using React Native.
3. Translate UX/UI designs into high-quality, functional interfaces.
4. Write clean, maintainable, and reusable code following best practices.
5. Ensure cross-browser, cross-device, and cross-platform compatibility.
6. Use Git for version control and team collaboration.
7. Continuously enhance performance, scalability, and user experience.                "
ReactJS Development,"
                            TheCodeWork                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 35,000 /month","
                1. Assist in developing responsive, user-friendly web applications using React.js.
2. Collaborate with the development team to design, build, and maintain front-end components.
3. Work closely with designers and backend developers to integrate APIs and ensure seamless user experiences.
4. Debug and troubleshoot issues, optimizing performance where needed.
5. Stay updated with the latest front-end development trends and best practices.                "
Mathematics and Computing,"
                            FinFluence                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 12,500 /month","
                We are looking for a highly skilled Mathematics intern to join our dynamic team at ACME. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to apply your knowledge in Mathematics, Stock Trading, Data Analytics, Quantitative Research, Statistical Modeling, and Statistics to make a meaningful impact on our business.

1. Conduct statistical analysis to identify trends in financial data
2. Assist in developing and implementing quantitative trading strategies
3. Collaborate with team members to optimize algorithms for better performance
4. Use data analytics to create reports and visualizations for stakeholders
5. Conduct research on market trends and opportunities for investment
6. Assist in developing mathematical models for risk assessment and portfolio management
7. Stay up-to-date on the latest developments in the field of finance and mathematics

If you are passionate about mathematics and eager to gain hands-on experience in the finance industry, we encourage you to apply for this exciting internship opportunity. Join us at FinFluence and make a difference with your mathematical skills!                "
Python Development,"
                            Aaptatt                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 18,000 /month","
                We are seeking enthusiastic and passionate Python Developer Interns to join our growing team. This role is ideal for students and freshers who want real-world exposure in Python programming, backend development, and web application projects. Interns will work closely with experienced developers, contributing to live projects while learning industry practices.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Develop and maintain Python-based applications and tools.
2. Collaborate with the team to design and implement new features.
3. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure smooth operation.
4. Utilize HTML to create dynamic and user-friendly interfaces.
5. Integrate with APIs to enhance functionality and connectivity.
6. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback.
7. Stay current on industry trends and best practices to continuously improve your skills. 

Perks & Benefits:

1. Internship Certificate.
2. Letter of Recommendation (based on performance).
3. Pre-Placement Offer (PPO) opportunities.
4. Flexible working hours.
5. Guidance from experienced mentors.
6. Exposure to live projects and professional development environment.

Don't miss out on this exciting opportunity to kickstart your career in Python development with Aaptatt! Apply now and unleash your full potential.                "
Implementation Specialist,"
                            TARS                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Partner with Customer Success Managers and Solutions Engineers to onboard new clients and implement AI agent solutions 
2. Guide customers through technical setup including integrations, configurations, and workflow optimization 
3. Troubleshoot implementation challenges and provide creative solutions to complex customer problems 
4. Liaise with external and internal stakeholders: Act as a bridge between customer SPOCs and internal product/tech teams to help with integrations and deployments. 
5. Ticketing: You would be responsibe for addressing escalations and meeting administrative ticket service level agreements (SLAs) with our solution team's assistance. 
6. Become a conversational AI expert: Proactively assist customers by analyzing their data and proposing solutions for their problem statements and suggest next steps to increase value.                "
Robotics,"
                            Universal Adventures                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Identifying the purposes and goals of robotic applications or machines
2. Completing all stages of design for systems that accomplish stated goals
3. Creating prototypes based on early designs
4. Performing quality control and function tests to gauge performance
5. Determining the causes of malfunctions and errors
6. Adhering to developing timelines and budgetary guidelines through all stages of the design process
7. Monitoring the performances of newly deployed applications and machines
8. Writing reports, usage instructions and maintenance guidelines for robotics systems                "
QA Testing,"
                            AAROG Consultancy Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                Are you a passionate individual looking to kickstart your career in QA Testing? Look no further! AAROG Consultancy Services is seeking a talented QA Testing intern who is well-versed in Automation and Manual Testing. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Assist in creating test cases and scripts for both automated and manual testing.
2. Execute test cases and report any bugs or issues found during testing.
3. Work closely with the development team to ensure high-quality software releases.
4. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to improve testing processes and methodologies.
5. Analyze test results and provide feedback to enhance product quality.
6. Stay up-to-date with industry trends and best practices in QA Testing.
7. Contribute to the overall success of the QA Testing team through active participation and teamwork. 

If you are a proactive individual with a keen eye for detail and a strong understanding of QA Testing principles, then we want to hear from you! Join us at AAROG Consultancy Services and take the first step towards a rewarding career in software testing. Apply now!                "
Full-Stack App Development,"
                            Trinity Packaging Co. Pvt. Ltd.                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Assisting in building the core product features (app + dashboard).
2. Supporting integrations such as inventory, orders, and payments.
3. Testing and refining features based on user feedback.
4. Writing clean, maintainable code and collaborating with the team.                "
Mechanical/Electrical Interns (For Supply Chain Management),"
                            Perfint Healthcare Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. • Assist in mechanical and electrical assembly.
2. • Support in sub-assembly testing and integration of components.
3. • Assist in continuity checks, electrical safety tests, and basic functional testing.
4. • Maintain cleanliness, safety, and proper documentation in the work area.                "
UX/UI Design,"
                            Tilak Karveran                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,001 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Coordinate with one manager to understand the requirements of the flow of data from the backend and the requirements of the display front end
2. Develop a website that is able to pull data from backend (through APIs) and render display charts on the front end as per the manager's requirements
3. Code with React (TypeScript language) and Python/C++ language                "
3D modeling,"
                            Foreman Constructions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 3,000 /month","
                1. Creating 3D modelling for various farmhouse projects.
2. Preparing AutoCAD drawings for all site requirements and other running projects.
3. Using MS Excel for estimations, cataloguing, and maintaining project Gantt charts.                "
Industrial Automation And Robotics,"
                            Levon Homes Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 30,000 /month","
                As an Industrial Automation & Robotics Intern, you will work directly on high-impact factory automation projects. 

The selected intern(s) will have real responsibility and the opportunity to drive innovation in a production setup using



1. LinuxCNC-based automation projects
2. Microcontroller automation
3. Node-RED, MQTT, and open-source IoT/MES systems
4. Robotics and robot teaching systems(pick-n-place arms)

Location: On-site – Bhiwadi, Rajasthan
Duration: 3–6 Months                "
Video Editing/Making,"
                            Fynocrat Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Creating high-quality, engaging videos and reels for Instagram, YouTube Shorts, and other social platforms.
2. Developing and posting daily interactive content that attracts audience attention and builds brand visibility.
3. Representing the brand in a fun, relatable, and confident way on social media.
4. Collaborating with the marketing team for trending content ideas, campaigns, and promotions.
5. Actively growing and engaging the brand’s social community.                "
Computer Vision,"
                            Practice Buzz                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Conduct Research: Explore advanced topics in computer vision and deep learning.
2. Develop Algorithms: Create models to solve complex image and video analysis challenges.
3. Handle Data: Work with large-scale datasets to train and evaluate models.
4. Use Frameworks: Gain hands-on experience with TensorFlow, Keras, and computer vision tools like OpenCV.
5. Enhance Problem-Solving: Sharpen your analytical skills and learn to think critically in real-world scenarios.
6. Develop novel algorithms and models to solve complex problems in image and video analysis.
7. Work with large-scale datasets to train and evaluate models, ensuring high accuracy and performance.                "
Quality Control,"
                            Arcatron Mobility Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 18,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assisting in the day-to-day inspection of incoming raw materials such as foam, fabric, and accessories.
2. Supporting the quality control team in both in-process and final product quality checks for cushions and pillows.
3. Recording inspection results, noting deviations, and maintaining accurate documentation.
4. Participating in measurement checks including dimensions, weight, firmness, etc.
5. Learning and assisting in fabric testing (GSM, colorfastness, pilling, etc.).
6. Following up on non-conformities and assisting in root cause analysis (RCA).
7. Ensuring compliance with quality standards, standard operating procedures (SOPs), and safety guidelines.
8. Supporting the team during pre-dispatch inspections and packaging quality checks.                "
3D Animation,"
                            IFOA                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Modelling: aircraft components, cockpit instruments/panels, GSE (tugs, GPUs, belt loaders), and airport infrastructure (runways, taxiways, aprons, stands, markings, terminal exteriors, jet bridges, ATC towers,
perimeter fencing, signage).
2. Materials/Shaders: set up basic PBR materials; glass (IOR/refraction), metal/paint, illuminated panels; apply decals/markings accurately.
3. Lighting/Rendering: build simple night/day rigs (Eevee/Cycles); airport lighting elements (edge/centerline, stop bars, REIL, PAPI/VASI, apron floods, beacons).
4. Animation: basic sequences, control surfaces, landing gear, switches/displays, jet bridge dock/undock, pushback
cues, marshaller signals.
5.  Production Hygiene: scene organization, naming, LODs, collections/instances, texture packing,                "
UAV Design,"
                            Nurture Xcel                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Conceptual & Detailed Design
Assist in designing UAV components, including frames, propulsion systems, landing gear, and payload system,s using CAD tools like SolidWorks, CATIA, or Fusion 360.
2. Simulation & Testing
Support in running aerodynamic simulations using tools like ANSYS, XFLR5, or similar software; analyze structural and thermal performance of components.
3. Prototyping & Assembly
Collaborate in the fabrication and assembly of UAV prototypes; assist in field testing and troubleshooting of aerial systems.
4. Documentation & Compliance
Maintain design documentation, BOMs, and technical reports; ensure designs follow regulatory and safety guidelines.
5. Research & Innovation
Conduct secondary research on new materials, propulsion technologies, flight control systems, and emerging trends in UAV design.                "
Django Developer,"
                            VoxKet.AI                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain backend features using Django / Django REST Framework
2. Integrate APIs and third-party services
3. Collaborate with frontend developers to ensure seamless integration
4. Work with databases (PostgreSQL/MySQL) for data modeling and queries
5. Write clean, efficient, and well-documented code
6. Debug, test, and improve existing code and applications                "
WordPress Development,"
                            Ghackk Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 /month","
                1. Assist in designing, developing, and maintaining WordPress websites, including theme customization and plugin integration.
2. Optimize website performance, responsiveness, and SEO compatibility to enhance user experience.
3. Collaborate directly with the founder to implement new features, troubleshoot issues, and deliver high-quality web solutions.                "
MERN Stack Development,"
                            Across The Globe (ATG)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,500 - 8,000 /month","
                As a MERN stack developer intern at Across The Globe (ATG), you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects and gain valuable hands-on experience in React, Node.js, MongoDB, Express.js, CSS, HTML, JavaScript, database management systems (DBMS), and SQL. 



1. Collaborate with the development team to design and develop innovative web applications using the MERN stack.
2. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging issues to ensure seamless functionality and user experience.
3. Participate in code reviews and provide feedback to improve code quality and efficiency.
4. Work on database management tasks, including data modeling, querying, and optimization.
5. Implement responsive design principles to create visually appealing and user-friendly interfaces.
6. Research and implement best practices in web development to stay current with industry trends.
7. Contribute to the overall success of projects by meeting deadlines and exceeding expectations. 

Join us at ATG as we revolutionize the digital landscape and make a lasting impact on global industries. Apply now and take the first step towards a rewarding career in web development!                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Tenacious Techies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 14,000 /month","
                As a Flutter Development intern at Tenacious Techies, you will have the opportunity to work with cutting-edge technologies in mobile app development. We are looking for a talented individual who is proficient in Flutter, REST API, Dart, Android, Firebase, and iOS. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our team to design and develop innovative mobile applications using Flutter framework.
2. Implement RESTful APIs to communicate with backend services and databases.
3. Utilize Dart programming language to build efficient and reusable code for mobile apps.
4. Test and debug applications to ensure they meet high-quality standards and perform optimally across various devices.
5. Integrate Firebase services for authentication, cloud messaging, and data storage in mobile applications.
6. Work on both Android and iOS platforms, ensuring a seamless user experience across different operating systems.
7. Stay updated on the latest trends and best practices in mobile app development, contributing fresh ideas to our projects. 

If you are passionate about mobile development and eager to expand your skills in Flutter, this internship is the perfect opportunity for you to gain hands-on experience and make a real impact in the tech industry. Join us at Tenacious Techies and be part of a dynamic team that is dedicated to pushing boundaries and creating innovative solutions.                "
Web Development,"
                            Ivyaan Pawar                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                1. Design website for a stealth mode startup
2. Develop the website as per guidelines
3. Maintain wesbite on an on-going basis                "
React Native Development,"
                            CMT AI                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                We are looking for a talented Mobile App Development intern to join our team at CMT AI. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain hands-on experience in React Native, REST API, and MongoDB.



1. Develop and maintain mobile applications using React Native.
2. Integrate REST API services into mobile applications for seamless functionality.
3. Collaborate with the team to design and implement new features for our mobile apps.
4. Test and debug code to ensure the quality and performance of the applications.
5. Work with MongoDB to manage and store data for our mobile applications.
6. Provide support and assistance to the development team as needed.
7. Stay up-to-date on the latest mobile app development trends and technologies.

If you are passionate about mobile app development and eager to learn, this internship is the perfect opportunity for you to grow and expand your skills in a fast-paced and innovative environment. Apply now to join our dynamic team at CMT AI!                "
WordPress Development,"
                            SortWind Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Designing and developing custom WordPress themes and plugins based on project requirements
2. Updating and maintaining existing WordPress websites, ensuring performance, security, and responsiveness
3. Collaborating with the design and content teams to implement new website features and optimize user experience

Skills Required:
1. Strong understanding of WordPress architecture
2. Proficiency in PHP, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and MySQL
3. Familiarity with WordPress theme and plugin development
4. Experience with Elementor, WPBakery, or other page builders (optional but preferred)
5. Knowledge of REST APIs, AJAX, and WordPress hooks (actions & filters)
6. Understanding of website performance optimization and basic SEO principles
7. Ability to use Git for version control (bonus)                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            SortWind Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Working on web applications that are coded in PHP, ReactJS, Node.js, and Express, Flutter, Rust, Golang
2. Working on ReactJS projects whose backend would be in Node.js & database is MongoDB
3. Working on Firebase                "
Robotics,"
                            VIGYANTRAM TECHNOLOGY                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 14,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Provide training on robotics and IoT school subjects
2. Work on proper communication with students
3. Work according to company rules and regulations                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            AiCortext Solutions Pvt. Ltd.                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 15,000 /month","
                As an intern, you will work closely with our core engineering team to design, implement, and optimize backend services and components that power our platform. This is an excellent opportunity to gain hands-on experience in cloud-native AI infrastructure while contributing to real-world systems.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Develop, test, and maintain Python-based microservices for the AI serverless platform.
2. Work on GPU resource management modules for auto-scaling and throttling hardware.
3. Contribute to building APIs and SDKs for model training orchestration.
Implement serverless workflows for model training, inference, and monitoring.
4. Assist in optimizing training times by developing efficient job scheduling and distributed training pipelines.
5. Collaborate with the team to integrate containerized workloads (Docker, Kubernetes).
6. Write unit tests and participate in code reviews to ensure clean, scalable, and maintainable code.

7. Explore open-source frameworks and contribute to improving system design.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Ghackk Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the founder directly to implement features, solve technical challenges, and learn best practices in real-world projects.
2. Assist in designing, developing, and maintaining full-stack web applications using front-end and back-end technologies.
3. Participate in testing, debugging, and optimizing code to improve performance and user experience.                "
Front End Development,"
                            Ghackk Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 /month","
                1. Assist in designing and implementing responsive web pages using HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
2. Collaborate with the design and back-end team to ensure seamless UI/UX integration.
3. Work directly with the founder to understand project requirements and implement front-end solutions effectively.                "
Backend Development,"
                            Ghackk Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 /month","
                1. Assist in developing and maintaining server-side applications using languages like Node.js, Python, or PHP.
2. Integrate databases, APIs, and third-party services into web applications.
3. Work directly with the founder to implement scalable back-end solutions and understand the workflow of a startup.                "
Python Development,"
                            Across The Globe (ATG)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,500 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement serverless applications using Python
2. Optimize code for performance and scalability in serverless environments
3. Integrate third-party services and APIs to enhance functionality
4. Conduct code reviews and provide constructive feedback to team members
5. Troubleshoot and debug applications to ensure they meet quality standards
6. Stay up-to-date on the latest trends and best practices in serverless architecture
7. Assist in deploying and maintaining serverless applications in cloud environments

Don't miss this opportunity to kickstart your career in serverless development with ATG. Apply now and be a part of our dynamic team!                "
Backend Development,"
                            Lawtech                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 /month","
                About the Project:
 
We are building an innovative LLM based platform that dynamically solves Quantitative Aptitude and Reasoning questions and renders step-by-step solutions using pre- designed HTML/CSS templates with illustrations. The backend will analyze the question, solve it using the right logic, and map it to the correct template for display.
 
As a Backend Developer Intern, you will be responsible for developing the backend engine that powers this automation.
 
Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Develop backend logic to classify questions (Profit & Loss, Ratio, Time & Distance, etc.) based on keywords/regex or simple NLP.
2. Implement solver modules for different question categories (mathematical & logical reasoning).
3. Integrate solvers with HTML/CSS templates using a template engine (e.g., Jinja2 for Flask).
4. Design APIs or routes to accept input questions and return dynamic rendered solutions.
5. Write clean, modular, and well-documented code.
  
What You’ll Learn:

1. Building a complete backend system from scratch.
2. Converting real-world problem statements into automated logic solvers.
3. Dynamic template rendering and integration with frontend.
4. Experience working on an educational automation product.                "
Node Js,"
                            International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                Are you a skilled Node.js developer looking to gain real-world experience in a dynamic and innovative environment? Look no further! International Institute Of SDGs & Public Policy Research is seeking a talented Node.js intern to join our team. As an intern, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects and contribute to the advancement of sustainable development goals.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborating with our development team to design and implement scalable and efficient Node.js applications.
2. Writing clean, maintainable, and efficient code following best practices.
3. Participating in code reviews and providing constructive feedback to team members.
4. Assisting in troubleshooting and debugging issues to ensure smooth project delivery.
5. Keeping up to date with the latest trends and technologies in Node.js development.
6. Working on various projects related to Sustainable Development Goals (SDGs) and public policy research.
7. Communicating effectively with team members and stakeholders to ensure project success.

If you are passionate about using your Node.js skills to make a positive impact on society, we want to hear from you! Apply now to join our team and take your career to the next level.                "
React Native Development (iOS APP Development),"
                            Across The Globe (ATG)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,500 - 10,000 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy individual with a passion for iOS app development? Look no further! Across The Globe (ATG) is seeking a talented React Native development intern to join our dynamic team. As an intern with us, you'll have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects, gain hands-on experience, and make a real impact in the world of mobile app development.



1. Collaborate with our team to design and develop innovative iOS applications using React Native
2. Assist in the implementation of new features and functionalities to enhance user experience
3. Conduct thorough testing and debugging to ensure high-quality performance of the applications
4. Stay up-to-date with the latest trends and technologies in mobile app development
5. Participate in brainstorming sessions and contribute creative ideas to improve our products
6. Work closely with cross-functional teams to meet project deadlines and deliver exceptional results
7. Learn and grow professionally through mentorship and training opportunities provided by our experienced developers

If you're ready to kickstart your career in iOS app development and make a difference in the tech industry, apply now to join ATG as a React Native development intern!                "
Bioinformatics,"
                            Bayes Labs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Assist with processing, analyzing, and visualizing large-scale biological datasets, including genomic, transcriptomic, and proteomic data.
2. Use bioinformatics tools and programming languages (such as Python, R, or Bioconductor) to develop custom scripts and pipelines for data analysis.
3. Contribute to the development, maintenance, and querying of biological databases for various research projects.
4. Collaborate with senior bioinformaticians and researchers to support ongoing projects and provide insights into biological data. Run case studies and validate in-house technologies.
5. Assist in the preparation of reports, presentations, and scientific publications based on data analysis results.
6. Ensure all processes, workflows, and scripts are well-documented for reproducibility and future use.                "
Shopify Developer,"
                            Aadi Foundation                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 5,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about using your Shopify development skills to make a positive impact on society? Join us at Aadi Foundation as a Shopify Developer intern and help us revolutionize the way we connect with our community. As a part of our team, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects while gaining valuable hands-on experience in the world of e-commerce.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with our design team to create visually stunning and user-friendly Shopify websites.
2. Customize Shopify themes using CSS and CSS3 to ensure a seamless and responsive user experience.
3. Implement HTML 5 best practices to optimize website performance and functionality.
4. Troubleshoot and debug any issues that arise during the development process.
5. Work closely with our marketing team to integrate various third-party apps and tools into our Shopify platform.
6. Stay up-to-date on the latest Shopify trends and technologies to continuously improve our online presence.
7. Assist in testing and launching new features and updates to our Shopify websites.

If you are a motivated self-starter with a passion for web development and a desire to make a difference, apply now to become a part of our dynamic team at Aadi Foundation!                "
Product Management,"
                            TheProductWorks.in                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,001 - 4,501 /month","
                a. Market and User Research:
1. Conduct research to understand customer pain points, behaviors, and needs.
2. Assist in gathering feedback through surveys, interviews, and user testing.
3. Analyze competitor products and market trends to identify gaps and opportunities.

b. Data Analysis and Reporting:
1. Analyze product metrics, customer data, and market trends to support decision-making.
2. Work with senior PMs to create reports that outline product performance and user behavior.
3. Help in interpreting A/B test results and customer feedback to improve product strategies.

c. Assist in Creating PRDs (Product Requirement Documents):
1. Contribute to writing clear, detailed PRDs that define features, functionality, and requirements.
2. Work with cross-functional teams to ensure alignment between business needs and product features.
3. Gather and consolidate inputs from stakeholders to ensure all product requirements are addressed.

d. Cross-functional Collaboration:
1. Participate in meetings with design, development, and marketing teams to understand how different functions work together to deliver the product.
2. Assist in coordinating efforts across departments to ensure timely and efficient product launches.
3. Help maintain product roadmaps and ensure alignment between teams.

e. Support Product Launches and Iterations:
1. Help in tracking and managing the product launch timelines and deliverables.
2. Participate in monitoring product performance post-launch and assist with gathering feedback for iteration.
3. Assist in managing product backlog and prioritizing feature requests.

f. Documentation and Process Improvement:
1. Maintain up-to-date documentation on product specs, user stories, and project timelines.
2. Help improve product management processes and workflows for better efficiency.
3. Contribute to knowledge sharing within the team through reports and presentations.

g. Learning and Development:
1. Attend training sessions, workshops, and team meetings to learn about best practices in product management.
2. Work closely with mentors to understand the strategic and tactical aspects of managing a product.
3. Engage in ongoing learning to better understand the principles and methodologies used in product management.                "
QA Testing,"
                            Blaziken Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Test and evaluate various apps/websites
2. Maintain and update the bugs and feature tickets on Notion
3. Provide and communicate status updates on the progress of the project                "
Front End Development,"
                            Shashij Gupta                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 - 30,000 /month","
                As a Front End Development intern at Shashij Gupta, you will have the exciting opportunity to work with a dynamic team to build cutting-edge web applications using Next.js. Your passion for crafting user-friendly interfaces and your proficiency in Next.js will be crucial in helping us create seamless and visually appealing digital experiences for our clients. 

1. Collaborate with the design team to implement user interface elements based on provided designs
2. Optimize web applications for maximum speed and scalability 
3. Ensure cross-browser compatibility and responsiveness across various devices 
4. Troubleshoot and debug issues to improve overall user experience 
5. Implement efficient coding practices to enhance website performance 
6. Stay up-to-date with industry trends and best practices in front end development 
7. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback for continuous improvement. 

If you are a passionate and innovative individual looking to gain hands-on experience in front end development with Next.js, we would love to have you on board to help us build the future of web applications at Shashij Gupta. Apply now and be a part of our exciting journey!                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Statslane                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 18,000 /month","
                Are you a skilled Flutter developer looking to kickstart your career in a dynamic and innovative work environment? Statslane is seeking a motivated Flutter Development intern to join our talented team. If you have experience with Flutter, iOS, Android, Dart, REST API, Debugging, Git, and Responsive Design, then we want to hear from you!

Key responsibilities:
1. Collaborate with our development team to design and implement new features for our mobile applications
2. Conduct thorough testing and debugging to ensure top-notch performance and user experience
3. Utilize REST API integration to enhance app functionality and user engagement
4. Work closely with designers to create responsive and visually appealing interfaces
5. Utilize version control with Git to manage codebase efficiently
6. Stay current with industry trends and best practices to constantly improve our mobile applications
7. Participate in team meetings and contribute ideas to drive innovation and growth in our projects. 

If you are passionate about mobile development and eager to learn and grow in a fast-paced environment, then apply now to join our team at Statslane!                "
PHP Development,"
                            Patel Infotech Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                We are seeking a talented and passionate PHP development intern to join our team at Patel Infotech Services. If you are proficient in PHP, MySQL, HTML, JavaScript, jQuery, AJAX, CodeIgniter, Laravel, WordPress, Shopify, Node.js, APIs, and REST API, we want to hear from you.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Assist in developing and maintaining web applications using PHP and other technologies.
2. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement new features.
3. Troubleshoot and debug issues to ensure optimal performance.
4. Contribute to the development of APIs for seamless integration with external systems.
5. Support the implementation and customization of CMS platforms like WordPress and Shopify.
6. Stay updated on industry trends and technologies to enhance project efficiency.
7. Communicate effectively with team members to ensure project deadlines are met.

If you are eager to gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced and innovative work environment, apply now to kickstart your career in PHP development with us!                "
Operations,"
                            Fazlani Exports Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                Department: Operations / Industrial Engineering – Food Division
Location: Ghansoli, Navi Mumbai
Duration: 3-6 months
We are looking for a highly motivated Food Tech – Intern to support our Time & Motion Study and Manning Analysis initiatives in the Food Division at Fazlani. The role is ideal for recent engineering graduates who are analytical, hands-on, and eager to gain practical experience in process improvement and industrial efficiency in a fast-paced FMCG manufacturing environment.



1. Conduct detailed time & motion studies across key production lines to capture task-level data.
2. Observe and document work processes, material movement, cycle times, idle times, and operator performance.
3. Analyze collected data to identify inefficiencies, bottlenecks, and areas for productivity improvement.
4. Support the manning analysis by:
- Mapping current manpower deployment across shifts.
- Assessing optimal headcount required for each operation/station.
- Recommending improvements for workforce productivity and line balancing.
5. Create standard operating time documents and contribute to updating work instructions.
6. Collaborate with production supervisors, line managers, and HR for data validation.
7. Present findings with visual dashboards, charts, and reports.
8. Maintain strict adherence to plant safety and hygiene norms while on the shop floor.                "
Product Management,"
                            LNS Mundra                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                Mason Mart (MM) is launching a new digital application for the building materials sector, and we are looking for interns to help analyze and decide which products should be listed on the platform. This is a great opportunity for individuals interested in market research, product analysis, and supply chain operations in the construction industry.



A. Market Research & Product Analysis:
1. Research various building materials and their demand in different regions.
2. Identify high-demand products across categories such as dry mix mortar, waterproofing chemicals, tile adhesives, AAC blocks, cement, etc.

B. Competitor & Pricing Analysis:
1. Study competitor applications and analyze their product offerings.
2. Compare pricing, quality, and brand popularity to determine the best fit for MM’s platform.

C. Vendor & supplier coordination:
1. Collaborate with existing suppliers and explore new partnerships.
2. Gather details on pricing, MOQ (minimum order quantity), and logistics feasibility.

D. Data-driven decision-making:
1. Use sales data and market trends to recommend which products should be added to the platform.
2. Prepare comparison reports and present findings to the MM team.

E. Collaboration with technical & sales team:
1. Work with the tech team to ensure proper categorization of products in the digital application.
2. Support the sales team by providing insights into customer preferences and demand patterns.                "
Entrepreneurial Software Development (Backend),"
                            Bizowl                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with other developers to design, develop, and implement the next phase of our product (frontend and backend).  
2. Work on a marketplace business model (panels).  
3. Write clean, efficient, and maintainable code using React and Firebase.  
4. Participate in daily stand-ups and report progress directly to the founder.  
5. Develop chat and communication systems (similar to Uber and Ola).  
6. Take initiative in brainstorming sessions and contribute innovative ideas to improve the product.
7. If you are someone who is looking to be part of interested tasks.                "
Game Development,"
                            Underpin Services                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                -Assist in developing and maintaining Unity-based applications and games.
-Support the integration of assets, animations, and UI into the Unity environment.
-Work closely with the senior developers to implement gameplay mechanics and core systems.
-Help in identifying bugs and testing gameplay functionality.
-Participate in team discussions and contribute to creative and technical solutions.
-Stay updated with Unity's latest features and development best practices.                "
Computer Vision,"
                            BigVision                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 50,000 /month","
                1. Analyzing and interpreting complex datasets to improve algorithm performance.
2. Integrating machine learning and deep learning techniques into computer vision systems.
3. Collaborating with cross-functional teams, including software engineers and product managers, to develop and refine products.
4. Preparing technical reports and documentation for internal and external stakeholders.
5. Ensuring the robustness and reliability of computer vision systems.                "
AI Research,"
                            The Crazy Entrepreneur                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Review recent research papers and summarize findings.
2. Build and test AI/ML models using Python and frameworks like PyTorch or TensorFlow.
3. Work with datasets (collecting, cleaning, and analyzing).
4. Share results with the team through short reports or presentations.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Smartsevak                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Building and maintaining full-stack web applications using React.js, Node.js, MongoDB, and APIs.
2. Assisting in the development of new features across CRM, WhatsApp automation, dashboards, and AI-driven tools.
3. Writing clean, efficient, and well-documented code following best practices.
4. Collaborating with the product and design teams to deliver user-friendly experiences.
5. Debugging, testing, and optimizing existing features for performance and scalability.
6. Exploring and experimenting with AI/automation integrations to add real value to clients.
7. Participating in daily stand-ups, brainstorming sessions, and code reviews.                "
Gaming Business Development,"
                            Diasimos Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Selected member's day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Scouting upcoming and established gaming creators/streamers.
2. Building relationships with gamers, streamers, and creator teams.
3. Pitching Glitchover as the go-to hub for fan–creator interaction.
4. Brainstorming cool collabs and gaming-focused events.
5. Sharing insights from the gaming community to shape our product.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            OyeLabs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Translate designs and wireframes into high-quality code
2. Design, build, and maintain high-performance, reusable, and reliable Dart and Java code
3. Ensure the best possible performance, quality, and responsiveness of the application
4. Identify and correct bottlenecks and fix bugs
5. Help maintain code quality, organization, and automation                "
Product Management,"
                            FynTune Solution Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 18,000 /month","
                1. Understanding the product offerings and managing new deliverables
2. Working on product planning and its complete roadmap, including UI/UX
3. Collaborating with FynTune's stakeholders, including both the management and their clients who utilize FynTune's technology solutions, such as insurance companies, aggregators, and financial enterprises, to plan projects effectively
4. Working along with the QA team on product logic and product validations
5. Working along with the technology team on product development
6. Working with the project team & supporting them on product deliveries
7. Coordinating with stakeholders (internal & external) for the smooth delivery of the overall project
8. Understanding the requirements of clients on the project front and getting the deliveries from FynTune's technology and product team                "
Backend Development,"
                            Meteoros Automation                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 4,200 /month","
                1. Design, develop, and maintain backend features for the in-house IoT platform, ensuring reliability, scalability, and performance.
2. Develop and integrate APIs to manage IoT devices, data streams, and rules within the platform.
3. Collaborate with the frontend development team to implement and optimize data flow and APIs for real-time monitoring and device management.
4. Contribute to the research and development of new backend features and enhancements.
5. Collaborate with the development team to support ongoing projects and system improvements.
6. Assist in creating and maintaining technical documentation.
7. Support senior developers in day-to-day processes and tasks.
8. Test and validate new backend features to ensure stability and performance.                "
Android App Development,"
                            Qaaq.app                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 30,000 /month","
                Are you a passionate Android App Development intern looking to gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced environment? Look no further! Join Qaaq.app and work alongside our talented team of developers to create cutting-edge mobile applications. 

Key Responsibilities:

1. Collaborate with the team to design and develop innovative Android applications using React Native, React, and JavaScript.
2. Utilize PostgreSQL to manage and optimize databases for seamless app performance.
3. Integrate REST APIs to enhance app functionality and user experience.
4. Utilize Firebase for real-time data synchronization and cloud storage.
5. Stay up-to-date with industry trends and best practices to ensure top-notch app quality.
6. Test and debug applications to identify and resolve any technical issues.
7. Assist in the deployment and maintenance of Android apps to ensure smooth operation for users.

If you thrive in a dynamic and collaborative work environment and have a strong understanding of Android app development technologies, we want to hear from you! Join us at QAAQ and take your skills to the next level.                "
Quality Analyst,"
                            Aparoksha Financial Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 9,000 /month","
                1. Quality check
2. Check details of kyc
3. Move the proposal as per instruction from the system                "
Operations & Technical Research,"
                            Hexona Systems                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 40,000 - 90,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include: 

1. Creating professional proposals for clients, ensuring all deliverables are explicitly documented, and sending agreements to clients for signature.
2. Researching and evaluating software solutions based on client requirements, verifying API availability and technical feasibility.
3. Analyzing client business processes and recommending appropriate automation/tech solutions to solve their specific problems.
4. Supporting consulting engagements by documenting business requirements and mapping them to technical solutions.
5. Assisting in building automation workflows for client projects (paid per-project basis in addition to base stipend).
6. Maintaining documentation of tools, APIs, and integration capabilities for quick reference.                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            Omras Renewable Energy                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 21,000 /month","
                1. Overseeing the installation of solar panels on framed structures.
2. Construction of framed structures.                "
Merchandising & Vendor Management,"
                            Aatachi                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                ImliHomes (Aatachi brand) is looking for a motivated intern to work closely with the founder on merchandising and vendor management. Your role will involve:

1. Managing inventory and product listings on the website.
2. Coordinating with vendors for procurement, quality, and timely deliveries.
3. Assisting in planning merchandising strategies and promotional campaigns.
4. Conducting market research to identify trends and new opportunities.
5. Supporting smooth vendor relationships and customer experience.

If you’re detail-oriented and eager to gain hands-on e-commerce experience, apply now and join our exciting journey at ImliHomes!                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Codezero2pi Solution (OPC) Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the development team to design and implement scalable full-stack applications using React (frontend) and Nest.js (backend)
2. Build and optimize dynamic user interfaces and responsive designs with React
3. Develop and maintain RESTful APIs and GraphQL endpoints using Nest.js
4. Work with relational databases like MySQL for efficient data storage and retrieval
5. Integrate AI tools and libraries into applications to enhance functionality and user experience
6. Assist in debugging and troubleshooting both frontend and backend systems to ensure high performance and reliability
7. Stay current with the latest technologies in React, Nest.js, Python, and AI, proposing and implementing new ideas
8. Participate in research and development on deep learning and neural network applications for real-world use cases
9. Contribute to team meetings, brainstorming sessions, and documentation efforts                "
Android App Development,"
                            Arachnomesh Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,001 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Build and ship high-quality Android apps using Kotlin.
2. Design apps that work in an online-offline mode — storing data locally and syncing effortlessly when online.
3. Work with both local databases (Room/ORMs/SQLite) and remote servers to ensure data integrity.
4. Integrate with REST/GraphQL APIs and optimize performance.
5. Apply mathematical and analytical skills to solve tough technical challenges.
6. Rapidly prototype new ideas and push them to production.
7. Collaborate with designers, backend developers, and product teams to deliver seamless user experiences.
8. Stay curious — explore new tools, frameworks, and approaches.                "
Technical Support & Web Designing,"
                            Trusted Hosting                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 11,000 /month","
                1.Assisting customers with hosting & technical support queries.
2.Troubleshooting issues related to WordPress, cPanel, and website setup.
3.Designing and customizing basic websites using HTML/CSS/WordPress.
4.Coordinating with senior admins for server or hosting issues.
5.Documenting and updating client support tickets in a professional manner.                "
Product & Operations,"
                            Zeko                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

AI Interview & Candidate Process Monitoring

1. Overseeing the execution of AI interview workflows and ensuring process accuracy.
2. Monitoring AI interview recordings to track candidate performance and flag inconsistencies or malpractice.
3. Ensuring smooth functioning of system processes with minimal errors.

Product Data & Feedback Analysis

1. Collecting, organizing, and analyzing operational data from interviews and platform usage.
2. Generating structured feedback reports for product and tech teams.
3. Identifying trends, recurring issues, and opportunities for product improvement.

Operational Support & Reporting

1. Documenting and escalating technical or operational issues affecting performance.
2. Providing insights on process efficiency and recommending workflow improvements.
3. Maintaining accurate records and dashboards for tracking interviews, system issues, and feedback.

Coordination & Reporting

1. Maintaining detailed records of candidate support and operational activities.
2. Preparing and sharing regular reports on candidate experiences and operational efficiency.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Arachnomesh Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,001 - 30,000 /month","
                1. Build and ship end-to-end features — from backend APIs to polished front-end experiences.
2. Rapidly prototype ideas using vibe coding to validate and iterate quickly.
3. Switch between different languages, frameworks, and architectures when needed.
4. Solve hard problems with creativity, math, and analytical skills.
5. Collaborate with product, design, and the rest of the dev team to bring ideas to life.
6. Keep learning, experimenting, and pushing the limits of what’s possible.                "
Full Stack Development (MERN),"
                            Attento Technologies Pvt Ltd                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,500 /month","
                1. Develop front-end website architecture using React and Next.js to create user-friendly interfaces.
2. Build scalable back-end services using Node.js and MongoDB for efficient data management.
3. Implement REST APIs for seamless communication between front-end and back-end systems.
4. Utilize Shadcn for secure authentication and authorization processes.
5. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to design and implement innovative solutions.
6. Test and debug code to ensure high performance and reliability of applications.
7. Stay updated on industry trends and best practices to continuously enhance your skills and contribute to the company's success.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Enpointe                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                intern's day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Work on designing and developing applications - provide consistent performance from designing the application, planning a timeline, and developing any complicated application within a short time compared to any other native apps out there, including the important features at the time of development, and predict potential bugs.
2. Write clean code - write a readable and comprehensive clean code (this will help scale the app faster allowing the development team to invest significantly less time in its operations).
3. Take part in the development lifecycle - while creating an app, it will be imperative for you to work with QA engineers, UI/UX designers, project managers, and others.
4. Fix bugs - the QA engineers will conduct several tests to identify any malfunction or bug after completing the production of every single feature, and work with the team to fix any issues once identified during the testing stage.
5. Investigate technologies - the IT industry is making continuous advancements while innovations are being introduced from time to time.
6. Follow innovative trends - every developer must go on learning continuously 
7. Work on deployment - help with the deployment of production apps.                "
Market Research - Sustainability & Climate Tech,"
                            Energy Alternatives India                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Conduct secondary and primary market research to gather focused, specialized industry inputs (training will be provided).
2. Support in developing professional industry and management reports on renewable energy, electric vehicles, climate startups, and innovations.
3. Assist the reports team with illustrations, charts, and calculations for reports.
4. Contribute to the online marketing team by preparing brief blog posts and LinkedIn updates derived from report content.                "
Strategy Consulting - Sustainability & Climate Tech,"
                            Energy Alternatives India                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Work closely with senior consultants on strategic projects across the climate tech ecosystem.
2. Interact with senior management of leading Indian and global firms, gaining insights into industry practices and leadership perspectives.
3. Develop a strong understanding of key trends, drivers, challenges, and innovations shaping the sector.
4. Contribute to market needs assessment, market potential evaluation, and strategy development for product or solution design.
5. Support the market research team by:
Conducting primary and secondary research
Performing in-depth market data analysis
Participating in brainstorming sessions
Assisting in the preparation of client reports and presentations                "
Program Management for Climate Tech,"
                            Energy Alternatives India                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with senior leadership on strategic programs and projects in climate tech and clean energy.
2. Contribute to a mix of market research, stakeholder interactions, solution development, and program management (short-term and long-term).
3. Manage and support collaborative projects, workshops, and conferences in the sector.
4. Interact with corporate leaders, climate tech startups, and investors to build strong professional networks.
5. Take ownership of tasks with the mindset of a founder in a fast-paced startup environment.
6. Work across diverse domains including Renewable Energy, Energy Efficiency, Electric Mobility, Advanced Materials, Waste Management, Sustainable Agriculture, and Water Sustainability.                "
Biotech Research For Climate Studies,"
                            Energy Alternatives India                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Research & Analysis – Explore, understand, and analyze emerging concepts in biotech, agriculture, and bio-based industries.
2. Website Development Support – Contribute content and insights to the BioBiz website, showcasing expertise and thought leadership in the biotech and biomass sectors.
3. Project Collaboration – Work with the EAI climate tech consulting team to provide research support on topics such as bio-energy, biofuels, bioplastics, biochemicals, bioremediation, and other value-added bio-based products.
4. Market & Intelligence Gathering – Conduct primary and secondary research using databases, interviews, and direct interactions with bio-based solution providers.
5. Content Development – Assist in preparing white papers and reports on the role of biotechnology in renewable energy, green chemicals, sustainable transport, packaging, waste management, and more.
6. Executive Support – Help senior executives in developing focused presentations for corporate leaders worldwide.                "
CAD Tools Trainer,"
                            Prerna Gati Technology                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about CAD tools and eager to share your knowledge with others? Prerna Gati Technology is seeking a talented CAD tools trainer intern to join our dynamic team. As a CAD tools trainer intern, you will have the opportunity to work with industry-leading software such as AutoCAD, SolidWorks, Google SketchUp, Autodesk 3ds Max, Autodesk Revit, STAAD.Pro, and ETABS. This is a unique chance to enhance your skills, gain real-world experience, and make a meaningful impact on the next generation of CAD professionals.

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Developing and delivering engaging training sessions on various CAD tools to team members.
2. Creating interactive tutorials and resources to support the learning process.
3. Providing one-on-one coaching and support to team members as they navigate through complex software functionalities.
4. Staying up-to-date on the latest trends and updates in the CAD industry to ensure training materials are current and relevant.
5. Collaborating with the HR and IT departments to identify training needs and tailoring programs accordingly.
6. Assisting in the evaluation of training sessions to measure effectiveness and adjusting strategies as needed.
7. Contributing to the overall success of the company by promoting a culture of continuous learning and growth.                "
Quality Control,"
                            Arcatron Mobility Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 17,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in day-to-day inspection of incoming raw materials (foam, 
fabric, accessories).
2. Support QC team in in-process and final product quality checks for 
cushions and pillows.
3. Help record inspection results, deviations, and maintain proper 
documentation.
4. Participate in measurement checks (dimensions, weight, firmness, 
etc.).
5. Learn and assist in testing fabric (GSM, colorfastness, pilling, etc.).
6. Follow up on non-conformities and assist in root cause analysis 
(RCA).
7. Ensure compliance with quality standards, SOPs, and safety 
guidelines.
8. Support the team during pre-dispatch inspections and packaging 
quality checks.                "
Clinical Data Analyst,"
                            IDDCR Global Research CRO Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 1,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Supporting the design, development, and review of Case Report Forms (CRFs).
2. Assisting in database setup, data entry, data validation, and discrepancy management.
3. Performing quality checks on collected clinical data for accuracy and completeness.
4. Supporting external data handling (labs, imaging, device data integration).
5. Learning and applying CDISC/CDASH standards in real-world projects.
6. Collaborating with data managers, statisticians, and programmers to support ongoing projects.
7. Participating in preparing documentation (Data Management Plan, Validation Checks, Data Review Guidelines, etc.).                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            Whatbytes                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain mobile applications using React Native
2. Collaborate with designers and backend devolopers to create seamless user experiences
3. Debug and optimize application performance
4. Write clean, maintainable, and reusable code
5. Test and ensure the functionality of applications across multiple platforms (iOS and Android)
6. Participate in team discussions and provide creative solutions                "
Backend Development,"
                            URE Legal Advocates                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 /month","
                1. Develop and maintain backend APIs using Next.js (API Routes), Node.js, and Express.js.
2. Work with databases (PostgreSQL / MongoDB / MySQL) for data storage and queries.
3. Implement authentication & authorization (JWT, OAuth2).
4. Optimize backend performance, scalability, and server-side rendering (SSR).
5. Integrate REST APIs / GraphQL with frontend apps.
6. Deploy applications on Vercel / AWS / Docker.
7. Debug, test, and maintain backend code with proper documentation.
8. Use Git/GitHub for version control & CI/CD workflows.
9. Apply AI tools (ChatGPT, Copilot) for faster coding and debugging.                "
Full Stack Developer (Ruby On Rails + AI Integration),"
                            Envision Next LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                1. Design, develop, and maintain scalable web applications using Ruby on Rails.
2. Integrate AI/ML solutions into business workflows to optimize processes and enhance user experience.
3. Build clean, efficient, and maintainable front-end and back-end code.
4. Collaborate with cross-functional teams (Product, Design, and Data) to deliver innovative solutions.
5. Work with databases, APIs, and cloud services to ensure high performance and scalability.
6. Stay updated with emerging technologies (AI, automation tools, frameworks) and apply them to projects.
7. Write unit tests, perform code reviews, and ensure code quality.                "
Operation And Project Management (Mechanical & Electrical),"
                            Inspacco                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Work end-to-end on assigned projects with complete ownership and accountability.
2. Conduct detailed vendor research for required services in projects and obtain quotations.
3. Compare vendor quotations, negotiate pricing, and secure the best possible rates.
4. Ensure seamless project execution to meet timelines and deliver the best client experience.                "
AI Software Engineering (Generative AI & Emerging Technologies),"
                            Luminova Consulting                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 8,000 /month","
                1. Collaborating with the team on LLMs, Vision Models, and Multimodal AI systems to build and test generative AI solutions.
2. Working with mentors and team members to implement fine-tuning, RAG pipelines, LlamaIndex, vector databases, and prompt engineering for real-world applications.
3. Developing scalable APIs and microservices using Python as the core language.
4. Building and integrating full-stack features using JavaScript/TypeScript and React.
5. Containerizing and deploying AI applications with Docker, GitHub Actions, and Terraform.
6. Deploying, testing, and optimizing AI workloads on AWS, GCP, or Azure (including Bedrock, Vertex AI, and OpenAI, Claude by Anthropic).
7. Collaborating with the team to integrate secure coding practices and assist in basic cybersecurity tasks (SIEM tools, compliance checks, threat modeling).
8. Documenting workflows, technical processes, and contributing to team discussions on emerging technologies.                "
Frontend Development (Angular Js),"
                            SIRPI Products & Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 14,999 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Build and enhance UI components using AngularJS.
2. Translate design wireframes into clean, maintainable code.
3. Optimize component performance and ensure responsiveness across browsers.
4. Collaborate closely with backend developers for seamless integration.
5. Debug UI issues proactively and offer performance enhancements.                "
IT,"
                            Terra Nova Global                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 13,000 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy problem solver with excellent interpersonal skills? Terra Nova Global is looking for an enthusiastic IT Intern to join our dynamic team! As an intern, you will have the opportunity to gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced environment while supporting our IT department. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in troubleshooting and resolving technical issues for employees
2. Collaborate with team members to develop innovative solutions to enhance IT systems
3. Provide support for software installations and updates
4. Assist with network maintenance and security protocols
5. Conduct research on new technologies and developments in the IT field
6. Assist with data management and analysis tasks
7. Communicate effectively with team members and other departments to ensure seamless operations 

If you are a proactive problem solver with a passion for technology, we want to hear from you! Kickstart your IT career with Terra Nova Global and apply now for this exciting internship opportunity.                "
Architecture,"
                            Passerine Wealth Solution Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,000 /month","
                1. Preparing 2D architectural drawings (plans, sections, and elevations).
2. Creating 3D models and realistic renderings for presentations.
3. Collaborating with design and engineering teams for accuracy.
4. Using CAD/BIM software (AutoCAD, Revit, SketchUp, etc.) for design work.
5. Developing conceptual sketches and design ideas.
6. Modifying and updating drawings/models as per client feedback.
7. Assisting in the preparation of working drawings and construction documents.                "
HTML Developer,"
                            Zahimo Studio                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 3,000 /month","
                1. Convert Figma designs into responsive HTML/CSS layouts using Webflow
2. Work with modern web technologies like HTML5, CSS3, and JavaScript
3. Ensure websites are cross-browser compatible and optimized for performance
4. Collaborate with senior developers on client projects and internal templates
5. Maintain clean, reusable, and scalable code
6. Implement SEO best practices and accessibility standards
7. Debug and fix issues in existing projects                "
Cloud Deployment,"
                            Fission Infotech                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                 



1. Assist in deploying web applications on Ubuntu-based cloud servers 
2. Set up and manage Nginx web servers, SSL certificates, and reverse proxies 
3. Support deployment of ReactJS, NodeJS, HTML, and Astro-based web apps 
4. Configure file permissions, firewalls, and secure access via SSH 
5. Learn and apply CI/CD basics for smoother release workflows 
6. Monitor server health, logs, and troubleshoot common deployment issues 
7. Document deployment processes and best practices for future use                 "
Interior Design,"
                            Ricasa Architects                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,000 - 5,000 /month","
                1. Designing & drafting drawings
2. Using tools such as SketchUp, Lumion, and AutoCAD 
3. Working on site visit and site supervision                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            Hydizo Global Solutions PVT LTD                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 12,500 /month","
                As a Mobile App Development intern at Hydizo Global Solutions PVT LTD, you will have the exciting opportunity to work with cutting-edge technologies in Java, Node.js, React, Flutter, REST API, React Native, iOS, Android, Kotlin, Firebase, Firebase Cloud Messaging, and MongoDB. Your key responsibilities will include:

1. Collaborating with the development team to design, develop, and implement mobile applications.
2. Writing clean, maintainable, and efficient code for both frontend and backend development.
3. Testing and debugging applications to ensure optimal performance and user experience.
4. Integrating REST APIs and Firebase services for seamless data communication and storage.
5. Implementing push notifications using Firebase Cloud Messaging for real-time updates.
6. Working on database management and optimization using MongoDB.
7. Staying current on industry trends and best practices to continuously enhance your skills and contribute innovative ideas to the team. 

This internship will provide you with invaluable hands-on experience and the opportunity to make a meaningful impact on our mobile app development projects. Join us and be a part of our dynamic and innovative team!                "
Hardware & Firmware Engineer,"
                            Super.Family                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 /month","
                1. Design and Prototype: Develop hardware circuits and PCB layouts for various IoT and embedded devices using KiCAD/EasyEDA/Eagle. Create prototypes from concept to working models.
2. Firmware Development: Write efficient embedded C code for microcontrollers (ESP32/STM32/Arduino) implementing communication protocols (I2C, SPI, UART, WiFi, Bluetooth) and real-time operations.
3. System Integration: Interface various sensors (IMU, GPS, temperature, audio modules) and actuators with microcontrollers. Implement wireless connectivity and IoT capabilities.
4. Power Management: Design and optimize power systems for battery-operated devices, implement sleep modes, and ensure 8+ hours of operational battery life.
5.Testing and Debugging: Use oscilloscopes, logic analyzers, and multimeters to debug hardware issues. Conduct thorough testing of firmware functionality and edge cases.
6.Collaboration and Documentation: Work with software team for API integrations, maintain detailed technical documentation, BOMs, and circuit schematics. Manage version control using Git.                "
Product/Transportation/Mobility Design,"
                            Niluva Naturals LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                1. Concept Development: Collaborate with our team to brainstorm and develop innovative vehicle concepts tailored for the needs of farmers and rural communities.
2. Ideation & Sketching: Generate a wide range of ideas through sketching, mood boards, and other creative methods.
3. CAD Modeling: Translate your ideas into detailed 3D models using CAD software (e.g., SolidWorks, Fusion 360, FreeCAD)
4. Prototyping: Assist in the creation of physical and digital prototypes to test and refine design concepts.
5. Research: Research existing farm equipment, vehicles, and user needs to inform your design decisions.
6. Documentation: Prepare presentations and design documentation to communicate your ideas clearly and effectively.
7. Additional support for graphic and packaging design                "
Field Sales,"
                            Paxal Chemical Industry Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 12,000 /month","
                Require a field sales executive to sell high-quality Industrial chemicals in Karnataka/Andhra Pradesh/Tamil Nadu. A successful executive should have good judgment, fluency in communication, and high motivation to work outdoors, attend meetings, and convert leads.

 Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Visiting chemical and allied industries and selling our chemical products
2. Generate and maintain leads of potential clients
3. Prepare creative proposals and pitch them to the client
4. Upsell and maintain a cordial relationship with existing clients with regular follow-ups
5. Set monthly, quarterly, and yearly targets and prepare reports and analyses on a fortnightly and monthly basis
6. Stay up to date with market news and have in-depth market knowledge, monitor competition, and suggest better ways to improve market position
7. Attend exhibitions and seminars, and build a strong network
 
Intern Requirements
 
1. Have in-depth knowledge of chemicals / be willing to learn and absorb the knowledge of chemicals.
2. Should be willing to and enjoy traveling regularly
3. Should have good communication, interpersonal, and presentation skills
4. Should be willing to adapt and adjust as per the situation
5. Having your own vehicle is a must. Reimbursements will be made on traveling costs.
 
IMPORTANT
 
There are 3 openings for this role in -
1. Bangalore (should be fluent in Kannada)
2. Tamil Nadu (should be fluent in Tamil and meet clients in Tamil Nadu, but report twice a month to the Bangalore office)
3. Andhra Pradesh & Telangana (should be fluent in Telugu and meet clients in AP & Telangana, but report twice a month to the Bangalore office)
 
Note:

Women looking to restart their careers are welcome to apply.
 
Qualifications
1. 1-3 years of experience in sales/chemicals
2. Should be a graduate/have relevant skills
 
Internship Benefits & Perks
1. Opportunity to get in-depth knowledge about Chemical Industry in India
2. Work under the founder and gain deep insights into how to run a business
3. Become an experienced sales and marketing professional
 
Salary
Fixed Stipend of Rs. 12,000/month
On conversion can expect a salary package of Rs. 3 Lakhs per annum.                "
ReactJS Development,"
                            Robo Bionics                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 4,500 - 12,500 /month","
                Phase 1: Research & Strategy
a. Conduct qualitative end-user research (interviews, surveys) with Indian amputees to develop detailed user personas and a customer journey map. 
b. Develop a comprehensive SEO & Geo-Targeting Strategy, including bilingual (English/Hindi) keyword research and a local SEO plan for target cities. 
c. Design a serverless technical architecture diagram explicitly addressing the 1M concurrent user requirement. 

Phase 2: Content & Design (UI/UX)
a. Develop a content narrative and wireframes based on the research from Phase 1.
Vendor Responsibility: Write all final, approved copywriting for the landing page.
Create high-fidelity, responsive UI mockups in Figma for desktop and mobile, incorporating Robo Bionics' brand guidelines. 

Phase 3: Development
a. Develop the front-end using React/Next.js for maximum performance and scalability. 
b. Implement a Headless CMS to allow the Robo Bionics team to manage content. 
c. Develop secure, scalable serverless functions to handle form submissions. 
d. Implement all on-page and technical SEO requirements from the Phase 1 strategy. 

Phase 4: Integration, Testing & QA
a. Integrate the front-end with the Headless CMS and any required third-party APIs.
Set up Google Tag Manager and Google Analytics 4 with detailed event tracking. 
b. Execute rigorous load tests to validate that the architecture can handle the 1M concurrent user requirement. 
c. Conduct comprehensive cross-browser and cross-device compatibility testing.

Phase 5: Deployment & Post-Launch Support
a. Deploy the final application to a high-performance, scalable hosting platform (e.g., Vercel, AWS Amplify). 
b. Manage the go-live process.
c. Ensure and Maintain the site as 30 days of post-launch support for monitoring and bug fixes.                  "
Python Development,"
                            Codezero2pi Solution (OPC) Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 1,50,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the development team to design, implement, and maintain Python-based applications.
2. Gain hands-on experience in integrating Gen AI algorithms 
3. Explore ways to enhance blockchain systems with Gen AI capabilities and vice versa.
4. Stay updated on the latest developments in Python and Gen AI technologies.
5. Conduct research to identify innovative solutions and best practices in the field.
6. Conduct thorough testing of code to ensure high-quality and robust software.
7. Debug and troubleshoot issues related to Gen AI implementations.
8. Document code, processes, and project-related information for knowledge sharing and future reference.
9. Be open to learning new technologies and adapting to evolving project requirements.
10. Proactively seek opportunities to expand skills in Python and Gen AI.                "
Web Development,"
                            Basti Ki Pathshala Foundation                        ",Work From Home,Unpaid,"
                As a web development intern at Basti Ki Pathshala Foundation, you will have the opportunity to contribute to a meaningful cause while honing your skills in HTML, JavaScript, and CSS. Join our team and work on projects that will directly impact the lives of underprivileged children in rural areas. 



1. Collaborate with the development team to create and maintain interactive and user-friendly websites for the foundation.
2. Implement design mockups and wireframes using HTML, CSS, and JavaScript to enhance the user experience.
3. Troubleshoot and debug code to ensure smooth functionality across different browsers and devices.
4. Assist in optimizing website performance and loading speeds for an improved user experience.
5. Stay up-to-date with industry trends and best practices in web development to continuously improve skills.
6. Test websites for usability and functionality to ensure a seamless user experience.
7. Support the digital marketing team with web development tasks as needed to promote foundation initiatives. 

If you are passionate about making a difference through your web development skills, we want to hear from you! Apply now to join our team and be a part of something truly impactful.                "
Quality Analyst,"
                            Aparoksha Financial Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Doing  quality checks
2. Checking details of KYC
3. Move the proposal as per instructions from the system                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            CSTech Infosolutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Design, develop, and maintain scalable web applications using the MERN stack
2. Build server-side APIs using Node.js and Express.js
3. Create dynamic, responsive, pixel-perfect UI components using React.js, Next.js, and Tailwind CSS
4. Optimize application performance for speed and scalability
5. Work with MongoDB for database management and ensure efficient data handling
6. Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including designers and other developers, to deliver high-quality solutions
7. Write clean, maintainable, and reusable code while following best practices
8. Debug and troubleshoot application issues to ensure smooth functionality
9. Stay up-to-date with emerging technologies and frameworks to improve application performance and user experience                "
"3D Designing, Furniture Design Curation & Sales","
                            Ambikala Arts                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about 3D designing, furniture curation, and sales? Ambikala Arts is looking for a talented intern to join our team! As a 3D Designing, Furniture Design Curation & Sales Intern, you will have the opportunity to showcase your skills using tools like Google SketchUp, Canva, ChatGPT, Gemini, and Rendering to create stunning furniture designs and curate our collection for sales. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Create innovative 3D designs using Google SketchUp and other design tools.
2. Curate a collection of furniture pieces that align with our brand aesthetic.
3. Collaborate with the sales team to promote and sell our furniture designs.
4. Utilize ChatGPT to engage with customers and provide design recommendations.
5. Work with Gemini to manage inventory and track sales data.
6. Create realistic renderings of furniture pieces to showcase their design and functionality.
7. Assist with marketing efforts to drive traffic and increase sales. 

If you have a creative eye, excellent design skills, and a passion for furniture design, we want to hear from you! Join us at Ambikala Arts and bring your unique talents to our team.                "
AI Automation & No-Code Engineer (Remote),"
                            Holy Pathways (Brampton, Canada)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 11,000 /month","
                1. AI Agent Development: Build and deploy AI-powered agents and workflows using OpenAI APIs and other LLM platforms.
2. No-Code Automation: Create scalable automation using tools like Zapier, Make, n8n, Airtable, Webflow, or similar.
3. API Development & Integration: Design, document, and integrate APIs (REST/GraphQL) for custom workflows and product features.
4. Custom Coding: Extend no-code platforms with lightweight scripts in Python or JavaScript when necessary.
5. Workflow Orchestration: Architect and optimize processes that connect apps, databases, and AI tools.
6. MVP Building: Rapidly turn product ideas into working prototypes and iterate based on feedback.
7. Collaboration: Work closely with founders and stakeholders to understand goals and propose innovative solutions.
8. Documentation: Maintain clear documentation of AI agent logic, workflows, and API integrations.                "
Junior Software Developer,"
                            Voizer.ai                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 30,000 /month","
                Company: Cymake Voizer.ai
Location: House No. 6, Med Plus Basement, Gopal Nagar, Near Punjab National Bank, Opp. Arya Samaj Mandir, Ashok Nagar, New Delhi – 110018
Duration: 3–6 months
Stipend: Basic stipend will be provided
Interview type: Walk-in
Walk-in dates: 18th September 2025 to 20th September 2025

Cymake Voizer.ai is an innovative company focused on AI-driven communication, CRM, and automation solutions. We design smart systems that simplify lead management, sales pipelines, and customer engagement for businesses. We are seeking passionate CRM & automations interns to join our team. This internship is a great opportunity to gain hands-on experience in the world of CRMs, marketing automation, and workflow integrations.



1. Assist in creating and managing CRM pipelines & workflows
2. Support automation campaigns across email, SMS, and WhatsApp
3. Help with tool integrations and data management
4. Analyze reports and support the team in process optimization
5. Troubleshoot workflow/automation issues when required

If you’re excited to kickstart your career and want to be part of a company reshaping how businesses scale with AI, this role is for you!

Walk-in interview details:

Venue: Cymake Voizer.ai, House No. 6, Med Plus Basement, Gopal Nagar, Near Punjab National Bank, Opp. Arya Samaj Mandir, Ashok Nagar, New Delhi – 110018
Dates: 18th September 2025 to 20th September 2025
Time: 11:00 AM – 5:00 PM.

How to apply:

Interested candidates can directly walk in for the interview with their updated resume between 18th to 20th September 2025                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Kraten Enterprises                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 6,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Are you a skilled Full Stack Development intern with expertise in Next.js, React, and PostgreSQL? We are seeking a motivated individual to join our dynamic team. As an intern with us, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain valuable hands-on experience in a fast-paced environment.



1. Collaborate with our development team to design and implement new features using Next.js and React.
2. Develop and maintain backend services using PostgreSQL and other technologies.
3. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging issues to ensure smooth operation of our applications.
4. Participate in code reviews and provide feedback to improve code quality and maintainability.
5. Stay up-to-date with the latest trends and technologies in web development.
6. Work closely with cross-functional teams to ensure project requirements are met.
7. Contribute to the overall success of our projects by taking on additional tasks and responsibilities as needed.

If you are a proactive and eager learner looking to enhance your skills in Full Stack Development, apply now to join our team!                "
Full Stack Developer – Webbook & Tracking Integration,"
                            Shiplee                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 4,500 /month","
                1. Develop webhook listener endpoints (in PHP/Node.js) to receive shipment updates from courier companies.
2. Parse webhook payloads and update the Shiplee database (orders, tracking tables) with the latest status.
3. Implement cronjob-based tracking scripts for couriers that do not provide webhooks, ensuring regular polling of their APIs (e.g., every 30–60 minutes).
4. Normalize different courier tracking responses into a standard format for consistency.
5. Ensure reliability and fault tolerance: handle retries, duplicate events, and webhook downtime gracefully.
6. Work closely with the frontend team to expose tracking data via REST APIs for the merchant dashboard and Shopify/WooCommerce integrations.
7. Write clear documentation and maintain GitHub commits for all webhook/cronjob modules                "
Mechanical Engineering,"
                            Drenova                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 14,500 /month","
                As a Mechanical Engineering intern at Drenova, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects and gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced environment. Your role will involve collaborating with cross-functional teams to design, develop, and test mechanical systems. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in the design and development of mechanical components and systems.
2. Conduct research and analysis to improve product performance and efficiency.
3. Communicate effectively with team members to ensure project goals are met.
4. Participate in prototype testing and evaluate results to make necessary adjustments.
5. Create detailed technical documentation and reports for project updates.
6. Collaborate with suppliers and vendors to source materials and components.
7. Support senior engineers in various tasks and projects to gain valuable insights into the field. 

This internship will provide you with valuable skills and experience to kickstart your career in mechanical engineering. Join us at Drenova and be part of a dynamic team dedicated to innovation and excellence. Apply now and take the first step towards a rewarding career!                "
Electrical Engineering,"
                            Early Brain Magic                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 12,500 /month","
                1. Design and build required systems as instructed
2. Advise on the feasibility of a design 
3. Derisk a build by building required safety measures                "
Food QC & Inventory Management,"
                            Grassrootz Products                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Track all inward/outward inventory at our 3rd party manufacturing units and central warehouse.
2. Reconcile raw material consumption vs. finished goods output.
3. Conduct periodic QC checks and ensure SOP compliance.
4. Maintain Excel/Google Sheet trackers for daily reporting.
5. Flag discrepancies, shortages, or quality issues proactively.
6. Support creation of standardized processes for scale.
7. Coordinate with vendors (manufacturers, warehouse, and logistics) for timely stock movements.                "
Python Tutor,"
                            Aadi Foundation                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Conduct interactive Python sessions for students of varying skill levels.
2. Create engaging lesson plans and assignments to enhance learning.
3. Provide constructive feedback and support to help students improve their programming skills.
4. Assist in organizing workshops and events to promote Python education.
5. Collaborate with the team to develop new teaching strategies and resources.
6. Stay updated on the latest trends and advancements in Python programming.
7. Foster a positive and inclusive learning environment for all students.                "
Electronics Engineering,"
                            1accord                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 25,000 /month","
                Are you a tech-savvy electronics engineering student with a passion for cutting-edge technology? Join us at 1accord as an electronics engineering intern and work with a dynamic team to revolutionize the industry! 

 

1. Collaborating with senior engineers to design and develop embedded systems using Python, ARM Microcontroller, Raspberry Pi, and Arduino.
2. Assisting in circuit and PCB design for innovative IoT projects.
3. Implementing power electronics and control systems for automation solutions.
4. Programming PLCs for efficient manufacturing processes.
5. Conducting research and analysis to improve existing systems and processes.
6. Troubleshooting and debugging electronic systems to ensure optimal performance.
7. Participating in team meetings and brainstorming sessions to contribute fresh ideas and perspectives. 

If you are ready to gain hands-on experience and make a real impact in the field of electronics engineering, apply now and take your career to the next level with 1accord!                "
Sales and Marketing,"
                            DKK Industrial Products India Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Assisting the VP in all day-to-day activities.
2. Doing follow-ups and preparing reports as required.
3. Contributing to the development of the team and strategy.                "
SAP HANA (S/4) Consulting,"
                            Dynamo Info Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. System Implementation: Overseeing the integration and deployment of SAP software, ensuring seamless interaction with existing IT infrastructure. 
2. Testing & Quality Assurance: Developing and executing test plans (unit testing, integration testing, user acceptance testing) to verify system functionality and data accuracy. 
3. Documentation: Creating and maintaining project documentation, including business blueprints, system design specifications, and progress reports.                 "
Kotlin Developer,"
                            Srchout Software Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                1. Work using Kotlin and Java for mobile application development.
2. Develop both Android and iOS applications.
3. Work independently and manage tasks efficiently.
4. Demonstrate strong problem-solving skills to address development challenges.                "
Architecture,"
                            NMD Incorporation                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Develop detailed architectural drawings & documentation using ArchiCAD & AutoCAD.
2. Review and interpret drawings for both design & estimation purposes.
3. Prepare cost estimates (materials, labor, equipment, overheads) and perform take-offs.
4. Ensure compliance with the USA & Australian building codes and standards.
5. Coordinate with project managers, engineers, and suppliers for accurate deliverables.
6. Support cost optimization and value-engineering during the design phase.
7. Collaborate directly with international clients and participate in virtual project reviews.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Fafadia Tech                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 14,999 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Develop Frontend Features – Build responsive user interfaces and translate design mockups into functional web pages.
2. Support Backend Services – Contribute to APIs, database queries, and core business logic across the stack.
3. Collaborate with Team – Participate in stand-ups, code reviews, and work closely with designers, developers, and product managers.
4. Test & Debug Applications – Write unit tests, troubleshoot bugs, and assist in deployments.
5. Learn & Document – Stay updated with modern tools, follow best practices, and document technical solutions.                "
IT Support Engineer,"
                            Apport Software Solutions Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,500 - 10,000 /month","
                1. Assist in resolving technical issues for internal employees
2. Provide support for hardware and software installations and configurations
3. Perform troubleshooting and diagnostics to identify and resolve technical problems
4. Collaborate with team members to develop solutions and implement best practices
5. Document and track technical issues and resolutions for future reference
6. Participate in training and development opportunities to expand your knowledge and skills
7. Contribute to the overall success of the IT support team by providing excellent customer service and support.                "
Mobile App Development,"
                            Probey Services Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 12,000 /month","
                Job Description – React Native Mobile App Developer
Company: Probey Services
Location: H-150, Sector 63, Noida (On-site)
Position: React Native Mobile App Developer (Internship / Full-time)
Vacancies: 6
Stipend/Salary: ₹5,000 – ₹10,000 per month (based on skills & performance)
Working Days: 6 Days a Week (Monday–Saturday)

About the Role
We are looking for fresh and talented React Native Mobile App Developers who are passionate about building high-quality applications for Android and iOS platforms. If you have strong technical skills, a problem-solving mindset, and the eagerness to learn, this is a great opportunity to start your career in mobile development.

Key Responsibilities
1. Develop and maintain mobile applications using React Native.
2. Collaborate with backend and design teams to create smooth user experiences.
3. Integrate APIs and third-party services into applications.
4. Test, debug, and optimize applications for performance and reliability.
5. Stay updated with the latest tools, technologies, and best practices in mobile app development.

Eligibility & Requirements
1. Freshers with strong React Native skills are eligible.
2. Good understanding of mobile app development concepts and lifecycle.
3. Familiarity with app deployment on Google Play Store and Apple App Store is a plus.
4. Strong communication skills in English (written and spoken).
5. Ability to work independently as well as in a team.
6. Immediate availability to join.

What We Offer
1. Hands-on experience working on live projects.
2. Guidance and mentorship from experienced developers.
3. Opportunity to transition into a full-time role after internship.
5. A dynamic and growth-oriented work environment.                "
Python Development,"
                            AutoCuro Technologies Pvt Ltd                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 25,000 - 40,000 /month","
                Are you a Python enthusiast with a passion for developing innovative solutions? AutoCuro Technologies Pvt Ltd is seeking a Python Development intern to join our dynamic team. As a part of our company, you will have the opportunity to work on cutting-edge projects. Note that this is a hybrid job wherein it is expected that you will have to work from office three times a week. 

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with our team to design and implement Python-based solutions for our software products.
2. Develop and optimize algorithms to enhance the performance of our products.
3. Utilize Deep Learning techniques to improve the functionality of our software.
4. Participate in code reviews and provide constructive feedback to improve overall code quality.
5. Assist in testing and debugging software to ensure seamless functionality.
6. Stay updated on the latest trends in Python development and Deep Learning technologies.
7. Contribute ideas and insights to help drive innovation within the company. 

Here is our hiring process: 

1. Express interest in our posting by stating clearly why you are the best fit for the job. Highlight your most difficult project that you have undertaken. Ensure that your GitHub and LeetCode/competitive coding profile is visible in your application. 
2. You will receive a grading assignment having a spatial placement problem from us , which would also have a scorer python function. Your goal is to get the best scores while staying within 2-second time limit. 
3. If your assignment is accepted, we will have a 20-minute call 
4. We may call the candidate for a discussion at IIIT Delhi Okhla campus. 
 

If you are eager to learn, grow, and make a significant impact in the tech industry, apply now to be a part of our team at AutoCuro Technologies Pvt Ltd.                "
Django Python Developer,"
                            PRNK Infotech LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,001 - 15,001 /month","
                1. Collaborating with the development team to design and implement new features
2. Writing clean, efficient, and maintainable code using Python and Django
3. Building and maintaining RESTful APIs for seamless integration with other systems
4. Testing and debugging code to ensure optimal performance and functionality
5. Participating in code reviews and providing constructive feedback to peers
6. Researching and implementing best practices in web development
7. Assisting with documentation and technical support for internal and external stakeholders                "
Python Development,"
                            Innovexis                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 20,000 /month","
                Are you a talented Python developer looking to gain real-world experience in a fast-paced and innovative tech company? Innovexis is seeking a Python Development intern with knowledge in HTML, CSS, Python, Django, Machine Learning, REST API, and Flask to join our dynamic team.

Key responsibilities include:

1. Collaborating with our team to develop and maintain Python-based web applications
2. Implementing machine learning algorithms to enhance our products
3. Designing and implementing RESTful APIs for seamless integration with external systems
4. Working on Django and Flask frameworks to create efficient and scalable solutions
5. Assisting in troubleshooting and debugging issues to ensure smooth operation of our systems
6. Participating in code reviews and contributing to the overall improvement of our development processes
7. Staying updated on the latest technologies and trends in the Python development space to bring fresh ideas to the table.

If you are passionate about coding, eager to learn, and ready to make an impact, apply now for the opportunity to grow your skills and contribute to cutting-edge projects at Innovexis.                "
Associate Technical Delivery Manager,"
                            Codefeast                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                A. Team Management & Growth
1. Manage the development team and monitor their daily progress and performance.
2. Support the professional growth of team members through guidance and feedback.
3. Identify and address bottlenecks that may impact delivery timelines.

B. Technical Guidance
1. Provide essential technical support to help the team effectively screen candidates.
2. Ensure that client requirements are well understood and translated into actionable tasks.

C. Process Monitoring & Tools
1. Leverage AI tools to enhance productivity and streamline development workflows.
2. Use ticketing tools such as Jira to track, assign, and manage tasks efficiently.
3. Ensure smooth progress toward achieving daily and weekly targets.

D. Agile Collaboration
1. Work within an Agile methodology, participating actively in daily stand-ups.
2. Share updates on progress, discuss challenges, and plan the next steps with the team.
3. Contribute to building a culture of transparency, accountability, and continuous improvement.                "
Technical Content Creator (Video),"
                            Codeveda                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about technology, learning, and content creation?
We’re looking for a Technical Content Creator who has:

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Creating tutorial videos on programming languages and computer science topics, in a style similar to Fireship or CoreDumped: engaging, fast-paced, and insightful.
2. Producing short, detailed tutorial videos (scripts will be provided) that are concise, clear, and to the point.

Job Details:

1. Probation Period: 1 month
2. First Month Salary: ₹3,000
3. If performance is satisfactory → ₹10,000/month from the second month onward.
4. Work Mode: Remote (Work from Home)
5. Timings: Fully flexible – work at your own pace!

What We Expect:

1. High-quality, engaging educational/technical videos or articles.
2. Consistency and creativity in delivering content.
3. Commitment to producing professional-standard work.                "
Front End Development,"
                            PRNK Infotech LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,001 - 15,001 /month","
                As a Front End Development intern at PRNK Infotech LLP, you will have the opportunity to work on exciting projects using your skills in React, Redux, REST API, HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and Next.js. You will collaborate with our experienced developers to create user-friendly interfaces and responsive web applications. Your creativity and technical expertise will play a crucial role in shaping the future of our digital platforms. 

Key Responsibilities:
1. Develop and maintain front end components using React and Redux.
2. Integrate REST APIs to enhance functionality and user experience.
3. Write clean and efficient code in HTML, CSS, and JavaScript.
4. Implement responsive design principles to ensure cross-device compatibility.
5. Work with Next.js to optimize performance and SEO of web applications.
6. Collaborate with designers and backend developers to achieve project goals.
7. Stay updated on the latest trends and technologies in front end development to contribute innovative ideas to the team. 

Join us at PRNK Infotech LLP and take your front end development skills to the next level!                "
Production,"
                            Doshion Polyscience Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Assist in day-to-day production activities, ensuring adherence to production plans and timelines set by senior staff.
2. Participate in the execution of quality control protocols and report any deviations to supervisors for prompt corrective action.
3. Manage the safe receipt, storage, and movement of raw materials and finished products within the facility.
4. Support process optimization initiatives by observing, recording, and providing input to improve operational workflows.
5. Maintain accurate and comprehensive production logs, batch records, and documentation as per company standards.
6. Actively monitor and support batch processing steps to ensure correct procedures and consistency in outputs.
7. Compile and submit detailed shift reports outlining production volumes, operational issues, and compliance with schedules.
8. Monitor inventory consumption, conduct periodic stock audits, and assist with requisitioning materials as needed.                "
CNC Machine Setter And Operator.,"
                            Omkar Engineering                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 9,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Set up and operate CNC machines, including mills and lathes, to manufacture parts according to technical drawings and blueprints.
2. Interpret engineering drawings, blueprints, and schematics to understand project specifications.
3. Monitor machine performance throughout the production process, making necessary adjustments to maintain quality and efficiency.
4. Inspect finished products using precision measuring tools (e.g., micrometers, calipers) to ensure they meet quality standards.
5. Perform routine maintenance and troubleshooting on CNC equipment to minimize downtime.
6. Adhere to all safety protocols and company policies to maintain a safe working environment.
7. Collaborate with the production and engineering teams to optimize processes and improve production methods.

Who we're looking for:

We are seeking a candidate who has:
Proficiency in operating CNC machinery and using precision measuring tools.
Strong ability to read and interpret mechanical drawings, blueprints, and technical documents.
Basic understanding of computer programming (G-code, M-code) and CAD/CAM software is a plus.
Excellent mechanical aptitude and problem-solving skills.
High attention to detail and a commitment to quality.
Good communication skills and the ability to work effectively in a team.

Perks of joining our team:

Competitive stipend/salary: 10,000(Depend on skills we can increase.).
Certificate of completion: For internships.
Hands-on experience: Work on exciting projects with a dedicated team.
Good performance will increase chances of permanent in job.                "
Internet Of Things (IoT),"
                            UNIO Labs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 5,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the team to design and develop IoT solutions using Arduino, Raspberry Pi, and ESP32.
2. Implement and troubleshoot embedded systems using C Programming and C++ Programming.
3. Conduct research on ChatGPT for integrating AI capabilities into IoT devices.
4. Create PCB designs using EAGLE software for prototyping and testing.
5. Participate in testing and debugging to ensure the functionality and reliability of embedded systems.
6. Assist in the documentation and presentation of project findings and results.
7. Stay updated on the latest trends and advancements in IoT and embedded systems technology to contribute fresh ideas to the team.                "
Customer Success (Tech Support - SaaS Software),"
                            PeakScale Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Work on training and onboarding new customers on our B2B SaaS platform 
2. Work on day-to-day tech support for users 
3. Work on software configuration for new customers and users
4. Create training documents and videos
5. Help customers get the full benefit out of our platform
6. Interact with customer CEOs/COOs daily                "
Automation Software Developer,"
                            Humanity Founders                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with our development team to design, develop, and implement automated test scripts using Selenium and other tools.
2. Utilize your expertise in APIs, SQLite, PostgreSQL, and Postman to create efficient and effective automation solutions.
3. Assist in software testing and quality assurance processes to ensure optimal performance of our products.
4. Contribute to creative direction and innovative problem-solving strategies to enhance our technology solutions.
5. Develop and maintain test automation frameworks to streamline testing processes and improve overall efficiency.
6. Work closely with mentors and senior developers to expand your skills and knowledge in the field of automation software development.
7. Bring your creative thinking and technical expertise to the table to drive meaningful impact for Humanity Founders and our mission to make a positive change in the world.                "
Automation Workflow on N8N and Airtable,"
                            HiredNext Recruitment                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 11,000 - 16,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the recruitment team to identify areas for automation and workflow improvement.
2. Develop custom workflows using N8N and Airtable to streamline recruitment processes.
3. Test and troubleshoot automated workflows to ensure functionality and efficiency.
4. Provide ongoing support and maintenance for existing automated workflows.
5. Stay updated on the latest trends and technologies in automation and implement best practices.
6. Assist in training team members on how to use and maintain automated workflows.
7. Analyze data and performance metrics to identify opportunities for further optimization.                "
Environmental Sciences,"
                            Minimalist                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 13,000 /month","
                1. Environmental compliance & engineering: Ensure adherence to Indian environmental laws (air, water, and waste acts), manage permits.
2. Monitoring & reporting: Support in environmental monitoring, analyze data, and prepare reports for regulatory bodies and internal stakeholders.
3. Sustainability: Collect and verify HSE data for disclosures & reporting.
4. HSE integration: Collaborate on HSE risk assessments and the management system.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Watch Your Health                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Design and develop advanced applications using the Flutter platform.
2. Collaborate with cross-functional teams to define, design, and ship new features.
3. Work with external data sources and APIs.
4. Conduct unit testing to ensure robustness, usability, and overall reliability.
5. Identify and fix bugs while continuously improving application performance.
6. Stay up to date with emerging technologies and implement new tools/frameworks to enhance development efficiency.                "
IOT & Embedded Systems,"
                            UNIO Labs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with the team to design and develop IoT solutions using Arduino, Raspberry Pi, and ESP32.
2. Implement and troubleshoot embedded systems using C Programming and C++ Programming.
3. Conduct research on ChatGPT for integrating AI capabilities into IoT devices.
4. Create PCB designs using EAGLE software for prototyping and testing.
5. Participate in testing and debugging to ensure the functionality and reliability of embedded systems.
6. Assist in the documentation and presentation of project findings and results.
7. Stay updated on the latest trends and advancements in IoT and embedded systems technology to contribute fresh ideas to the team.                "
Software Development/AI,"
                            UNIO Labs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 3,000 - 6,000 /month","
                1. Collaborating with the development team to design and implement innovative AI solutions.
2. Assisting in the development and deployment of MLOps pipelines for machine learning models.
3. Integrating various APIs and REST API services into our software applications.
4. Managing and optimizing MySQL databases for efficient data storage and retrieval.
5. Utilizing Firebase for real-time data synchronization and cloud messaging.
6. Contributing to version control and collaboration using GitHub.
7. Implementing AI algorithms and techniques to enhance the functionality of our software products.                "
Operations,"
                            My Yoga Teacher                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Monitor session recordings to evaluate the quality of yoga teaching and identify areas for improvement.
2. Investigate root causes of quality issues in yoga sessions, propose corrective actions, and implement measures to prevent recurrence.
3. Provide individualized and group feedback sessions to yoga coaches based on session reviews and quality analysis findings.
4. Work closely with coaches to ensure they understand and adhere to quality standards.                "
Web Development,"
                            Infits                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 6,000 /month","
                Are you a talented and driven web development enthusiast looking to kickstart your career? Join us at Infits, a dynamic and innovative tech company, as a 'Web Development intern!' 



1. Collaborate with our team to develop responsive and user-friendly web applications using ReactJS, JavaScript, and Node.js.
2. Utilize MySQL and Firebase to create and maintain our database and backend systems.
3. Implement Cloud Firestore for real-time data synchronization and seamless integration with our applications.
4. Work on enhancing and optimizing REST APIs to improve the overall performance of our web services.
5. Assist in troubleshooting and debugging issues to ensure the smooth operation of our web platforms.
6. Stay updated on the latest web development trends and technologies to contribute fresh ideas and insights to our projects.
7. Support the development team in various tasks and projects to gain hands-on experience in the field. 

If you are passionate about web development and eager to learn and grow in a fast-paced environment, apply now to be part of our dynamic team at Infits!

Note that the candidate should have at least 3-6 months of prior experience.                "
Flutter Development,"
                            Coretegra Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 10,000 /month","
                 1. Build and maintain mobile applications using Flutter (or similar frameworks)
 2. Work with UI/UX designs and implement them into working screens
 3. Collaborate with designers and backend developers to integrate APIs
 4. Test and debug applications to ensure high performance and usability
 5. Keep up to date with mobile development trends and tools
 6. Participate in team meetings and code reviews                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Watch Your Health                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Architect & Build: Design, develop, and maintain scalable APIs and backend services (Node.js, Firebase triggers, or similar).
2. Cross-Platform UI: Collaborate with designers to implement responsive web interfaces (React, Angular, or Vue) and, optionally, mobile UIs using Flutter.
3. Database & DevOps: Model data schemas, optimize queries, and manage deployments using CI/CD pipelines.
4. Quality & Performance: Write clean, testable code; identify and resolve bottlenecks; enforce best practices.
5. Collaboration & Mentorship: Participate in code reviews, share knowledge, and help elevate team standards.
6. End-to-End Ownership: Take features from concept through production, monitoring, and iteration.                "
Product Management,"
                            AI Certs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                 


1. Assist in market research, learner persona development, and competitor analysis. 
2. Support product lifecycle tasks, including feature ideation, backlog grooming, and user story documentation. 
3. Collaborate with engineering, design, marketing, and analytics teams. 
4. Analyze product performance data and track key learner engagement metrics. 
5. Participate in user testing, feedback collection, and product update presentations. 
6. Contribute to roadmap planning, prioritization exercises, and cross-team communication. 
7. Stay updated on EdTech trends and emerging technologies to bring fresh insights. 
8. Engage in product case studies and problem-solving exercises to accelerate learning.                 "
Tech & Logistics Support,"
                            UNIO Labs                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,000 - 3,500 /month","
                1. Set up email IDs, remote desktop (RDP) accounts, and WhatsApp groups for new interns.
 2. Ensure all interns have access to necessary server logins and resources.
 3. Handle shipment entries and coordinate courier bookings on platforms like Shiprocket.
 4. Perform basic online research and maintain an organized log of intern resources.
 5. Report any technical issues and assist in troubleshooting minor problems.                "
Networking Automation (Python),"
                            Across The Globe (ATG)                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 2,500 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Configure & troubleshoot networking (IP, subnetting, routing, BGP basics).
2. Develop & test REST APIs using Postman & Python scripting.
3. Work with AWS/GCP/Azure cloud environments.
4. Perform Linux server administration (SSH, packages, configs).
5. Collaborate using Git/GitHub & VS Code Remote SSH.
6. Document and present technical findings.                "
SAP,"
                            Tax-O-Smart LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Design and develop OData services in SAP for integration with external APIs.
2. Configure and maintain SAP Gateway services for real-time data communication.
3. Collaborate with internal teams to map APIs with SAP objects and processes.
4. Ensure secure and efficient API-to-SAP connectivity following best practices.
5. Troubleshoot and resolve integration issues quickly and effectively.
6. Document integration architecture, service specifications, and workflows.
7. Provide ongoing support, monitoring, and optimization of SAP integrations.                "
Operations,"
                            Taxbharo                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilites include:

1. Managing client coordination via WhatsApp Business (WAB) – replies, reminders, follow-ups.
2. Maintaining and cleaning CRM/Excel sheets for clients and services.
3. Handling social media (Instagram, LinkedIn, Google Business) with scheduling tools.
4. Assisting in general office admin and communication.
5. Overseeing small IT-related tasks (Google Drive, data organization, Tally/Vyapaar/Zoho coordination).
6. Supporting both professional and personal management (reminders, errands, task tracking).                "
Low-Code Developer,"
                            Caarya                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 5,000 - 7,500 /month","
                1. Build and maintain no-code applications using platforms Bubble, Retool, Webflow, Glide, Airtable, Framer, and  Replit.
2. Develop workflows for hiring portals, dashboards, and forms.
3. Integrate third-party APIs and automation tools (Zapier, Make).
4. Work with product and operations teams to launch features quickly.
5. Troubleshoot and optimize existing no-code solutions.                "
ReactJS Development,"
                            Tax-O-Smart LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Develop, optimize, and maintain dynamic web applications using React.js.
2. Implement advanced form validations with custom rules and libraries.
3. Write modular, clean, and reusable component logic for scalable applications.
4. Apply advanced React.js concepts such as React Hooks (useState, useEffect, useContext, useMemo, useCallback, custom hooks), Context API, and state management.
5. Work with RESTful/GraphQL APIs for data fetching and integration.
6. Ensure efficient rendering and performance optimization of components.
7. Collaborate with UI/UX designers to deliver responsive and interactive designs.
8. Follow best practices for coding standards, version control, and testing.                "
Java Development,"
                            Tax-O-Smart LLP                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 12,000 /month","
                1. Design, develop, and maintain backend applications using Spring Boot.
2. Develop complex business logic using OOPS and advance Java concepts.
3. Build and expose RESTful APIs and integrate with frontend and external systems.
4. Implement advanced Spring Boot concepts such as:
Spring Data JPA & Hibernate for ORM
Spring Security (authentication, authorization, JWT, OAuth2)
Exception Handling, AOP (Aspect-Oriented Programming)
Caching (EhCache, Redis) and Scheduling
5. Manage transactions, connection pooling, and performance optimization.
6. Integrate with databases (MySQL, PostgreSQL, Oracle, MongoDB, etc.).
7. Develop and maintain a microservices architecture with inter-service communication.
8. Ensure API performance, security, and best practices for integration.
9. Write clean, testable, and maintainable code following standard practices.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Enpointe                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                Company: Enpointe.io
Location: Mumbai
Employment Type: Internship 

About Enpointe.io:
Enpointe.io is a technology-driven company specializing in innovative web solutions that enhance digital experiences. As a growing organization, we foster a collaborative and creative work environment where aspiring developers can gain hands-on experience in full-stack development. If you are eager to learn and work on real-world projects, we invite you to join us as a Full-Stack Development Intern.

Position Overview:
We are looking for a Full-Stack Development Intern who is enthusiastic about building scalable web applications. The ideal candidate should have a basic understanding of front-end and back-end technologies, a passion for coding, and a willingness to learn modern development practices.

Key Responsibilities:
Assist in developing and maintaining web applications using React.js, Node.js, and JavaScript (ES6+).
Support in designing and implementing RESTful APIs and backend services.
Work with databases such as MongoDB, MySQL, or PostgreSQL.
Collaborate with designers and senior developers to enhance user experiences.
Optimize applications for performance, security, and scalability.
Ensure cross-browser compatibility and mobile responsiveness.
Write clean, maintainable code and follow industry best practices.
Debug and resolve issues under the guidance of senior developers.
Stay updated with the latest trends in full-stack development.

Required Skills and Qualifications:
Basic knowledge of React.js, Node.js, JavaScript (ES6+), HTML, and CSS.
Understanding of backend frameworks like Express.js.
Familiarity with databases (MongoDB, MySQL, or PostgreSQL) is a plus.
Knowledge of Git for version control.
Interest in learning RESTful API integration and authentication methods like JWT.
Strong problem-solving skills and eagerness to learn new technologies.
Ability to work collaboratively in a team environment.

Preferred Qualifications:
Exposure to TypeScript and modern web development tools.
Understanding of cloud services like AWS or Firebase.
Familiarity with Docker and CI/CD pipelines.
Experience with testing frameworks like Jest or Mocha is a plus.

What We Offer:
Hands-on experience in real-world full-stack projects.
Mentorship from experienced developers.
A collaborative and learning-focused work culture.
Opportunity for growth and potential full-time employment based on performance.                "
Robotics Trainer,"
                            CreAct Academy                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 22,000 /month","
                1. Conduct engaging regular classes in school and after-school programs (online/offline) 
2. Guide students through project-based learning and hands-on innovation activities 
3. Develop innovative teaching methodologies and materials aligned with 21st-century learning standards 
4. Collaborate with the curriculum and content team to continuously improve learning outcomes 
5. Maintain regular communication with academic coordinators and parents as required 
6. Conduct assessments and provide feedback on student progress                "
Front End Development,"
                            FreJun Incorporation                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 16,200 - 18,000 /month","
                We are seeking a skilled frontend developer to join our team. 

Selected intern's day-to-day responsibilities include designing, developing, and maintaining customer-facing web applications.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            TerraBlue XT                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 /month","
                1. Collaborate with our development team to design, develop, and implement innovative web applications.
2. Work on front-end and back-end development, ensuring seamless functionality and user experience.
3. Utilize your expertise in database management with MySQL, MongoDB, and PostgreSQL.
4. Assist in optimizing website performance and ensuring scalability across various platforms.
5. Contribute to the integration of third-party APIs and services for enhanced functionality.
6. Stay updated on industry trends and technologies to continually enhance our products.
7. Support in troubleshooting and resolving technical issues to maintain a smooth operation.                "
Backend Development,"
                            Openleaf                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,000 /month","
                1. Working on backend development (Node.js)
2. Working on rapidly building REST APIs
3. Working with SQL database (PostgreSQL)                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            Agrim.ai                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 20,000 /month","
                1. Implement full-stack features end-to-end—UI components, APIs, and data models—with clean code, basic tests, and version control.
2. Prototype and evaluate LLM-powered features (prompting, retrieval/RAG, lightweight tuning) and add simple safety/quality checks.
3. Ship and maintain: deploy to staging/prod, monitor logs/metrics, triage bugs, document decisions, and iterate from user feedback.                "
PHP Development,"
                            TSTEPS PRIVATE LIMITED                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 45,000 /month","
                1. Write clean, efficient, and well-documented PHP code
2. Integrate user-facing elements developed by front-end teams
3. Troubleshoot, test, and maintain core product software and databases
4. Optimize application performance and scalability
5. Stay updated with emerging PHP frameworks, tools, and best practices                "
Web Developer (Frontend),"
                            Caarya                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 7,500 - 12,500 /month","
                About the Internship - 
We are looking for a Frontend Web Developer Intern who can build fast, responsive landing pages for high-impact campaigns such as NGO hiring drives and AI course enrollments. This role is ideal for students who want to gain practical, production-level experience in building and deploying websites.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Design and develop responsive landing pages using HTML, CSS, and JavaScript frameworks (React preferred).
2. Optimize pages for performance, speed, and SEO.
3. Integrate forms, analytics, and APIs into landing pages.
4. Collaborate with marketing and product teams to execute campaigns.
5. Debug and maintain existing web applications.

Skills Required - 
1. Proficiency in HTML, CSS, JavaScript.
2. Experience with React.js / Next.js or similar frontend frameworks.
3. Familiarity with Git/GitHub version control.
4. Understanding of responsive design and cross-browser compatibility.
5. Basic knowledge of integrating APIs and third-party tools.

Internship Details - 
1. Mode: Remote / Hybrid / On-site (based on startup)
2. Commitment: 20-30 hrs/week
3. Pay grade - Rs. 7,500 - Rs. 12,500 per month 

What you'll gain? 
1. Real-world experience in building production-grade websites.
2. Skills in rapid web development and deployment.
3. Exposure to live campaigns (NGO hiring portals, AI course sales).
4. Mentorship from senior developers in established startups/GCCs.
5. Opportunity to contribute to scalable products.

Who can apply? 
1. Students with prior web development project/internship experience.
2. Enthusiastic about frontend engineering and quick turnarounds.
3. Available to commit 20-30 hours/week for this internship

Follow us on - 
Instagram - https://www.instagram.com/caarya.in/?hl=en
LinkedIn - https://www.linkedin.com/company/caarya/                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            EzyEV Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 15,000 - 18,000 /month","
                1. Mobile Application development.
2. IoT development and integration.                "
Software Development,"
                            Planys Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 12,500 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Write clean and efficient code using HTML, CSS, JavaScript, and jQuery.
2. Build web applications using standard web development practices.
3. Create responsive web apps with user-friendly designs.
4. Work on projects using the MERN stack – React.js, Node.js, and MongoDB.
5. Use Linux systems like Ubuntu, Fedora, or RHEL for development work.
6. Research software tools and maintain proper documentation.
7. Communicate with team members and use the latest tools and frameworks.
8. Improve and maintain parts of the web framework using React and Node.
9. Use Object-Oriented Programming and follow the MVC framework.
10. Follow good coding practices and use version control tools like Git or SVN.                "
Quality Analyst,"
                            Primenumbers Technologies                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 20,001 /month","
                Location: Indiranagar, Bengaluru [Onsite]
Duration: [3–6 months]
Time: 9:30am - 6:30pm
Stipend: 20k (17.5k +2.5k travel allowance)
Mode: Full-time Internship

About the Internship:

We are looking for a Quality Analyst Intern to join our SaaS product team. You will work on validating data, testing features from a user’s perspective, and ensuring the accuracy and trustworthiness of our product. This is an exciting opportunity to gain hands-on experience in a fast-paced, data-driven environment.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Review and validate datasets, reports, and dashboards.
2. Support User Acceptance Testing (UAT) for new features.
3. Simulate real-world user scenarios to find data inconsistencies.
4. Document findings and share feedback with product & engineering teams.                "
Jewelry Designer,"
                            Axe Consultancy And Security Services LLC                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 30,000 - 40,000 /month","
                Are you passionate about creating unique and stunning jewelry pieces? Do you have a keen eye for design and a strong proficiency in Adobe Photoshop, Adobe Illustrator, Rhino, Blender 3D, and ZBrush? If so, then we have the perfect opportunity for you as a Jewelry Designer intern at Axe Consultancy And Security Services LLC.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Collaborate with our design team to conceptualize and create innovative jewelry designs.
2. Utilize Adobe Photoshop and Illustrator to develop detailed sketches and renderings of jewelry pieces.
3. Use Rhino, Blender 3D, and ZBrush to bring your designs to life in 3D models.
4. Assist in the production process, from selecting materials to overseeing the manufacturing of prototypes.
5. Stay up-to-date on industry trends and incorporate them into your designs.
6. Participate in brainstorming sessions and contribute creative ideas for new jewelry collections.
7. Assist with other design-related tasks and projects as needed.

If you are a motivated and creative individual looking to gain hands-on experience in the jewelry design industry, then we want to hear from you! Join our dynamic team and help us create beautiful and innovative jewelry pieces that will captivate our clients. Apply now to kickstart your career in jewelry design with Axe Consultancy And Security Services LLC.                "
Full Stack Development,"
                            EzyEV Technologies Private Limited                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 10,000 - 15,000 /month","
                1. Building scalable APIs and Micro Services
2. Work on IoT pipelines (Kafka, MQTT)
3. Collaborate on DB Designing                "
Artificial Intelligence (AI),"
                            Elementals.ai                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 20,000 - 40,000 /month","
                Job Title: AI Intern (Computer Vision & Visual Reasoning)
Location: Remote / Hybrid
 Internship Type: Paid

About Us:
We are a fast-growing startup building AI-powered solutions for vision and reasoning tasks. Our focus is on advancing computer vision systems that can understand, interpret, and reason about images and videos.

Role Overview:
We are seeking a motivated AI Intern with strong computer vision fundamentals and hands-on experience in deep learning for visual tasks. You will collaborate with our AI/ML engineers to design, prototype, and evaluate models that combine CV with visual reasoning capabilities.

Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Research and prototype CV models for detection, segmentation, classification, and reasoning.
2. Work on tasks like object detection, OCR, scene understanding, and multi-modal reasoning.
3. Collect, preprocess, and augment image/video datasets.
4. Implement and experiment with deep learning architectures (CNNs, Vision Transformers, multi-modal models).
5. Evaluate model performance with appropriate metrics and improve robustness.
6. Document findings and contribute insights to the team.

Requirements:
1. Proficiency in Python, PyTorch/TensorFlow.
2. Solid understanding of computer vision techniques and deep learning models.
3. Experience with data preprocessing, image augmentation, and dataset handling.
4. Familiarity with visual reasoning benchmarks or multi-modal AI (e.g., CLIP, BLIP, LLaVA).

Preferred:
1. Prior internship or project experience in computer vision or visual reasoning.
2. Hands-on work with Vision Transformers, detection/segmentation pipelines, OCR systems.
3. Experience integrating CV models with LLMs for reasoning tasks.
4. Contributions to open-source AI/CV projects.

What You’ll Gain:
1. Practical experience building state-of-the-art vision and reasoning models.
2. Exposure to multi-modal AI research and applications.
3. Mentorship from senior AI/ML engineers.
4. Opportunity for transition into a full-time role.                "
Backend Operation,"
                            GreyCampus                        ",Work From Home,"₹ 8,000 - 10,000 /month","
                Selected intern’s day-to-day responsibilities include:

1. Assist in creating and optimizing workflows using tools like Zoho Flow, n8n, etc.
2. Help manage and integrate platforms like Zoho CRM, Analytics, Desk, Sign, etc.
3. Support WhatsApp/email automation for lead nurturing and campaign management.
4. Work with the team to ensure API integrations and data sync across platforms.
5. Assist in managing and updating reports and dashboards.
6. Coordinate with internal teams to gather requirements for backend configurations.
7. Support cloud and domain management tasks (AWS, Cloudflare – basic level).
8. Learn how to handle subscriptions, renewals, and backend documentation.                "
